Summary
GRADE II LISTED TRURO TOWNHOUSE WITH PARKING Situated in a very pleasant location close to the city centre. Full of period detail however in need of general updating and some TLC. Sold with no chain. Council Tax band E.
"Exciting development opportunity. Situated in what is widely regarded as Truro’s most desirable residential area, an exceptionally rare opportunity to acquire a development site of just over 2 acres in a discreet position, off a quiet lane, commanding far reaching southerly views over th..."
Confidential listing. Please enquire for further information.
"SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED PERIOD HOUSE WITH LARGE MATURE PRIVATE GARDENS Enjoying complete privacy and located within Kenwyn, one of the most sought after parts of Truro city. Extending to approximately 3,488 sq ft with well proportioned rooms and retaining many period features. "
"Occupying a convenient yet incredibly tranquil location on the rural fringes of the cathedral city of Truro, a stunning, highly individual detached family home with over 3,000sq.ft. of 5 bedroomed, 3 bath/shower roomed light filled accommodation, beautifully presented having in recent years under..."
A handsome period property sensitively converted into four cottages nestling in a picturesque setting with views to the Cornish coast. Glorious gardens of approaching one acre. Three holiday cottages and one owners cottage. Fabulous holiday letting business in an idyllic coastal location. Worksho...
"• Prime City Centre Location • Striking detached residence • Fantastic Investment opportunity • Potential gross yield circa £55k pa • Beautiful, landscaped gardens • Two separate driveways • Elevated views • Generous parking – 9 spaces in tot..."
"Exceptional four-bedroom townhouse with river frontage, parking and private mooring"
"Impressive, detached family home in a highly sought-after area of Truro city with parking and garaging."
*Mature non-estate city centre position*Four double bedrooms plus study*Double garage & driveway parking*Presented to exceptional standard*Master bedroom ensuite*28ft x 26ft games & cinema room*Stunning kitchen/breakfast room*Large gardens & decked sun terrace*
"An impressive City Centre property with owners 1 bedroom accommodation currently run as The Townhouse Bed & Breakfast Rooms. Reception Hallway, Breakfast Room, kitchen, utility Room, office, 12 en-suite letting rooms. Beautiful Gardens, Two bedroom Chalet, Storage Sheds, ample Parking. EPC Band"
"An elegant 4/5 bedroomed Grade II Listed Georgian townhouse, meticulously renovated to an exacting standard and impeccably presented throughout, offering superb accommodation in a highly desirable terrace just a short walk from Truro city centre. Of additional interest to many, the lower ground f..."
"A particularly handsome 5 bedroomed double fronted detached Victorian townhouse, elegant in appearance and of substantial proportions throughout in a highly desirable location close to the city centre of Truro. Having undergone a sympathetic and meticulously planned programme of refurbishment and..."
"No onward chain An exemplary, beautifully presented and extended 4 bedroomed detached house situated at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac yet just a short walk to the city centre. With a stunning, contemporary kitchen, 2 spacious reception rooms, a study, 2 en-suite bedrooms, a level lawned rear g..."
"Situated close to Truro City Centre in the extremely popular Kenwyn area this beautifully maintained and delightfully presented family home, has a generous garden, double garage and brick paved driveway. With comprising of living room, dining room, kitchen, sun room, office, WC, utility room on ..."
" A fine modern detached four bedroom Georgian style townhouse with over 2300sqft of space, a delightful landscaped sunny garden, parking and garage. Beautiful presentation, must be viewed."
"Forming the central section of Trewinnard Court located within Kenwyn, one of Truro’s most discrete and desirable areas, this elegant and spacious Edwardian residence provides beautifully balanced, spacious and architecturally interesting accommodation together with an enclosed and well-stocked ..."
"This truly elegant period home that is contemporary in design yet still maintaining its original features can be found set back along the Tregolls Road, perfectly placed for strolling in to Truro City centre to take full advantage of the wide array of restaurants, wine bars, shops, schools and al..."
"Available for immediate occupation. An individual brand new architect designed detached home enjoying delightful and far reaching rural views in this most convenient and sought after location on the outskirts of Truro and offering spacious, flexible, high specification accommodation with gener..."
"• Outstanding detached house• Constructed to a traditional style• Four bedrooms•A spacious open plan living area • Modern kitchen• Corner plot position with superbly maintained gardens to the front, side and rear• Private driveway providing off street parking..."
"An imposing period style home of distinction. Set within the magnificent ‘Royal Crescent’, boasting impressive 9’10” high ceilings, large sash windows and feature detailing. Immaculately presented with style and elegance coupled with modern luxuries, this attractive 2,185s..."
"With stunning, far reaching views taking in the cathedral and the city of Truro; an impressive, detached 4/5 bedroomed family home with spacious, light filled accommodation of over 2,100sq.ft. including an open-plan kitchen/dining/living room with bifold doors leading to the wonderful 120’ ..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE an ATTRACTIVELY LOCATED, ARCHITECTUALLY DESIGNED, DETACHED FAMILY HOME, set within a cul-de-sac of only six individual properties, located just off Falmouth Road and a very SHORT WALK away from TRURO CITY CENTRE & all AMENITIES it has to offer! BOASTING 2094 SQ...."
"Property Description: An executive 3 double bedroom, 4 bathroom detached property on the fringes of Truro City Centre. The property is in a prime location for the city centre as well as being of modern build to an excellent standard. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a light and..."
"Offering 3 bedroomed detached accommodation in an elevated position complemented by high specification accommodation, broad balconies, garage and gardens. These traditionally built homes are of the highest quality. "
"TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW IN A DESIRABLE LOCATION Situated within walking distance to The Royal Cornwall Hospital. Suitable as a buy-to-let or full time occupation. In all, the accommodation comprises; entrance hall, sitting room, dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms, family bathr..."
"Having been lovingly cared for during our clients' ownership over the last 30 years, a charming 5 bedroom detached property, arranged over ground and first floors, and boasting a private plot within an approximate 10 minute walk from the centre of Truro. The property briefly comprises: entrance p..."
"Situated within this popular and quiet cul de sac location, this deceptive detached family residence boasts five double bedrooms, gas fired heating and double glazing. The property is well presented throughout and the internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance hallway, stairs to lower gr..."
"A superb 3 Double Bedroom Detached bungalow set within a generous size garden with far reaching views over Truro City. This stunning family home has had the benefit of having a newly fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, plus a newly fitted bathroom and en-suite to the master bedroom. The p..."
 A beautiful Grade II Listed four bedroom Georgian townhouse located in Lemon Street right in the heart of Truro. The property is in need of some updating but has many period features intact. There's a small courtyard garden and balcony to the rear and a long tandem garage accessed from Lemon Me...
 A large detached FOUR BEDROOM family house located at the end of an exclusive cul-de-sac next to TRURO SCHOOL and occupying a corner plot. Spacious double garage with electric roller door. Beautiful established rear garden. Driveway parking. WATCH THE GUIDED VIDEO TOUR.
 An elegant and extensive Grade II Listed Georgian four bedroom character townhouse in one of Truro's finest historic streets with large walled garden and garage / workshop. NO ONWARD CHAIN.
" An impressive and flexible five bedroom plus study detached family house with gardens, double garage and extensive driveway parking, ideally located close to Truro College, the Royal Cornwall Hospital and Richard Lander Secondary School. "
"We are pleased to offer a beautifully presented 5 bedroom detached property just a stone’s throw from the city centre. Arranged over 3 floors, this property would make a wonderful family home. As you enter the property, there is a good sized lounge with high ceilings along with a separate d..."
" A stunning detached three double bedroom (main en-suite) home which has been the subject of extensive remodelling and refitting. Large garage, carport and driveway. Fabulous landscaped gardens. Exclusive and sought after location. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
" A spacious and extended SIX BEDROOM home tucked away at the end of the cul de sac. Fabulous living space, log burner, open plan kitchen/dining room, conservatory, utility room and garage. Landscaped gardens."
" A substantial, extended five bedroom detached family house conveniently located for access to the city centre in a small cul-de-sac. Large enclosed, landscaped level sunny rear garden with river glimpses and summer house. Landscaped front garden, parking and garage. "
" A superb period family home that offers immense flexibility. Four of five bedrooms with spacious living, refitted kitchen and dining room. Loft conversion with en-suite bedroom. Front and rear gardens and off road parking. Planning consent granted to extend further if desired."
Found within the desirable location of Treffry Road is this spacious detached 3 bedroom (Master En-suite) bungalow having the benefit of being in a small cul-de-sac location with no through road. This lovely home boasts of generous size rooms throughout with the accommodation comprises of: A wel...
"****This is a Wonderful Detached Much Loved Deceptively Spacious Family Home - Viewings are essential to Appreciate the Location Space Plot Size and Just how Much this Fabulous Property Offers - Briefly comprising of - Porch leading into a Super Entrance Hall, Study, Lounge with Patio Doors leadi..."
" A spacious and beautifully presented four bedroom detached house with double garage built in 2016 and having the remainder of the warranty. Owned solar panels with storage battery and wood burning stove. Excellent location close to The Royal Cornwall Hospital, Truro Prep School, Richard Lander ..."
"A spacious, modern and well maintained four double bedroom executive style detached home. Offering superb family sized accommodation and for sale with no upward chain. The property is located in a private drive for only this and one other property, in a tucked away position and occupies a great p..."
"An exemplary 4 bedroomed reverse level home situated on the outskirts of Truro city. The property has been completely renovated during our clients’ ownership and now presents a stunning home with a contemporary kitchen/dining room, spacious L-shaped living room with stunning views to the re..."
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE IN SUPERB LOCATION This four bedroom detached property occupies a private plot on the outskirts of Truro. Although within walking distance of the city centre, the property enjoys wonderful views in what feels like a semi rural location. Originally a ..."
"*** REDUCED TO OFFERES IN EXCESS OF £525,000 *** A substantial, immaculately presented and refurbished three bedroom detached bungalow located on the outskirts of Truro city centre. Situated on a generous plot with landscaped gardens. Family sized accommodation compris..."
"Available for the first time since it was built in 2015; this spacious, beautifully maintained and appointed 5/6 bedroomed detached home enjoying broad frontage, driveway parking for 2 vehicles and delightful enclosed rear garden. Situated in this highly regarded and convenient location moments f..."
"EXTENDED & BEAUTFULLY PRESENTED bungalow with additional LOFT CONVERSION set on a SUBSTANTIAL PLOT with SOUTH FACING GARDEN offering far reaching COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS. Large MODERN KITCHEN/DINING/LIVING ROOM, SEPARATE LOUNGE &, CONSERVATORY, GARAGE, GARDEN ROOM & SUMMER HOUSE & GEN..."
"An exquisite highly specified large 2 bedroomed, 2 bathroomed first floor apartment with private balconies, secure parking and in addition, an underground parking space in an exclusive leafy gated community. An apartment of the highest order that will not fail to satisfy even the most discerning ..."
"A broad detached bungalow with three double bedrooms, located on the western side of the city centre and being conveniently situated for County Hall, various junior schooling and supermarkets. The bungalow enjoys city and cathedral views from the front elevation and has been tastefully updated an..."
" An exceptionally well presented, extended and upgraded three bedroom detached bungalow with double garage and sunny garden located at the end of a cul-de-sac and close to The Royal Cornwall Hospital and Truro Golf Club with lovely country walks nearby. Beautiful refitted kitchen and Sharp's fit..."
"Conveniently located close to Truro city centre; an impressive, BRAND NEW highly individual non-estate home ready for immediate occupation. With well presented 3 double bedroom air source heated accommodation with gated driveway and parking for 2-3 vehicles and low maintenance rear garden. "
INVESTMENT PROPERTY A substantial detached building comprising THREE SELF CONTAINED FLATS AND GARAGES set in the very heart of the city and ideal for the residential letting market.
"An elegant, stylish modern house which is the epitome of easy city living. A superb 3 bedroomed family home with light filled beautifully appointed, high ceilinged accommodation, east facing enclosed rear courtyard garden, single garage and off-street parking. "
"The Treliske is a four-bedroom, two-bathroom family home with an open-plan kitchen/dining room and living room - both with French doors to the garden, a lower ground floor garage and excellent storage. Along with a WC and en suite to bedroom one, this home ticks all the boxes for family life."
"A brand new detached four bedroom family home with light and bright accommodation set over three floors. To the first floor is the living space with a bright and modern open plan kitchen/dining room with a useful utility room opening to the outside, a living room with French doors opening to ..."
An exquisitely designed four bedroom detached family home with detached single garage located on a highly regarded modern residential development walking distance to the city centre
" With gorgeous enclosed gardens, this spacious detached three bedroom bungalow is within a short stroll of the city centre and close to delightful rural walks. Open plan kitchen with electric AGA, living room with log burner. Beautifully fitted bath/shower rooms. Parking. Owned solar panels."
" A spacious and extended three bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after Kenwyn area of the city. Two reception rooms and two bath/shower rooms, low maintenance garden, driveway parking and garage."
DETACHED PERIOD HOUSE IN CITY CENTRE LOCATION A truly unique townhouse offering complete City centre convenience and within a short walk of Archbishop Benson primary school. A cherished family home full of character and charm with potential to extend into the roof (subject to ...
" An immaculately presented three bedroom detached house with exceptional views of Truro Cathedral and the city. Owned from new and greatly improved and upgraded over the years. Beautiful, sunny, landscaped gardens. Convenient location within walking distance of Waitrose, good schools, the city c..."
"A superb family home with surprisingly extensive accommodation, generous landscaped gardens, garage and private parking within a short 10 minute walk to the Truro city centre. Viewing highly recommended."
Deceptive from the front this delightful detached property has three bedrooms with reverse level accommodation and enjoys fabulous elevated views from the rear across the city of Truro taking in the cathedral. This property is one of the most immaculately presented homes we have seen. Set in a...
"Offered onto the market with no onward chain, this spacious dormer bungalow is situated in a quiet cul de sac setting within short motoring distance of Treliske Hospital. The internal accommodation comprises: Entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor and two storage cupboards, study/..."
"LARGE FAMILY HOME in a SOUGHT AFTER AREA with GARAGE & GENEROUS PARKING, within a SELECT DEVELOPMENT in a FANTASTIC POSITION, CLOSE TO RICHARD LANDER SECONDARY SCHOOL, TRELISKE HOSPITAL and TRURO COLLEGE This FANTASTIC HOME, offers INCREDIBLE LIVING SPACE inc. LARGE KITCHEN/DINER & LOUNG..."
A deceptively spacious three bedroom detached house backing onto Halbullock Nature Reserve with scope to extend subject to planning. The property occupies a generous plot within a cul-de-sac location. Situated on a popular development with convenient access to both the Royal Cornwall Hospital and...
"Offered onto the market with no onward chain, this detached bungalow offers double glazing, gas fired heating and is within close proximity to Treliske hospital, Richard Lander School and Truro College. The internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance porch, hallway with storage cupboards ..."
"Offered onto the market with no onward chain, this spacious detached bungalow occupies a quiet cul-de-sac location. The accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance porch, hallway, living room with feature fireplace, dining area, conservatory, fitted kitchen and utility. Master bedroom with en-suite..."
Located on the eastern side of Truro city centre on a popular modern development is this detached three bedroom house. Excellent access is offered to all amenities in Truro and is within the catchment area for Archbishop Benson junior school and Penair senior school. Viewing is highly recommemend...
"A beautiful character period family residence situated only a stone’s throw from the heart of the city centre. Offered for sale with no upward chain. With stunning cathedral views. Accommadation comprises of lounge, dining room and open plan to the kitchen to the ground flo..."
Available with no onward chain A wonderful spacious penthouse apartment set within this recent conversion of one of Truro’s most prominent and beautiful buildings. Located centrally to Truro city yet with a green backdrop of Victoria Gardens and the River Kenwyn. 
"A spacious and well maintained three bedroom detached family home, built in 2019 by Persimmon Homes and located on the Copperfields development. The property occupies a fantastic corner plot with good sized gardens and provides convenient access to the city centre by car or on foot less than a mi..."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom detached Bungalow in the sought after area of Highertown Truro within walking distance of the City centre. It has great transport links for access to the Hospita;, Truro College and the A30. The property boasts a generously sized Kitchen / Diner, light a..."
** FANTASTIC LOCATION ** A n attractive detached home which is situated among other similar homes in this unique and popular development. Within reach off the stunning coastline of South Cornwall this home will attract many and we strongly recommend an early inspection. 
" A spacious three bedroom home located in a sought after cul de sac. Short stroll to the city centre. Large front and rear gardens, plenty of driveway parking, gas central heating and NO ONWARD CHAIN."
" A detached three bedroom family home in a popular development close to Penair Secondary School and walkable to Waitrose supermarket. Spacious family living, enclosed rear garden, garage and parking. Mains gas central heating and UPVC double glazing."
"*** SOLD SUBJECT TO CONTRACT *** If you are looking to sell, please call our office for a FREE VALUATION We are pleased to offer this wonderful 4 bedroom semi-detached family home which is on the fringes of Truro City Centre. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a spacious and li..."
" A substantial bungalow currently arranged as two bedrooms and two bathrooms but could easily revert to being three bedrooms. Kitchen/dining room, living room and superb large front and rear gardens. Driveway parking and garage."
" A very spacious and well presented four bedroom semi-detached house with a gorgeous landscaped low maintenance rear garden with composite sun decks, impressive summer house and glass balustrades. Excellent location near Penair Secondary School and Waitrose. "
" A versatile and spacious three bedroom end of terrace character townhouse with conservatory, workshop and off street parking space. Fantastic location next to Redannick Park and allotments and walkable to the city centre. Mains gas central heating and UPVC double glazing."
"A luxurious 2 bedroomed, 2 bathroomed, high ceilinged first floor apartment overlooking Boscawen Street and Cathedral Lane, opposite the Hall for Cornwall theatre.   "
"Fantastic CITY CENTRE APARTMENT within a BEAUTIFUL GATED DEVELOPMENT set within SUPERB GROUNDS, just a stones throw away from the city centre with ALLOCATED PARKING. This spacious apartment is contemporary and boasts a LARGE DUAL ASPECT OPEN PLAN LIVING & DINING AREA, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 2 MOD..."
"COMING SOON ..... This four-bedroom terraced house is situated within the lovely Argray Court Mews development in the Cathedral City of Truro., tucked away in a traffic free location, only a short walk to the City centre. Featuring: * Under-floor heating * Gas com..."
"A beautiful character period Grade II listed family residence with many original features. Situated only a stone’s throw from the heart of the city centre. Offered for sale with no upward chain with stunning cathedral views. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance porch,..."
"FANCY LIVING A BIT CLOSER TO WORK, YET STILL HAVING PLENTY OF PARKING AND A QUIET SUN TRAP GARDEN TO ENJOY YOUR DAYS OFF IN THE SUN?  This home will work for you.  The layout has been opened up to provide a great entertaining space for friends and family too, what more could you want?....."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED modern home with 3 BEDROOMS, GENEROUS GARDEN, GARAGE NEXT TO THE PROPERTY ALONGE WITH DRIVEWAY PARKING which is a huge selling point on this development, in a GREAT POSITION on this POPULAR DEVELOPMENT, which is in a FANTASTIC LOCATION, CLOSE TO SCHOOLS, TOWN CENTRE & AMENI..."
 An attractive red brick middle terrace four bedroom townhouse conveniently located near to Truro mainline railway station. Two allocated off street parking spaces and enclosed low maintenance rear garden. 
"A luxurious 2 bedroomed, 2 bathroomed, second floor apartment overlooking Boscawen Street and Cathedral Lane, opposite the Hall for Cornwall theatre.   "
"A luxurious 2 bedroomed, 2 bathroomed, high ceilinged first floor apartment overlooking Boscawen Street, opposite the Hall for Cornwall theatre.   "
"Superbly extended, semi-detached family home within walking distance of Arch Bishop Benson Primary School and Penair Secondary School. The property offers spacious and versatile accommodation throughout and allows the buyers to create a home to their own tastes and preferences. Internal viewin..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached property is ideally located in close proximity to both the hospital and college. and has recently been updated by the owner throughout. Offering a living room, large open plan recently fitted kitchen/dining room, utility room and modern ground floor shower room. U..."
" A very high quality two double bedroom house new in 2020 and with the balance of the new build warranty. Excellent specification with Neff branded integrated appliances and Porcelanosa sanitaryware. Sunny enclosed garden, garage with electric door and parking space. Great location near Treliske..."
"A luxurious 2 bedroomed, 2 bathroomed, second floor apartment overlooking Boscawen Street, opposite the Hall for Cornwall theatre.   "
"A spacious and extremely well presented two bedroom ground floor, luxury retirement apartment catering for later living and an easy lifestyle. With a wooden front entrance door leading to the entrance hallway, which provides access to the living/dining room with a glazed door to the moder..."
"We are pleased to offer an immaculately presented three storey, three double bedroom townhouse on this sought after development on the fringes of Truro City Centre. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a light and airy hallway with the accommodation on the ground floor compri..."
"We are pleased to offer a modern 3-bedroom semi-detached house which is in the prime location for easy access to the City centre and Treliske Hospital. Throughout the property there are high standard finishes and offer versatile living space. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a spaci..."
 A classic period townhouse in need of some updating but with tremendous scope to create a fabulous city home. Configured over three floors plus an attic room. Garden.
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are pleased to be marketing this lovely two bedroom first floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property, conveniently located for the lift and stairs, offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. An add."
This first floor Kenwyn apartment enjoys a beautiful outlook and view towards the cathedral with far reaching views to Kenwyn and beyond. The spacious lounge with its windows and Juliet balcony and the windows of the kitchen/diner positioned along one wall make the most of this spectacular outloo...
"A spacious and light three bedroom family home situated in a sought after area and within walking distance to The Royal Cornwall Hospital, Duchy Hospital and Truro College. The property benefits from a large triple aspect living/dining room, a modern integrated kitchen, a conservatory, two off..."
****A Truly Wonderful Much Loved Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached Cottage To Include Many Fabulous Character Features. The Property is Situated Just A Short Walk From The Very Heart Of Our Special City Of Truro . Offering Three Bedrooms - Lounge - Kitchen - Separate Dining Room - Family Bathr...
A first floor two bedroomed flat in a stylish conversion just yards from the middle of Truro yet in a tucked away and traffic free location enjoying some of the finest views of Truro and the Cathedral! The building has been converted and in turn has created eighteen flats and four studios wh...
"This 'Cathedral' design apartment is located on the first floor and as its name suggests enjoys stunning views of the cathedral and the surrounding city from the open plan living space. The kitchen area boasts a 'Howdens' kitchen with integrated appliances to include fridge, freezer, dishwasher,..."
" ****Chain Free**** Fantastic opportunity to purchase one of the BEAUTIFUL RETIREMENT APARTMENTS within this STUNNING DEVELOPMENT, on the first floor for OVER 55’s, in a fantastic CITY CENTRE LOCATION enjoying the amenities & bus routes nearby. The..."
"Accommodation comprises of a garage and utility room to the ground floor. To the first floor there is the lounge/dining room and breakfast kitchen. The second floor has the two double bedrooms, an en-suite shower room to the main bedroom and a family bathroom. The property benefits from a gas cen..."
"Situated on the outskirts of Truro city centre is this spacious and well maintained top floor three bedroom apartment with stunning far reaching views. Located within 15 minutes walk of high street shops, cafés, M&S, Hall for Cornwall and many more amenities. The light and a..."
"****This is a fabulous Immaculately presented much loved three bedroom end terrace property situated in a wonderful and popular location**** This family home offers double glazing, gas fired central heating, a spacious entrance hallway, ground floor cloakroom, dual aspect living room with patio..."
"A spacious, well maintained two double bedroom town house. Offering superb sized accommodation and for sale with no upward chain. Situated on a popular residential development on the outskirts of Truro city centre 1 miles away where the city has an abundance of amenities on offer. "
"A spacious contemporary apartment in a central location within the Cathedral City of Truro. Entrance Hall. Open plan sitting/dining/kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom. Covered parking, communal gardens. EPC Band B, Council Tax Band C."
" A characterful three bedroom, two reception terraced city house located within easy access of the city centre, Truro mainline railway station and Victoria Gardens. Modern kitchen and bathroom, mains gas central heating, UPVC double glazing. Rear courtyard garden and outbuilding with potential."
" A truly beautifully presented character, two double bedroom stylish city home located a short level walk from the city centre and close to good schools including Truro School, Penair Secondary and Archbishop Benson and Tregolls Primary Schools. Refitted kitchen and recently installed wood burni..."
"Property Description: We are pleased to offer a fantastic opportunity to acquire a 3-bedroom end of terrace property just a stone’s throw away from the City Centre and schools within the area. Set in a tucked away setting, this property has a garage with off road parking for 3 cars and..."
"A spacious, well maintained character townhouse, with three bedrooms and found in the historic Yew Tree Court development. This Grade II listed property offers superb accommodation and is only five minutes walk from Waitrose Supermarket. Situated on the outskirts of Truro city centre o..."
"Situated only 10 minutes walk of Truro city centre. A spacious and well maintained three bedroom traditional terrace cottage. With convenient access for high street shops, cafés, M&S, Hall for Cornwall and many more amenities. Offered for sale with no upward chain. The gener..."
"VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE. A very well presented three bedroom semi detached house with garage, off road parking and enclosed rear patio garden in this fantastic location for the local schools, college and the hospital. This property offers a large kitchen/diner, spacious living room, three bedrooms a..."
"This modern two bedroom third floor apartment is located in this gated development very close to the city centre. The apartment enjoys floor to ceiling windows in many of the rooms making this apartment bright and airy. Two double bedrooms, one with its own large walk in wardrobe, modern bathroom..."
"We are pleased to offer this fully renovated 2-bedroom semi-detached bungalow which is a stone's throw away from Truro City Centre. Despite its close proximity to the city centre, this property benefits from a tucked away position which boasts privacy, peace and quiet. The living accommodation co..."
"Charming character three bedroom cottage which is located in the heart of Truro City. The cottage has been sympathetically renovated by the current vendors to include rewiring, new kitchen, carpets downstairs and full cosmetic renovations throughout. The deceptive accommodation briefly comprises:..."
" A purpose built three bedroom apartment with balcony. Benefit of a lift, communal gym facilities and garage parking. Wonderful cathedral views and open plan living space. Excellent central location."
COMING SOON .... This three-bedroom terraced house is situated within the lovely Argray Court Mews development in the Cathedral City of Truro and tucked away in a traffic free location and only a short walk to the City centre. Featuring a high specification including: ...
 A characterful city centre three bedroom end of terrace townhouse with rear courtyard garden. On street parking permit zone. Ideal investment or first buy. NO ONWARD CHAIN
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom 4th floor apartment, which offers wonderful room proportions, a fabulous view over Truro and the Cathedral and neutral decor throughout. The Lounge is a particular feature of the property due to its size an..."
" A very spacious two double bedroom end of terrace house built in 2014 by Taylor Wimpey and having the balance of the 10 year NHBC warranty. The property has a superb conservatory, low maintenance sunny garden and two off street parking spaces. Great location within walking distance of The Royal..."
"A deceptively spacious and one of the largest in the block, two bedroom first floor apartment located on the edge of Truro on the highly regarded Trevethow Riel development near Waitrose and The Great Cornish Food Store. With the balance of the new build warranty from 2020. Communal ha..."
"Spacious detached bungalow offered onto the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN, two bedrooms, situated within this quiet traffic free location. The bungalow has double glazing and Electric heating. The internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance hallway, living room with gas coal effect fire, tw..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market a fantastic opportunity to purchase a well presented 2-bedroom end of terrace house which is in close proximity to the Royal Cornwall Hospital. As you approach the property, you will notice that it is in a highly desirable and well maintained development. As ..."
 A three bedroom family home with a superb large rear garden with workshop/outbuilding. Gas central heating. wonderful views to the rear.
"An opportunity to purchase this well presented two bedroomed mid-terraced house, just five years old and conveniently located on the outskirts of Truro. The property has an open planned kitchen/lounge/diner with doors opening to the rear garden. The kitchen has been upgraded and has breakfast ..."
"WELL PRESENTED modern home with 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, ENCLOSED LEVEL GARDEN & PARKING in a FANTASTIC LOCATION, CLOSE TO SCHOOLS, TOWN CENTRE & AMENITIES. The property offers the very best of modern living with modern open-plan living, kitchen & bathroom. ** The property was constructed in..."
Property Description: A unique and beautifully presented penthouse apartment which overlooks the City of Truro as well as being a short walk to the centre. This property benefits from its own hallway leading up a spacious staircase into an open plan dining room/living room with kitchen. This...
"** A FANTASTIC INVESTMEMT OPPORTUNITY THAT IS END OF CHAIN ** We are pleased to offer to the market a fantastic opportunity to purchase a sizeable terraced property which is end of chain and overlooks the attractive Malpas River. As you approach the property, there is a private sun ter..."
"Property Description: We are pleased to offer to the market a fantastic opportunity to purchase a semi-detached 2-bedroom bungalow in a sought after area within Truro City Centre. As you approach the property, there is a garage as well as driveway parking along with a mature front garden. As..."
 A very well presented two double bedroom luxury second floor retirement apartment in a purpose built McCarthy Stone development for the over 60s.
" A period THREE BEDROOM townhouse in an attractive side street yet very close to the heart of the city. Open plan kitchen/dining room, living room with feature fireplace. Modern shower room. Close to gorgeous gardens/parks and level stroll into the city centre."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this stunning one bedroom second floor apartment with Juliet Balcony. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in fantastic order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and di...
*Spacious modern ground floor apartment*Two double bedrooms*Private enclosed courtyard position*Prime city centre location*Remainder of 999 year lease*Modern open plan living spaces*High quality wet room*Permit Parking to the rear*
Property Solutions Group are pleased to present to the market this Three-bedroom end of terrace House located in sought-after Truro. 
"Property description: We are pleased to offer this end of terrace 2-bedroom property which is placed in a great spot within this estate on the fringes of Truro City Centre. To the front of the property, you have landscaped and pebbled tiers with off road parking for one car. As you enter the..."
"Situated in a tucked away location in the heart of Truro City is this spacious ground floor two bedroom retirement flat for over 60’s, within minutes walk of high street shops and cafés, M&S, Hall for Cornwall, taxis and buses. The accommodation comprises of an entranc..."
"ICONIC and STRIKING grade 2 listed residence, 1 Bedroom, GROUND-FLOOR APARTMENT, Expansive, bright and airy lounge/diner, Prime CENTRAL CITY, SOUGHT-AFTER location, NO ONWARD CHAIN, Beautifully decorated throughout, Fantastic living space, 71SQM!!!!! Freehold shared by the owners of the apartments."
"A spacious two bedroom middle terrace house ideal for first time buyers or as an investment opportunity. Offered for sale with no upward chain. The property is situated in a popular location on the outskirts of Truro city centre. With convenient access to the city centre, train station and the A3..."
"TWO BEDROOM TERRACED PROPERTY SOLD WITH NO CHAIN This two bedroom terraced property is situated in a convenient location close to the city centre, hospital and train station. The accommodation includes; sitting room, kitchen/dining room, rear porch, two bedrooms and a family bat..."
"ATTENTION INVESTMENT BUYERS Three 2 bedroomed apartments, currently each let on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy, situated in a desirable central location with guaranteed fixed tenancy generating £18,000 income per annum (for management contract period). "
"Property Description: We are pleased to offer to the market a 2 double bedroom town centre cottage which is in walking distance to the centre as well as a stone’s throw from the train station, offering fantastic transport links. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a large l..."
"Property Description We are pleased to offer a fantastic opportunity to purchase a fully refurbished 2-bedroom terraced property on the fringes of Truro City Centre. As you enter the property via the separate porch, you are welcomed by a good size living room which then leads into a separate..."
"*** CASH OFFERS *** A well presented and spacious two bedroom upper floor apartment within walking distance of Truro city centre. Accommodation comprises of communal entrance hall providing access to the property, which has a hallway, lounge/dining room with balcony large ..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market a 2-bedroom maisonette which is only a stone’s throw away from the city centre and has unrealised promise. As you enter your private entrance, there is a large cupboard which is ideal for storage. Up the spacious staircase, you are welcomed by a large..."
"Property description: A lovely 2-bedroom end of terrace bungalow which offers great living space throughout! As you enter the property, there is a light hall way that leads to the spacious living room with an open fire that can be reinstated or perfect for a log burner. There is a sep..."
"HUS ESTATE AGENTS: An extremely well presented and modern two double bedroom, second floor apartment located in the heart of the city centre, being sold with no onward chain and benefiting from a garage. The property offers spacious accommodation with an open plan kitchen / lounge / dining roo..."
" A spacious two bedroom first floor flat with panoramic views of Truro city centre. Offered for sale with no onward chain. Accommodation comprises of its own ground floor entrance hall. To the first floor there is a landing/hallway, lounge/dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms ..."
" CASH BUYERS ONLY are sought for this four bedroom middle terrace Cornish unit, front and rear gardens and parking. The property will interest those looking for a renovation project in a great location near to Archbishop Benson Primary School."
A purpose built two bedroom first floor apartment ideally located only 10 minutes walk from Truro city centre. For sale with no upward chain. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Accommodation comprises of lounge/dinin...
"Offered onto the market with no onward chain, this city centre two bedroomed cottage would benefit from updating and modernisation. The internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hallway, living room with feature fireplace, kitchen with a range of base and wall units, electric oven and ..."
MIDDLE TERRACED RETIREMENT COTTAGE A beautifully presented property situated in a purpose built complex on the edge of Truro city centre with a bus stop close at hand. The cottage offers independent living with the peace of mind of an onsite manager and 24 hour emergency call s...
"We are pleased to offer this wonderful 2-bedroom cottage this is in the centre of Truro City. The cottage is typically Victorian with character still remaining and is the perfect property to still put your own stamp on. As you enter the property, you have a separate living room which could easily..."
MIDDLE TERRACED RETIREMENT COTTAGE Situated in a purpose built complex on the edge of Truro city centre with a bus stop close by. The cottage offers independent living with the peace of mind of an onsite manager and 24 hour emergency call system. There is ample parking...
"Located in Truro City, in a quiet and peaceful area is this hidden gem of a property. This one bedroom first floor apartment is offered to the market with no onward chain. The property comprises of a shared entrance hallway with stairs leading up to the front entrance door. There is a generous si..."
"COMING SOON ..... Situated in the lovely Argray Court mews development, this 2 double bedroom first floor apartment is tucked away in a traffic free location just a short walk to the City centre. Features include: * Private entrance, hallway and stairs * Spacious o..."
"Property Description: We are pleased to offer to the market a spacious 2 double bedroom upper floor apartment in a sought after area within Truro City Centre. As you enter the property, there is a spacious hallway which has a generous size storage cupboard. This then leads onto a fantastic s..."
"TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT SOLD WITH NO CHAIN This beautifully presented two bedroom apartment is situated in the heart of Truro City centre and within walking distance of the train station. In all, accommodation comprising entrance hall, open plan living area, two bedrooms and a bat..."
 A spacious two double bedroom purpose built apartment in a great location. Parking. Recently redecorated. Chain free. 
"A well presented spacious first floor one bedroom retirement apartment on the outskirts of Truro city centre. This apartment comes complete with a 24 hour emergency care line system. Comprises of entrance hall, good sized lounge/dining room, well equipped kitchen, bedroom and shower room. With do..."
" INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY, with tenant in situ. This is a two bedroom purpose built flat in a sought after location. In brief the property comprises of two bedrooms, bathroom open plan lounge / Kitchen. There is an allocated parking space to the front."
"A well presented first floor apartment in a City centre location. Hallway, private balcony, sitting/dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom. Resident parking. EPC Band A."
".*****GUIDE PRICE £180,000 CASH BUYERS ONLY - THIS IS A MUCH LOVED FAMILY HOME - THE PROPERTY IS SITUATED IN A POULAR LOCATION WITHIN EASY REACH TO TRURO CITY CENTER - THE PROPERTY MUST BE VIEWED TO AVOID DISAPOINTMENT IN THE CURRENT STRONG MARKETPLACE***** The property briefly comprises of en..."
" With a large garden, garage and parking, this three bedroom city home is available without any onward chain. "
"ATTENTION INVESTMENT BUYERS Two 1 bedroomed ground floor apartments, each currently let on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy, situated in a desirable central location with guaranteed fixed tenancy generating £10,200 income per annum (for management contract period). "
"COMING SOON ..... Situated in the lovely Argray Court mews development, this 2 double bedroom ground floor apartment is tucked away in a traffic free location just a short walk to the City centre. Features include: * Private entrance * Open plan living area with ..."
Bradleys are delighted to offer to the market with 100% ownership this beautifully presented and well-proportioned one bedroom first floor apartment. Located on the periphery of the village of Threemilestone and enjoying far reaching views to the south over open countryside. The property would...
"We are delighted to offer this well-presented 2 bedroom retirement property which has lots of potential. This property is located within a stone’s throw of the City Centre of Truro. As you enter the property, you are welcomed into a light living room which has an electric fire with a WC at ..."
" A purpose built two bedroom terraced house designed specifically for the over 55s. Residents' lounge, communal laundry, guest suite, house manager, parking, pull cord system. Great city location, ideal retirement property."
"ATTENTION INVESTMENT BUYERS Two 1 bedroomed ground floor apartments, currently each let on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy, situated in a desirable location with guaranteed fixed tenancy generating £10,200 income per annum (for management contract period). "
" A three bedroom mid-terrace house with large level rear garden conveniently located for primary and secondary schools, access to Truro City and rural walks. "
"A one bedroom, second floor retirement apartment, within this Retirement Living development with PLEASANT VIEWS."
" A spacious two bedroom ground floor waterside flat for the over 55s with river views, located in the centre of Truro NO ONWARD CHAIN. Level walk to shops, theatre, supermarkets, cafes and restaurants."
A spacious TWO bedroomed first floor retirement apartment located within the Heart of Truro City. This lovely apartment has a communal entrance hallway leads to the lift which access all the floors in addition to separate access. The apartment has a hallway with doors leading to the good size liv...
 CASH BUYERS ONLY - A two bedroom semi detached house with front and rear garden. The property has Mundic block and is therefore unsuitable for mortgage. Ideal investment property. Convenient city location.
"First floor retirement apartment with fantastic views from the Juliet balcony situated in the heart of the city centre. One double bedroom, lounge/dining room, fitted kitchen, bathroom, internal lift, communal lounge, laundry room, 24 hour alarm, secure entry system, parking, NO CHAIN."
We are pleased to offer a 1 bedroom ground floor retirement apartment in the heart of Truro City Centre. This property is ideally located and is a stone’s throw away from all the amenities that Truro has to offer. The property itself has a shared access which is only with this property and ...
" A spacious purpose built one bedroom flat in a favoured complex for the over 55s close to the centre of Truro. The property has a garage and there is a residents' lounge, laundry, guest suite, residents' parking and house manager."
" A spacious two bedroom 2nd floor flat located in a highly regarded purpose built development for the over 55s. There's a lift to all floors, a house manager, residents' lounge, guest suite, laundry, shared courtyard garden and residents' parking. Ideal city centre location."
"*** FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN *** Situated just outside of the city centre is this spacious first floor one bedroom retirement apartment. The apartment comprises of a communal entrance hall with stairs and a lift leading to the entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen, bedroom with fitt..."
" A well presented first floor retirement apartment in the heart of the city centre. One double bedroom, lounge/dining room, fitted kitchen, bathroom internal lift, communal lounge and cathedral views."
"BUILDING PLOT WITH PANNING PERMISSION FOR A TWO BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE Situated just off Malpas Road between the city and Boscawen Park. Planning permission has been granted for a house with a lounge, kitchen diner and W.C on the ground floor, with two double bedrooms and family bathroom..."
"*Guide Price: £75,000 - £100,000. Public Auction : Wednesday, 05 April 2023 at , Virtual Livestream Online Auction GET READY TO BID BY VISITING THE AUCTIONEERS WEBSITE GUIDE PRICES & RESERVE PRICES Guide Price
An indication of the seller’s current minimum acceptable price..."
A vacant two bedroom first floor purpose built flat situated in a well established residential area overlooking the communal green and with pleasant views to the rear of the property. Whilst in need of refurbishment throughout the property is likely to appeal as a post works reside...
UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY A rare opportunity to purchase and develop a former Old Store in the city of Truro with planning permission granted to create a one bedroom dwelling.
"Located in the popular area of Alverthorpe, this spacious detached property offers a great family home which is ready to move in. The property offers entrnace hall, cloakroom with sink (option for wc to be reinstated), sitting room/office , open plan lounge leading to dining room, conservatory a..."
"We welcome to the market this generous Victorian detached family home, this beautiful property offers spacious living accommodation throughout, spanning three floors. The current owners have lovingly restored the property to its former glory and the results are breath-taking blending significant ..."
"Found tucked away down a private gated drive as part of this exclusive five property development this beautifully presented, spacious, modern, five double bedroom detached family home. "
"**A 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME**HIGH SPEC FINISH THROUGHOUT**2 EN-SUITES and HOUSE BATHROOM**GATED DRIVEWAY**SEPARATE ANNEXE**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Fresh to the market for the larger family to purchase is this unique four bedroom detached home that has an outbuilding with kitchen and w.c., giving a wor..."
A stunning DETACHED four bedroom family home offering SUPREMELY SPACIOUS accommodation set in enviable private gardens on a plot that extends to 0.64 acres (0.26 hectares) in this sought after location on the fringe of the city. EPC rating E46
"Guide Price: £750,000 - £775,000. A popular and sought after location on a tree-lined avenue. Viewings highly recommended to appreciate the size and specification of this home. Excellent catchment area for schools, motorways and city centre."
"Offered to the open market, with no onward chain, is this extremely spacious and characterful six-bedroom family home. The property is in the heart of one of Wakefield's most sought-after locales, St. Johns, with outstanding schools, including Queen Elizabeth's Grammar School and Wakefield Girls&..."
A rare opportunity to acquire a unique substantial detached home set within approximately 0.5 acre of mature private gardens in this sought after avenue north of the city centre. Built in the 1950’s this family home is now available to pass on to a new generation. Edgeworth would benefit from som...
A truly unique opportunity to acquire a stunning period town house presented to the highest standards throughout which also has the benefit of its own completely self contained two bedroom duplex city loft. Ideal for buyers looking for private accommodation for extended family. No chain and viewi...
"A deceptively spacious FOUR BEDROOM dormer bungalow style property tucked away in a back water position on a GOOD SIZE PLOT in this highly sought after area. Presented to an unusually high standard, this is a beautifully kept property. EPC rating C69"
"**GUIDE PRICE £625,000 - £650,000** Standing proudly in this very much sought after location is this FIVE BEDROOM, three en suite detached self built FAMILY HOME. EPC rating B85"
Occupying a truly outstanding position opposite SANDAL CASTLE is the significantly EXTENDED semi detached home which offers tastefully presented and well appointed FOUR BEDROOM living accommodation. Viewing is strongly recommended. 
**LARGE EXECUTIVE DETACHED** **OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM** **HIGH QUALITY KITCHEN WITH ISLAND UNIT** **FULL MASTER SUITE** **2 EN SUITE SHOWER ROOMS** ** CUL DE SAC POSITION** **LANDSCAPED GARDEN** **DRIVE & DOUBLE GARAGE** **EXCELLENT LOCAL AMENITIES & TRANSPORT LINKS** This beaut...
"***SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Substantial four bed detached family home with two reception rooms, modern kitchen diner, sun room, separate garage, well maintained gardens and master suite with dressing area and ensuite."
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this well presented detached family home offering extensive accommodation over three levels. Situated in this ever popular and sought after location of Sandal, south of Wakefield city centre."
"Enjoying a superb cul-de-sac setting on a recent development by Charles Church Homes, this magnificent detached house is brick built, over THREE FLOORS and boasts a LUXURY SPECIFICATION. Single story rear extension for a second sitting room, gas central heating with two boilers and independent re..."
"Situated in the heart of the cosmopolitan city of Wakefield, this beautiful 4 bedroom property is perfect for families and professionals alike. This stunning home really does command your attention at first sight and sits in a fabulous position The property while incredibly in keeping with its tr..."
"Guide Price: £525,000 - £550,000. Deceptively spacious 5 Bedroom architect designed Detached True Bungalow set within a popular residential area well placed to benefit from a range of amenities on offer. Shower Room and Family Bathroom. Double Garage. NO UPPER CHAIN."
"Located on a MODERN and ATTRACTIVE development is this well appointed four bedroom detached family home benefitting from four good sized bedrooms, open plan kitchen/dining room and ATTRACTIVE LAWNED GARDENS. EPC rating B84."
Manning Stainton are please to present to market this four bedroom detached home situated in Wakefield. The property is well proportioned and spacious throughout and has a private garden with views to the rear. Harrison Close is placed well for commuting having good links to the M1 motorway and W...
"The Marylebone has a spacious open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room with French doors opening onto the garden. This detached five-bedroom, two-bathroom family home has separate living and dining rooms, a utility room, a downstairs WC and built-in storage. Bedroom five could become a home office."
"A main road position is this FOUR BEDROOM detached house located on a larger than average plot with LANDSCAPED rear garden. Benefiting from four good size bedrooms, modern house bathroom, three reception rooms and bespoke kitchen. EPC rating D56"
"Reeds Rains Wakefield are incredibly proud to bring to the market this detached home set over three floors in the village of Wrenthorpe. Internally this home briefly comprises of: Lower Ground Floor - Living room, bedroom, utility/kitchenette and shower room. Firs..."
Located in the most convenient area of Wakefield. Still within its NHBC certificate. Good local amenities. Integral Garage. The master bedroom has en-suite. Solar Panels. There are gardens to the front and rear. Viewing is strongly recommended to appreciate what this property has to offer.
"Situated in Wakefield is this four-bedroom detached property that benefits from an en-suite to bedroom one, a dressing room, two reception rooms, a detached garage, driveway parking, and a rear garden.   Offering spacious and versatile accommodation throughout is this attractive..."
"***REDUCED *** MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! LOVELY 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED, gas central heating, double glazing, MODERN KITCHEN DINER, utility roo..."
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £150,000 plus reservation fee. Subject to an undisclosed reserve price. This spacious THREE BEDROOM end town house. UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. This property is for sale by West Yorkshire Property Auction powered by iams..."
"THE GANTON AT THE GRANGE! Set over three floors this stunning 5 bedroom home is perfect for those with a growing family. The ground floor features a light, bright lounge, an open plan kitchen / diner with bi-fold doors leading to the rear garden."
"THE MERION has a wonderful open plan kitchen/diner with central island, integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading to the garden. There is a spacious lounge and a separate, handy utility. Upstairs are 4 double bedrooms with dressing area and ensuite to the master."
"The Harley has four bedrooms and an integral garage. The kitchen/dining/family room has two sets of French doors leading into the garden and there’s a separate living room, a utility room, a downstairs WC and storage on both floors. A study has been included in the spacious first-floor layout."
"For sale on 30 March 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00."
A deceptively SPACIOUS detached family home offering four bedroom accommodation in this highly sought after area with an unusually LARGE garden to the rear EXTENDING in total to around 0.29 acres (0.12 hectares). EPC rating D57.
An impressive family home located on an elevated cul-de-sac position. Beautifully presented throughout. Deceptively spacious. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate.
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this superbly extended and re-furbished detached family home occupying a central position in the heart of Wrenthorpe Village, north of Wakefield City Centre and conveniently located within easy reach of excellent amenities. PART EXCHANGE CONSIDERED."
A most impressive double fronted period town house which provides accommodation presented to the highest of standards throughout and must be viewed internally if the quality of the accommodation and attention to detail are to be fully appreciated. Located within a superb and most sought after po...
"THE PINEHURST features a stunning open plan kitchen / diner complete with bi-folding doors leading to the garden, large lounge. 4 double bedrooms, en-suite and 4 piece bathroom complete this perfect family home."
"Situated on this sought after cul-de-sac is this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED and EXTENDED four bedroom detached property benefitting from FOUR RECEPTION ROOMS, driveway parking, rear gardens. EPC rating C69."
Manning Stainton are excited to offer this beautiful property to the market situated on the sought after Redrow development in the village of Wrenthorpe. This 4 bed detached property was built in 2016 so is modern and has spacious rooms throughout. The property also benefits from a south west fac...
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this four bedroom detached family home situated in the village of Wrenthorpe. The property is located on a sought after Redrow development which are well known to be beautiful properties with plenty of character. The property is spacious throughou...
The Hamilton is a stunning 4 bedroom detached home and even has the added benefits of a South East facing garden and situated on a corner plot.
"Situated on this popular City Fields modern development is this Redrow home which has FOUR BEDROOMS benefitting from driveway parking, garage and BEAUTIFUL REAR GARDENS. EPC rating B85."
"LAST TWO HOMES remaining at our extremely popular City Fields development from Countryside. Don't miss your opportunity, contact us today to arrange your appointment. "
"Our stunning Avoncliffe is a four bed home that truly offers the ultimate combination of communal, family living with a private space for everyone."
"**A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME**LOCATED ON A MODERN AVANT DEVELOPMENT**LARGE LOUNGE and SNUG/HOME OFFICE**HIGH SPEC KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with BI-FOLDING DOORS**A STUNNING FAMILY HOME** On the ground floor there is an entrance hall with access to the large lounge, snug/home offi..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this exquisite 4 double bedroom detached family home situated within a highly sought after new development built by David Wilson Homes with fantastic commuting links. Do not delay, arrange your viewing TODAY on ."
"'ASHLEIGH' is a beautiful, large period property that still maintains many of its original character features. A deceptively large, four-level Semi Detached house with two reception rooms and five large bedrooms. The property is suitable for the professional couple or established fam..."
"Simply a fantastic home for the growing family, originally built by Redrow and offering CONTEMPORARY accommodation throughout. This FOUR BEDROOM detached house benefits from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating throughout. EPC Rating B83"
This attractive 4 bedroom detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. ...
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this extended four bedroom detached family home occupying an enviable and popular cul de sac position just off Bradford Road on the outskirts of the city centre, convenient for local schools and amenities. Occupying a generous corner plot."
"Offered with no onward chain, this extremely spacious five bedroom extended family house, the property occupies an extensive plot, offers excellent access to Wakefield City Centre as well as local schools and commuter links."
"** GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £435,000 ** Situated on this modern development close to Wakefield city centre is this SUPERBLY PRESENTED four bedroom detached property benefitting from en suite facilities, driveway parking and REAR GARDENS. EPC rating B83."
Our luxurious four bedroom home combines the versatility of open plan living with the privacy of individual rooms. It's a home designed so that everyone can enjoy their own personal space.
"Guide Price: £415,000 - £440,000. A deceptively spacious period property finished to a high standard. Retaining its character and original features with a modern twist. Great location to Sandal and Agbrigg train station, motorway links, schooling and amenities."
"Found in this highly sought after residential development within Wrenthrorpe this beautifully presented four bedroom detached family home, the property is ideally located to offer excellent access to local schools as well as Wakefield City centre and commuter links including the M1 and M62 motorw..."
This beautifully presented 4-bedroom detached home is situated in the sought-after location of Wakefield. Upstairs boasts four spacious bedrooms with the master & second bedroom also featuring an en-suite. The home features both a downstairs W/C and a modern family bathroom. Downstairs b...
"The Ridgewood a stunning 4 bedroom home is the perfect place for any family to grow, with a beautiful open plan kitchen / diner leading through sleek bi-fold doors to the garden. Upstairs 4 double bedrooms and a family bathroom complete the first floor."
A large four bedroom home with a feature bay window and open-plan kitchen dining area.
"Situated on the popular Kingsbury Meadows development this five bedroom detached family home offers great position close to a wide range of shops, schools and transport links. No Onward Chain. The property is completed to a high standard throughout."
"The Stoneham features an open plan kitchen/diner with breakfast bar and bi-folding doors leading to the rear garden and separate lounge and study, both with bay windows. Upstairs are 4 double bedrooms with en-suite to the master and a family bathroom."
"The four bedroom Kingham is an ideal family home, with generous rooms, a practical layout and integral garage."
"The Strand is a four-bedroom family home that includes an integral garage. There’s an open-plan kitchen/dining/family room with French doors, a separate living room and a downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs, there are four bedrooms, a home office or nursery and a bathroom. The master bedroom is en-suite."
"Beautiful four bedroom detached family house featuring open plan kitchen/diner/family room, primary bedroom with en-suite, this property will be extremely popular with the size and overall space it has to offer."
"**A 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME**EXTENDED FAMILY ROOM**HIGH SPEC KITCHEN/DINING ROOM**DOUB:E GARAGE**GATED DRIVEWAY**IDEAL FAMILY HOME** Comprising of on the ground floor an entrance hall with access to the lounge, kitchen/dining room and stairs leading to the 1st floor. From the kitchen/dining room..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 to £415,000*** Offering a wealth of character throughout and enjoying a TUCKED AWAY position, set back from the main roadside is this superbly appointed and charming THREE BEDROOM detached home. Having being RENOVATED THROUGHOUT, the property benefits from UPVC double glaz..."
"This beautifully presented, spacious well proportioned four double bedroom detached family house, the property is ideally situated to offer excellent access to local schools as well as commuter links including motorways and Wakefield train station"
"Guide Price: £400,000 - £425,000. Gardens to both front and rear and an integral garage. Perfectly situated for access to the City Centre, Wakefield/Westgate railway station and schools to include QEGS and Wakefield Girls High."
**** BUILD COMPLETE *** *Executive four-bedroom detached family home sympathetically styled with a modern approach to the adjacent covered landmark building (The Crown - 251 & 253)The development benefits from excellent commuter links to Wakefield and Leeds City Centres.
"Movenowproperties are pleased to offer this spacious 4 bedroom, detached family home for sale. Benefiting from solar panels, 2 Bathrooms, 2 Reception rooms, Integral Garage and attractive gardens to front side and rear. Located in a popular location with lots of local amenities. "
"With features including FRENCH DOORS off the kitchen / diner / family room, a FEATURE BAY WINDOW in the lounge, a SEPARATE LAUNDRY ROOM, a DOWNSTAIRS WC, EN-SUITE TO TWO OF THE BEDROOMS, a DRESSING AREA in principal bedroom, a FOUR-PIECE FAMILY BATHROOM, an INTEGRAL GARAGE, a 10-YEAR NHBC WARRANT..."
"Renovated to a high standard with a fine touch is this detached family home benefiting from four good size bedrooms, the main bedroom having a walk in dressing area and a modern en suite bathroom/w.c., bespoke house shower room/w.c. and solid oak doors. EPC rating D68."
"Elegant detached family home in the heart of St John's, attractive mature gardens that envelope the property. To the exterior the property has stunning mature gardens with off road parking and garage. Excellent schools and commuting links."
A well proportioned four bedroom home with integral garage and open plan kitchen diner.
"Enjoying a cul-de-sac location is this TWO BEDROOM detached true bungalow, which benefits from two double bedrooms, a modern wet room/w.c, spacious lounge diner, front and rear GARADENS, UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating D58"
"Guide Price: £385,000 - £400,000. William H Brown are pleased to market this modern and spacious four bedroom detached family home. Study/Office. Driveway and Detached Garage. Located close to Pinderfields hospital. No Onward Chain."
*** EXECUTVE STYLE DETACHED FAMILY HOME with GROUND FLOOR EXTENSION *** FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS *** THREE RECEPTION ROOMS & IMPRESSIVE KITCHEN *** GARDEN WITH VIEWS ONTO GOLF COURSE *** IDEALLY SUIT A GROWING FAMILY ***
"***GUIDE PRICE £380,000 - £390,000*** - Integral Garage - Off street parking - Large Detached family home - Modern kitchen family room - Four bedrooms - Large garden - Great Location"
"Guide Price: £380,000 - £400,000. A modern and attractive 4 Bedroom Detached Family Home built by Bellway Homes and still within its NHBC Certificate. No Onward Chain. Located close to Pinderfields hospital. Close proximity to Wakefield city centre and motorway links."
"GUIDE PRICE £380,000 TO £390,000 STUNNING 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH ALL A GROWING FAMILY COULD ASK FOR! PRESENTED TO A HIGH STANDARD THROUGHOUT, SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC OF A SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL ESTATE IN STANLEY WITH EXCELLENT COMMUTER LINKS, SCHOOLS AND AMENITIES!"
"**NEW PRICE & NO CHAIN** Situated in Stanley is this superbly presented FOUR BEDROOM detached property, benefitting from driveway parking, REAR GARDENS, four bedrooms and two bathrooms/w.c. EPC rating D61."
"Occupying a corner plot position is this stunning, contemporary and executive detached family home with accommodation extending towards 1200 sq ft. Benefiting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating C70"
"Five bed detached home benefitting from beautiful kitchen diner, three bathrooms, utility area and off-road parking ."
A 4 Bedroom Detached Family Home situated on a corner plot in the popular area of Wrenthorpe. Detached Garage and off road parking. Good motorway links and transport links. Viewing recommended.
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this superbly presented detached true bungalow occupying a generous garden plot at the head of the cul de sac.
"Located in the popular village of Wrenthorpe in a cul-de-sac location. This spacious 5 bed detached property offers a great family home with enclosed garden. The property offers entrance hall, spacious lounge, extended kitchen/diner, utility room, w/c and bedroom 5 with en-suite. To the first ..."
"Detached five double bedroom property, two reception rooms, separate utility, master bedroom with en-suite and large garage."
A lovely three bedroom TRADITIONAL DETACHED house set on a GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED plot in this sought after area within very each reach of local facilities. EPC rating E41.
"Guide Price: £365,000 - £385,000. A fantastic opportunity to acquire an attractively priced executive family home. Gardens, integral garage and driveway providing parking for two cars. Would ideally suit the growing family or executive. Well positioned on The Mount. Viewing highly recommended."
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this four bedroom detached home situated in Wakefield. The property was built by Rouse Homes in 2021 and is finished to a high specification. It is located on a cul-de-sac position and gives good access to the M1 motorway and Wakefield city centre.
"Manning Stainton are delighted to present to market this four bed detached home situated in Wakefield. The property is on a corner plot and is well presented and well maintained throughout, it has an open plan kitchen/dining living area, a separate lounge and four double bedrooms."
Superbly appointed throughout is this STUNNING THREE BEDROOM detached family home benefitting UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating C75.
Enjoying a TUCKED AWAY position within this modern development is this four bedroom detached home ideal for the growing family benefitting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. Awaiting EPC rating.
"With features including FRENCH DOORS off the kitchen / family room, a FEATURE BAY WINDOW in the lounge, a SEPARATE LAUNDRY ROOM, a DOWNSTAIRS WC, a master bedroom with a DRESSING AREA and EN-SUITE, an INTEGRAL GARAGE, a 10-YEAR NHBC WARRANTY included and the ability to PRE-RESERVE ONLINE, this fa..."
This attractive 3 bedroom detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet street in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. Th...
"Located in the popular area of St John's, this spacious Victorian 5 bed town house offers a great family home with lots of original features, no chain and within walking distance to the town centre. The property offers entrance hall, Spacious through lounge, large kitchen/diner, utility room wit..."
Offering spacious and versatile accommodation throughout and enjoying a two storey EXTENSION to the side is this attractive and well appointed four bedroom detached family home with NO CHAIN INVOLVED benefitting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating throughout. EPC rating C71.
"Situated in Newton Hill is this SUPERBLY PRESENTED two bedroom mid terrace home benefitting from well proportioned rooms and an ATTRACTIVE and enclosed rear garden, ideal for the first time buyer or professional couple. EPC rating D67."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £350,000 - £370,000*"
"Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this extended three bedroom detached home, the property is modern and well presented throughout, it benefits from spacious accommodation through-out, having a separate lounge and an open plan kitchen, living area. The property is tucked away on a..."
"Situated on this modern development at City Fields is this superbly presented FOUR BEDROOM detached property with driveway parking, rear garden and OPEN PLAN DOWNSTAIRS LIVING.. EPC rating B83"
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom detached home situated at City Fields on the outskirts of Wakefield city centre. The property is very well looked after and well-presented through-out. It would make a fabulous family home and is situated in a fabulous spot for ...
"Located in the popular area of Wrenthorpe in a cul-de-sac location. The spacious 4 bed detached with garage offers entrance hall, lounge , spacious kitchen/diner, w/c, conservatory and integral garage. To the first floor are 4 x bedrooms ( 2 x double bedrooms with main bedroom having en-suite a..."
"Guide Price: £340,000 - £350,000. A 4 Bedroom Detached Family Home situated on a corner plot within the sought after City Fields development. Within easy reach of Pinderfields Hospital, Wakefield city centre, local amenities and schools - Not to be Missed!"
"Movenowproperties are delighted to offer this 4 bedroom Semi Detached property for sale. Having 4 good sized bedrooms, 3 bathrooms, kitchen / diner with patio doors opening to enclosed rear garden. Must be viewed to be appreciated. "
"Situated in this sought after road in Wakefield is this three reception, three bedroom, three bathrooms EXTENDED semi detached home benefitting from an ENCLOSED rear mature garden, ideal for the growing family. Awaiting EPC rating."
"The Longwood is perfect for all those who are needing a little more room for family life. The stylish living / diner looks over the garden, A sleek FULLY INTEGRATED kitchen sits to the front of the home and upstairs sees 3 double bedrooms."
"Reeds Rains Wakefield is proud to bring to the market this modern detached home located within a mile of J40 of the M1 as well as within a mile of Wakefield City Centre. Internally this home briefly comprises of: entrance hall, living room, kitchen, utility room, downstairs WC, garage,..."
"Located in the snow hill area of Wakefield , on a new build estate. This spacious 4 bed detached offers a great family home which is only a few years old. The property offers entrance hall, lounge, kitche/dining, utility room, w/c. To the first floor are 4 x double bedrooms with main bedroom h..."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Wakefield.
"A superb example of a beautifully presented and charming four bedroom detached family home with a private driveway.  The current decor creates a homely feel upon entering the property and throughout. Offering spacious family accommodation  Arranged over two floors, th..."
"NO CHAIN. A substantial property, situated on a large end plot, within the popular village of Wrenthorpe. Great schools, commuter links and with potential to add significant value to the property. Viewings are highly recommended! REF: LCLG"
"A superbly presented THREE BEDROOM detached house benefiting from a MODERN BATHROOM/W.C., the main bedroom boasts fitted wardrobe and superb EN SUITE shower room/w.c., off road parking, integral single GARAGE and a living room enjoying French doors that open on to the enclosed rear garden. EP..."
"With three bedrooms, the Kingdale is perfect for anyone looking for a little extra space."
"*LAST ONE REMAINING* Deceptive from the main roadside and EXTERNALLY FINISHED is this spacious three bedroom detached family home. Internally the property is incomplete, however, this gives the discerning buyer to CHOOSE THEIR OWN kitchen and bathroom suites for a LIMITED TIME ONLY. EPC rati..."
"***REDUCED TO £325,000 MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK LOVELY 5 BEDROOM MID TOWNHOUSE PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT, modern kitchen diner, living room, downstair..."
"A Three Bedroom Detached on a corner plot situated within the sought after location of the City Fields development. The property is bright, airy and spacious throughout. Within easy reach of Pinderfields hospital, Wakefield city centre, local amenities and schools. Not to be Missed!"
"A four bedroom semi detached in a fantastic location. With FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS and a spacious driveway for several cars aswell as rear garden and garage. RECENTLY EXTENDED and still has plenty of potential to add further and put ones own personal touch on it. EPC rating E51"
"Situated on this modern development close to Wakefield city centre is this SUPERBLY PRESENTED three bedroom detached property benefitting from driveway parking, detached garage and rear gardens. EPC rating B81."
"Guide Price: £325,000 - £350,000. The outside there is a well maintained and enclosed south facing rear garden which holds a great deal of privacy. Rear garden and off road parking. NO UPPER CHAIN."
"Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this deceptively spacious five bedroom town house. The property is located on City Fields it was built in 2019 by Miller Homes and benefits from four double bedrooms a fifth single bedroom, a bathroom and two ensuites making this property a brilli..."
"Situated on the outskirts of Wakefield city centre is this DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS four bedroom detached family home benefitting from ample off road parking and well proportioned rear garden, ideal for the growing family. EPC rating C72."
"This attractive 3 bedroom detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet location in the sought-after area of Horbury, wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport l..."
"Located in Alverthorpe in a private estate, this spacious and finished to a high standard 4 bed detached property with good size garden and garage is a must view and is offered with no chain. The property is still under builders warranty and offers entrance hall, w/c, spacious lounge, kitchen/di..."
"The development benefits from excellent commuter links to Wakefield and Leeds City Centres, Wakefield Westgate train station, The Ridings and Trinity shopping centres, and private and public schools in close proximity. Access to junctions 40 and 41 of the M1 motorway is only a few minutes drive!"
"Guide Price: £315,000 - £325,000. Well presented Redrow 'York' Spacious 4 Bed Semi in the sought after City Fields development. Still within its NHBC. Close to local amenities, transport links and M62/M1 motorway networks. Viewing highly recommended."
"This beautifully presented four-bedroom home is situated in the sought-after City Fields Development within easy reach of Pinderfields Hospital, Wakefield Centre, amenities at Snow Hill, and the easy-to-reach Wakefield Eastern Relief Road and M62/M1 Motorway Networks. The property will also have ..."
"ONE OF OUR MOST POPULAR HOMES..This is not your typical 3 bedroom home... The Cavendish offers generous room sizes, a LARGE KITCHEN/DINING ROOM , will fit a sofa and dining table for entertaining family and friends. Upstairs offers a master bedroom with DRESSING AREA and EN SUITE. "
Split over two and a half stories THE ELLERSTON is a perfectly balanced 4 bedroom town house with luxurious master suite on the entire top floor. Come and view our showhome now!
"Beautifully presented 4 Bedroom Detached Family Home. The property provides good size accommodation to include two reception rooms and a conservatory, additional room and utility. Situated in a sought after location ideal for the commuter. Driveway and Garage. Not to be Missed."
"Located in the popular area of Thornes, facing on to Thornes park. This spacious 4 bed Edwardian Through terraced offers a spacious family home with lots of original features. On entering the property via the large entrance hall, the property opens up with a spacious lounge, kitchen/dining roo..."
"**A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME**MODERN DEVELOPMENT LOCATION with LOVELY VIEWS**VERY WELL PRESENTED and READY TO MOVE STRAIGHT INTO**IDEAL FAMILY HOME**CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Comprising of on the ground floor and entrance hall with access to the lounge, kitchen/dining room, downstair..."
"Situated in Newton Hill is this SUPERLY PRESENTED three bedroom semi detached home benefitting from ample off road parking, single detached garage and low maintenance garden. EPC rating E54."
Split over two and a half stories THE ELLERSTON is a perfectly balanced town house. View our showhome now!
** ASSISTED SALE AVAILABLE ** The clever layout of this home means you get an INTEGRAL GARAGE yet still lots of living space. Upstairs offers THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS as well as a GENEROUS bathroom with SEPARATE SHOWER CUBICLE. This home is finished to a HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT.
"Enjoy the best of modern living in this popular three-bedroom home which benefits from a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The Hatfield's bright front aspect living room, separate utility room, handy storage cupboard and downstairs WC make this a great home."
"The Piccadilly is a popular three-bedroom family home with an integral garage and an open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden. There’s a separate living room and a handy WC. Upstairs, bedroom one is en-suite and the other two bedrooms share the family bathroom."
"Manning Stainton are delighted to offer to the market this spacious two bedroom detached bungalow located in a sought after residential and peaceful neighbourhood with ample local amenities, public transport links and easy access to the M1"
"£5,000 towards your deposit. Intergrated appliances . Flooring package . 6ft boundary fence. Turf to rear garden. .The Staveley - Plot 213. A stunning detached family home offering a spacious lounge, contemporary kitchen/living area with french doors to rear garden, three generous bedrooms, styli..."
Enjoying a cul-de-sac position is this beautifully presented three-bedroom detached bungalow. The property has been lovingly improved and very well maintained by the current owners offering ready to move into accommodation. Located on this popular development in this popular part of Wrenthor...
A good size plot extending towards 1/3 of an acre is this well appointed three bedroom SEMI DETACHED home boasting a LARGE CONSERVATORY to the side and a substantial garden plot. EPC rating D56
A welcoming semi-detached home with three generous bedrooms.
"Providing deceptively spacious accommodation having a open plan kitchen and diner to the rear is this bay fronted semi detached family home with three bedrooms. Benefiting from off street parking and a detached single garage. Downstairs comprises of a tiled entrance hall, lounge with bay windo..."
"- Newly renovated and furnished, inclusive of 12-month building warranty- Close to Wakefield City Centre, bus stop and train station- Both good for self-living or investment in HMO- Can choose 3-year rental guaranteed scheme with 7% net yield- Comply to HMO regulations"
"Found in an extremely popular residential location those extremely spacious three double bedroom semi-detached traditional semi-detached family house, the property offers spacious and well-proportioned living accommodation throughout as well as excellent access to commuter links including motorwa..."
"**A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME**LOCATED ON A MODERN DEVELOPMENT**CONSERVATORY**DRIVE and GARAGE**WELL PRESENTED and READY TO MOVE STRAIGHT IN** Comprising of on the ground floor an entrance hall with access to the lounge, kitchen/dining room, downstairs wc and stairs leading to the 1st floor. There..."
"Reeds Rains Wakefield are incredibly proud to bring to market this modern town house located in a secure gated cul-de-sac. Internally this property briefly comprises of: entrance hall, WC, integral garage, kitchen/diner, living room, four bedroom, two with en-suites and a family bathro..."
"DAN PEARCE SELLS HOMES PROUDLY PRESENTS THIS FANTASTIC 4-BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE BASED ON A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA OF WAKEFIELD. BOASTING AMPLE LIVING SPACE, EN SUITE FACILITIES AND ALLOCATED PARKING. CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING WITH DPSH TODAY!"
A 3 Bedroom Semi-detached Family Home located in a most convenient location on the edge of Wakefield City. Excellent opportunity for the commuter that requires the railway to travel to Leeds - London City link or the Northern Motorway Network only two miles away.
"Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN this extremely spacious. well proportioned three bedroom detached family house, the property offers excellent access to commuter links as well as local schools and amenities as well as the opportunity for updating."
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £275,000 plus reservation fee. Subject to an undisclosed reserve price. A detached home with OUTLINE PLANNING PERMISSION for an additional dwelling within the grounds (Application 20/01302/FUL). OVER THREE LEVELS with three well-proportion..."
"* VIEWING RECOMMENDED * *MUST SEE PROPERTY* A superb example of a beautiful three bedroom Semi detached family home Offering spacious accommodation with three spacious bedrooms and large garden to the rear The current decor creates a chic, homely feel upon entering th..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 - £285,000. Immaculate, stylish, superbly appointed three bedroom home located on a cul-de-sac. Downstairs cloakroom w.c. Double block paved driveway. Viewing advised to appreciate what is on offer."
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this individually designed detached home occupying an elevated position within walking distance of the city centre in this pleasant development. In need of updating and modernisation works. No Chain.
"Springbok Properties are proud to present this rarely available Four Double Bedroom Semi Detached House to the market. An ideal family home in an excellent location, viewing is advised we don't anticipate the property being around for long. ."
"Manning Stainton are delighted to present to market this three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the sought after area of St Johns. The property is offered for sale with no onward chain. Located on an attractive tree lined street, it is a well maintained home and has spacious accommodation t..."
"We are delighted to offer this exceptional 3-bedroom, 2-bathroom detached family home to the market. With a newly erected out-building-Gymnasium, newly fitted permanent roof over conservatory, eat-in kitchen diner, 2 double bedrooms and 1 small double. There is an en-suite to master bedroom, fami..."
"** Pre Show Home Launch Pricing ** You'll be surprised at just how much SPACE there is. The WOW factor really is in the MASTER SUITE on the top floor, complete with EN SUITE & DRESSING AREA. German manufactured kitchen with quality appliances included as standard. TWO PARKING SPACES included."
"Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom extended semi detached home located on a cul de sac position in the village of Wrenthorpe. The property is well presented through out and benefits from a downstairs shower room, a through lounge/dining area, three double bedroom..."
"Manning stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom detached family home located in Wakefield. This property has spacious accommodation throughout, having two reception rooms, a conservatory and three double bedrooms, it has been well maintained and is well presented throughout."
"We are pleased to present to the market this wonderful two-bedroom detached property offered for sale vacant with no onward chain. Located on a quiet cul-de-sac within the sought-after area of Wrenthorpe. Positioned on a good-sized corner plot, the property briefly comprises; a welcoming entra..."
"Ideal for first time buyers, the Gosford is a spacious 3 bedroom home."
"Enjoying a CORNER PLOT position is this superbly appointed and extended SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW with two bedrooms, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, gardens to three sides, driveway, UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating D66"
"* VIEWING RECOMMENDED * A superb example of a beautiful three bedroom Terrace family home Offering spacious accommodation with three spacious bedrooms and large garden to the rear The current decor creates a chic, homely feel upon entering the property and throughout...."
"Enjoying a cul-de-sac location is this three bedroom semi detached house benefitting from a CORNER PLOT POSITION with driveway parking, single detached garage and enclosed rear garden. EPC rating D62."
A deceptively spacious three bedroomed semi detached house with a larger than average garden to the rear set in this HIGHLY SOUGHT AFRER location within such EASY REACH of the city centre. EPC rating D55.
"A three bedroom semi detached house with AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING via a driveway and garage, a good size lounge diner, attractive rear garden and located in a convenient area for the commuter. EPC rating C73"
"Turf to rear garden. 6ft boundary fence. .The Bamburgh, Plot 220, is our 3-bedroom, semi-detached home at Elm Tree Park."
"**HOME OF THE WEEK**. £5,000 towards your deposit . Integrated appliances. Flooring throughout . Turf to rear garden. 6ft boundary fence. .The Bamburgh, Plot 218, is our 3-bedroom, semi-detached home at Elm Tree Park."
"The Newport features an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER with patio doors leading to the TURFED REAR GARDEN, separate lounge, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with ensuite to the master and a single bedroom. "
"This is a stylish modern newly built open plan 3 bedroom end town house it is only 10 minutes by car to Pinderfields Hospital, supermarkets, with outstanding schools close and Wakefield train station. The house is located 5 minutes walking to nice walks through the wood which reach the canal conn..."
"Situated on the popular City Fields development is this SUPERBLY PRESENTED four bedroom townhouse benefitting from off road parking, South West facing lawned garden and within close proximity to Wakefield city centre. EPC rating B86."
"Guide Price: £260,000 - £270,000. A Three Bedroom Semi-detached Family Home situated within a pleasant cul-de-sac in a sought after location of Wrenthorpe. Viewings highly recommended to fully appreciate this family home. Not to be Missed!"
"Ready to MOVE INTO THIS SPRING with flooring included. Good sized 3 bedroom home with LARGE KITCHEN DINER and a SEPARATE LOUNGE with beautiful BAY WINDOW. Upstairs features 3 GENEROUS BEDROOMS, family bathroom and SEPARATE STUDY AREA, perfect for working from home."
"*There's a great space to cook, with a BEAUTIFUL FITTED German built kitchen, plus room to chat and even spill out into the GARDEN through the large double doors. Upstairs, the master bedroom has a GENEROUS, MODERN EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM."
"Situated on this cul-de-sac close to Pinderfields, is this two bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW benefitting from driveway parking, rear gardens and garage. EPC rating E52."
*AVAILABLE WITH SHARED EQUITY* CONTACT US FOR MORE INFORMATION. The Pine is the perfect starter home with integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading from the kitchen to the rear garden. Upstairs are two double bedrooms and a further single.
"The Camberley has it all; a kitchen/diner, a generous lounge with French doors opening up onto a smart garden , three good-sized bedrooms, one boasting an en-suite, and a family bathroom. "
"Guide Price: £250,000 - £275,000. A substantial Three Bedroom Semi-detached which is presented to a modern standard. Fantastic garage space and enclosed gardens. Ideally located for access to Wakefield City Centre and Thornes Park, local amenities and schooling."
Superbly presented an extended three bedroom home which has bundles of style and fabulous gardens. Viewing Essential.
We are pleased to present to the market this beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached home that has been lovingly improved and very well maintained by the current owner offering ready to move into accommodation.  The property briefly comprises; an entrance hallway with stair...
"*** £250,000 .. OFFERED TO THE MARKET IS THIS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE FAMILY HOME WHICH IS SITUATED IN THE EVER POPULAR CITY FIELDS DEVELOPMENT *** This property would be ideal for but not limited to families having excellent transport links into Wakefield City Centre and motorway links"
"Guide Price: £250,000 - £275,000. A beautifully presented 3 bedroom three storey Town House located in the heart of St. John's. Superb bespoke kitchen/dining room. Viewing Essential to fully appreciate."
"We are pleased to present to the market this delightful semi-detached chalet bungalow. A popular and convenient location on the North side of Wakefield city centre, within easy reach of local amenities, and for those travelling further afield, there is easy access to the motorway network ..."
"£600 per month towards your mortgage for 1 year - that's a total of £7,200. Turf to rear garden. 6ft boundary fence. Integrated appliances . Flooring throughout. .Plot 202: The Windsor is our popular detached family home, available to reserve online with fantastic extras."
"£5,000 Towards your deposit . Turf to rear garden. 6ft boundary fence. .The Windsor, Plot 222, is our 3-bedroom, semi-detached home at Elm Tree Park."
"Situated close to Wakefield city centre is this fantastic three storey town house benefiting from driveway parking, rear garden, FOUR BEDROOMS, three bathrooms/w.c. and good commuter access. EPC rating C70"
"A WELL PRESENTED ground floor apartment with two Juliet balconies to the rear, situated in this well regarded development set in the heart of the city centre. EPC rating B81."
"Manning Stainton are delighted to present to market this three bedroom detached home situated in the sought after village of Wrenthorpe with no upwards chain. The property is well presented through-out and would make a perfect purchase for any array of buyers, including small families and commuters."
"Found in a popular residential location this extremely well presented three double bedroom semi-detached family house, the property offers excellent access to commuter links as well as local schools will appeal to a range of potential buyers. Internal viewing is strongly recommended."
"A superb example of a beautifully presented and charming two bedroom Bungalow with a private driveway.  The current decor creates a homely feel upon entering the property and throughout. Offering spacious family accommodation  Arranged over one floor, this beautifully..."
"Guide Price: £240,000 - £250,000. This immaculately presented 2 Bedroom Semi-detached True Bungalow with Outbuildings is situated in a convenient and popular location. Garage plus two spacious and deceiving OUTBUILDINGS in the garden can be used for multi purpose. No Upper Chain."
"A 3 Bedroom Mid Town House 'Ready to Move into'. Viewing highly recommended to fully appreciate the home. Spacious throughout and situated in a fantastic location close to City centre, transport links and local amenities. Not to be Missed."
This attractive 2 bedroom end of the terraced home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet street in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport lin...
"Guide Price: £240,000 - £250,000. A lovely Three Bedroom Semi. Bright and Inviting. Two Reception Rooms. Set in a highly regarded area of Lupset Park. No Upper Chain. Viewing Essential."
"£5,000 towards your deposit . Flooring throughout. Turf to rear garden. 6ft boundary fence. .The Kendall, Plot 221, is our 3-bedroom, semi-detached home at Elm Tree Park."
"***RECENTLY REDUCED*** Available with no chain involved, a superb opportunity to purchase this three bedroom detached family home benefitting from two LARGE reception rooms, ample driveway parking and ENCLOSED rear garden. EPC rating D67."
"This attractive 3 bedroom semi-detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet estate in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links...."
A 2 Bedroom Semi-detached Bungalow situated in a most popular location in Wakefield. Offered to the market with No Upper Chain. Early viewing highly recommended. Not to be Missed!
NO CHAIN - Detached Bungalow - Private Drive - Cul De Sac Location
This attractive 3 bedroom detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. ...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi detached house benefitting from a modern fitted kitchen, two spacious reception rooms and enclosed front and rear gardens. EPC rating D66."
"Deceptive from the main roadside is this well appointed, attractive and spacious THREE BEDROOM mid town house with the added benefit of a CONVERTED GARAGE into a sitting room, UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating C71."
"Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom semi detached home situated in Newton Hill. The property benefits from spacious accommodation including two reception rooms, two double bedrooms and a single bedroom. The property boasts lots of character and is beautifully pres..."
"Guide Price: £235,000 - £245,000. An attractive and deceptively spacious 4 Bedroomed Mid Town House. Off road parking to the front and garden to the rear. The property is within excellent proximity to Wakefield Centre, Wakefield/Westgate train station, amenities and the Northern motorway network."
"Guide Price: £230,000 - £240,000. A three Bedroom Victorian style Terrace. The property includes some original features to include high ceilings and good size sash windows. Permit parking available. Convenient location for Wakefield city centre, amenities and schooling. Not to be Missed!"
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this spacious three/four bedroomed semi-detached house which has recently had a NEW BOILER and RE-WIRE. Occupying a convenient and popular position in the heart of Wrenthorpe village.
"A THREE BEDROOM semi detached house in an extremely convenient location for the commuter. With a MODERN KITCHEN, attractive gardens to the front and side ideal for entertaining. DRIVEWAY provides off road parking. EPC rating D60."
A deceptively spacious and beautifully presented family home set on a corner plot on the outskirts of Wakefield City Centre. Extended over three floors. Generous off road parking. Viewing Essential.
**A 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME**2 RECEPTION ROOMS**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DETACHED GARAGE**IDEAL FAMILY HOME**NEW ROOF**POPULAR LOCATION** Fresh to the market is this lovely 3 bedroom semi-detached home located in the popular Sandal area of Wakefield that comprises of on the ground floor an ent...
"Set on an ideal cul-de-sac location on the outskirts of Wakefield city centre is this WELL PRESENTED two bedroom detached bungalow benefitting from good sized rooms, MODERN KITCHEN and ample garden space. EPC rating E47"
"DAN PEARCE SELLS HOMES PROUDLY PRESENTS THIS STUNNING 2 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED NEAR CENTRAL WAKEFIELD! BOASTING A MODERN DECOR, OFF-ROAD PARKING AND IS CLOSE TO AN ABUNDANCE OF AMENITIES. CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!"
"Located in the popular location of Stanley, this spacious 3 bed town house is offered for sale with sitting tenant paying £800 per c/m to June 2023 or vacant. The property offers lounge , dining room, kitchen and w/c. To the first floor are 3 x double bedrooms ( with main bedroom having ..."
"Extended 4 Bed home. Off road parking and 3 reception rooms. Modern and well presented. Local amenities, schools, supermarkets, bus and transport routes. Ideal for the commuter. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by IAM Sold Ltd ending 28th March at 3pm."
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this well presented semi detached true bungalow occupying a popular and and sought after position situated west of Wakefield city centre. No Chain.
"Reeds Rains Wakefield is proud to bring to the market this modern three bedroom Terrace located in Stanley. Internally this property briefly comprises of: entrance hall, downstairs WC, living room, dining room, kitchen, first floor landing, three bedrooms, en-suite shower room and fami..."
"This beautiful 2 bed detached bungalow has a lot to offer! With spacious gardens to the front and back of the property, off street parking for at least 2 cars and an open plan living space, it really does tick all the boxes!"
"Guide Price: £220,000 - £230,000. Rarely do such properties come onto the open market. An attractive 1800's End Terrace located adjacent to Queen Elizabeth Grammar School playing fields. Parking Permit. Early Viewing highly recommended to avoid disappointment."
"Three bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow with private driveway and garage, offering well-designed family accommodation which is conveniently located on a quiet cul-de-sac close to local amenities and excellent transport links."
"Guide Price: £220,000 - £230,000. A Two Bedroom Detached True Bungalow well presented throughout. READY TO MOVE INTO - Paved driveway to side providing of road parking. Close to schools, transport links and amenities. Not to be Missed!"
"Guide Price: £220,000 - £230,000. A beautiful presented home located on a private road in a most popular residential area of Wakefield. The property is located close to the motorway network and public transport links. Off road parking for two cars to the front and garden to the rear."
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom semi-detached home situated in Wakefield. The property is well maintained throughout and benefits from being a corner plot on a cul-de-sac position.
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this spacious and well proportioned three bedroom semi detached house occupying an enviable cul de sac posisition with gardens adjoining the river calder. Offering a truly unique position. Offered with No Chain, Viewing Essential."
Occupying a CUL-DE-SAC location is this semi detached TWO BEDROOM bungalow benefitting from ample off road parking and detached garage. EPC rating D68.
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this three bedroom semi detached home situated in Wakefield. The property is deceptively spacious throughout and is placed on a generous sized plot and is located well for access to Wakefield city centre.
This attractive 3 bedroom semi-detached family home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport lin...
"FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION Auction End Date:Monday, 13th Mar 2023 at 2:00 PM Located in the Pinders heath area of Wakefield. this spacious 3 bed detached bungalow with a garage and located on a corner plot is a must view. The property offers spacious lounge, kitc..."
"Situated close to Wakefield city centre is this SUPERBLY PRESENTED three bedroom semi detached property with SPACIOUS REAR GARDEN, detached garage, UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating D67."
"A fantastic development opportunity in the prime location of Wakefield City Centre. With full planning permission to build four apartments and one commercial unit, this plot offers an amazing opportunity for any developer/investor. A viewing is highly recommended to appreci..."
"Designed for maximum impact, the Brompton is one half of an impressive double fronted property. From the outside, it's a seamless grand design. Inside, it's a two bed property that packs a punch."
"A SPACIOUS home in Flanshaw, available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS or FIRST TIME BUYERS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to welcome to the market this charming three bedroom semi-detached house in Flanshaw, available with no forward chain.The property benefits fr..."
**A 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME**MODERN KITCHEN**MODERN BATHROOM**CONERVATORY**OFF ROAD PARKING and GARAGE**LARGE PLOT**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OPPORTUNITY/FAMILY HOME** Comprising of on the ground floor an entrance hall with access to the lounge and stairs leading to the first floor. From the lou...
"Manning Stainton welcome to the market this attractive True Bungalow situated in a popular residential area. Offering two spacious bedrooms, featuring double glazing, gas central heating, driveway, garage, garden room and well established gardens. Viewing highly recommended, Please call to book n..."
"Situated in this quiet development close to Wakefield city centre is this three bedroom semi-detached home. Ideal for any FIRST TIME BUYER or young family this property comprises to the ground floor; entrance hallway with GENEROUS living room with bow window to the front, separate dining room and..."
"Reeds Rains Wakefield is proud to bring to the market this modern and well presented first floor apartment with NO MAINTENANCE CHARGES and LOW GROUND RENT. Internally this home briefly comprises of: entrance hall, first floor landing, lounge/diner, kitchen, utility, two double bedrooms..."
"Perfectly proportioned, the Alnwick has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a good-sized living room and two double bedrooms. There's also off-road parking. Ideal for a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"Spacious and finished to a high standard, this 2 bed end town house with parking and within a short walking distance to the town centre. The property is offered with sitting tenant paying £850 per c/m or vacant. The property offers over 3 floors , to the ground floor - entrance hall with ..."
"Well appointed throughout, this two bedroom quarter house has a CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN AND BATHROOMS. With off street PARKING this is an ideal home for the first time buyer or the young working couple. An internal viewing is highly recommended. EPC rating B84"
Situated on the outskirts of Wakefield city centre is this deceptively spacious three bedroom mid terrace home benefitting from WELL PROPORTIONED reception rooms and single garage. EPC rating C73.
75% SHARE PRICE - CONTACT US FOR MORE INFORMATION. The Pine is the perfect starter home with integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading from the kitchen to the rear garden. Upstairs are two double bedrooms and a further single.
"Guide Price: £190,000 - £200,000. A 3 Bedroom End Terrace located in a most popular and convenient area in Wakefield ideal for the city and motorway networks. Good local amenities including schools and shops. Enclosed garden to the front and good size enclosed garden to the rear."
"3 Bed Semi in a highly regarded area - NO UPPER CHAIN. ""It is our understanding that the Property is not registered at the Land Registry which is the case with a significant proportion of land across England and Wales. Your conveyancer will take the necessary steps and advise you accordingly."""
"Guide Price: £190,000 - £200,000. William H Brown are delighted to offer to the market this delightful Detached Bungalow situated in a most sought after area of Wakefield. To the outside the property has low maintenance gardens to both front and rear and a Driveway. Not to be Missed!"
"Movenowproperties are delighted to offer this beautiful 2 double bedroom property for sale. Having pleasant entrance hall, downstairs wc, living room with patio doors opening to enclosed rear garden, off road parking for 2 vehicles. Must be viewed to be appreciated. "
"Situated close to Wakefield city centre is this THREE BEDROOM end terrace property benefiting from rear driveway parking, accommodation over three floors and TWO RECEPTION ROOMS EPC rating E54"
A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS two bedroom semi detached bungalow in need of a degree of modernisation benefitting from good sized rooms and LOW MAINTENANCE front and rear gardens. EPC rating D67.
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this well presented mature two bedroom mid terrace house occupying a popular and convenient position north of Wakefield city centre with local amenites within both Wakefield and Outwood .
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this THREE BEDROOM end terrace house benefitting from two large reception rooms, detached garage and low maintenance front and rear GARDENS. EPC rating E50."
"A FIVE BEDROOM mid terrace house benefiting from cellar, utility room off modern kitchen/diner with UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. An ideal home for the first time buyer or investor. EPC rating E51"
"Situated in a cul-de-sac location is this semi detached family home with three bedrooms, off street parking and enclosed rear garden. Available with no onward chain and an early viewing comes highly recommended. EPC rating C70."
"Movenowproperties are pleased to offer this 3 bedroom, semi detached home for sale. Benefiting from drive offering off road parking, well presented rear garden, conservatory, spacious kitchen, downstairs bathroom and 3 good sized bedrooms. "
"Situated on Navigation Walk, next to the new Tileyard North development, is this STUNNING two bedroom duplex apartment benefitting from beautiful RIVERSIDE VIEWS, it's own parking space and bedroom with en suite bathroom/w.c. EPC rating C70."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this 1 bedroom 2nd floor apartment on the popular Red Row development on the outskirts of Wakefield City Centre with no chain! This will appeal to a large range of buyers, we highly recommend arranging your internal inspections TODAY!"
"A two bedroom semi detached house benefiting from TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, modern shower room/w.c., spacious living room with feature fireplace and large CONSERVATORY. Off road parking, enclosed rear garden, UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating D63"
A LARGE and supremely SPACIOUS two bedroom penthouse apartment extending over 150 sq m (1600 sq ft) internal floor are and situated in this highly regarded development in the HEART of the city centre. EPC rating C78.
This attractive 3 bedroom semi-detached home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet street in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this THREE BEDROOM semi detached house, perfect for the first time buyer or families benefiting from an ENCLOSED rear garden, double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating D61."
"*** GUICE PRICE £175,000 - £185,000 *** Located five minutes from Wakefield city centre is this THREE BEDROOM mid terrace property benefitting from spacious rear gardens and driveway parking. EPC rating D64."
A stunning Waterside Penthouse Apartment located within close proximity to the new Tileyard development and The Hepworth Gallery. Viewing essential to fully appreciate what is on offer.
"** GUIDE PRICE £175,000 - £185,000 *** Well appointed throughout is this ATTRACTIVELY SPACIOUS three bedroom semi detached home benefitting from large garden to the rear. EPC rating C69."
"Guide Price: £170,000 - £180,000. Offering an excellent opportunity to a range of purchasers and ideally located for access to Wakefield City Centre, Pinderfields Hospital and approximately 2 miles to Jcn 30 of M62 motorway. Rear garden and off road parking. Not to be Missed!"
A high specification development of just EIGHT SPACIOUS APARTMENTS (both period and contemporary styles) in this landmark Grade II listed building in an ENVIABLE CITY LOCATION with ample parking and expansive gardens. Option of being furnished by interior designers. Awaiting EPC ratings.
"Guide Price: £170,000 - £180,000. 3 Bed Mid Terrace offers potential for a family or Investor. NO UPPER CHAIN. Close to Wakefield city centre, good bus route, Sandal/Agbrigg train stn offers commuting direct to Wakefield/Westgate and Doncaster stations, connections to York (50 mins) & London (2 hrs)"
"3 Bedroom Semi-detached. Comprising of entrance hall, living room, kitchen, 3 first floor bedrooms and bathroom. Gardens to both front and rear and off road parking. Gas central heating and double glazed. Not to be Missed!"
We welcome you to the grand opening of these newly refurbished apartments on Saturday 15th October between the hours of 12 noon - 3 pm and Sunday 16th October between the hours of 11am - 4 pm. A high specification development of just EIGHT SPACIOUS APARTMENTS (both period and contemporar...
Deceptive from the main road side is this ATTRACTIVE and EXTENDED two double bedroom town house benefiting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating C70.
"**THIS PROPERTY IS FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. FOR SALE BY CONDITIONAL AUCTION, STARTING BID: £165,000 + RESERVATION FEE** Internally this home briefly comprises of kitchen, living room, dining room, three bedrooms and a shower room. Externally this prope..."
Martin and Co - Wakefield are pleased to bring to the market this semi detached four bedroom house. The house has been converted for use as a HMO but can easily be returned to normal residential use. Set over two floors with on street parking and rear garden. Chain Free
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this surprisingly spacious and well proportioned mid terrace house, having original features and charm and located within walking distance of the city centre and Thornes Park itself. Ideal for the first time buyer. Offered with No Chain. Viewing E..."
"Guide Price: £160,000 - £170,000. A THREE Bedroom Mid Terrace with CONSERVATORY and ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN. The property is located close to Wakefield City Centre, transport links, schooling and local amenities. Offered to the market with No Upper Chain. Ideal for FIRST TIME BUYER or YOUNG FAMILY."
This attractive 2 bedroom terraced home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This ...
"This well-presented, three-bedroom semi-detached house is perfect for anyone looking to gain access to the property market, benefitting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating throughout. Available with no onward chain.  The property comprises of entrance hallway, living room, sp..."
*Reduced on 30/01/2023* **A 2 BEDROOM MID-TERRACE HOME**CONSERVATORY**OFF-ROAD PARKING**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY HOME** Purplebricks are pleased to bring fresh to the market a well presented modern two bedroom mid terrace property located on the modern estate in the grounds of the old Snapethorpe H...
 Spacious  property situated in Newton Hill on the outskirts of Wakefield. REF GC O175  It is within a 5 minute drive of Wakefield Centre and with great transport links and local amenities to hand. This converted semi detached house has been adapted into two spa...
"Guide Price: £150,000 - £160,000. A deceptively spacious two bedroom Victorian End Terrace coming to market with No Upper Chain. Not to be Missed! Situated in a convenient location close to the city centre, transport links and local amenities, all in walking distance."
"Guide Price: £150,000 - £160,000. A Three Bedroom mature Terrace located close to Wakefield City Centre. Fantastic family home or rental potential. Viewing Advised. No Upper Chain."
"Located in the Alverthorpe area of Wakefield, this spacious 4 bed through terraced is in need of a few repairs but offers a great family home. The property offers entranace hall, lounge , kitchen/diner, 3 cellars - one used as an office/utility roomand the other 2 for storage. To the first flo..."
"Representing a unique opportunity to acquire a move-in ready semi-detached property on the outskirts of Wakefield, this home is ideal for any house hunter looking for a stress-free move into a highly desirable location. With no modernisation required, this attractive home will provide a huge ran..."
WELL PRESENTED throughout is this SPACIOUS three bedroom semi detached house benefitting UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. Awaiting EPC rating.
"FREEHOLD We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 3-bedroom semi-detached house on Agbrigg Road. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array of individual or collective family activities. "
"Movenowproperties are delighted to offer a 75% share of this beautiful 2 double bedroom property for sale. Having pleasant entrance hall, downstairs wc, living room with patio doors opening to enclosed rear garden, off road parking for 2 vehicles. Must be viewed to be appreciated. "
William H Brown are delighted to offer to market this 2 Bedroom First Floor Apartment. Offered with No Upper Chain. Ideal for the commuter and good local amenities. Allocated parking space. Incentives Available (Subject to Conditions). Not to be Missed!
A Three Bed Mid Terrace located in a most popular and convenient area in Wakefield ideal for the city and motorway networks. Good local amenities to include schools and shops. Viewings highly recommended to fully appreciate this home.
"An ideal opportunity for the first time buyer, working couple or those looking to downsize, is this WELL APPOINTED two double bedroom ground floor apartment. EPC rating D66."
Well proportioned TWO BEDROOM end town house situated in this convenient residential area within easy reach of local facilities. Awaiting EPC rating.
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this modern purpose built two bedroomed second floor apartment located in the heart of the city Centre, adjacent to the Wakefield College, and strolling distance of Wakefield Westgate train Station."
"Guide Price: £135,000 - £145,000 - 2 Bedroom Mature Terrace Property. Ideal for the first time buyer, growing family and commuter. Viewing recommended to avoid disappointment. Within excellent access of Sandal/Agbrigg train station, bus routes, schooling and shops."
"Manning Stainton are delighted to present to market this well presented two bedroom upper floor apartment located in Wakefield. The property would be perfect for first time buyers, professionals and investors."
3 Bedroom Semi-detached offering a great opportunity to an investor or home mover as it offers great potential. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by IAM Sold Ltd.
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this spacious three bedroom mid town house occupying a convenient position on the outskirts of the city centre. Having gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing. Offered with No Chain. "
50% SHARE PRICE - CONTACT US FOR MORE INFORMATION. The Pine is the perfect starter home with integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading from the kitchen to the rear garden. Upstairs are two double bedrooms and a further single.
"Guide Price: £125,000 - £135,000. An upper floor Apartment located ideal for Pinderfields Hospital, transport links and fantastic for the young professional. Attractively Priced. Allocated parking. No Upper Chain. Viewing Essential"
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this purpose built first floor flat occupying a pleasant position off Castle Road, set amongst mature trees offering a pleasant setting."
Deceptive from the main roadside is this TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS mature mid terrace property benefiting from UPVC double glazing and gas central heating. EPC rating C69
Situated just off the A61 Barnsley Road on the Outskirts of Wakefield Centre on the site of the Former Manygates Hospital is this spacious modern and attractive two bedroom first floor apartment. Wakefield Centre is a 10 minute walk away The block was rescued by developers and has be...
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £1250,000 plus reservation fee. Subject to an undisclosed reserve price. Accommodation over three levels is this spacious and attractive three bedroom mid terrace property. This property is for sale by West Yorkshire Property Auction powe..."
"Situated in the heart of Wakefield, this superbly presented one bedroom ground floor apartment benefitting from open plan living accommodation and driveway parking. EPC rating C73."
"Situated on the outskirts of Ossett is this two bedroom mid terrace home, ideal for first time buyers benefitting from enclosed rear garden and close proximity to transport links. Awaiting EPC rating."
"Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering this substantially extended end of terrace house located just off the main A61, a short distance outside of Wakefield city centre. Ideal for the first time buyer."
"Situated ideally for the M1 motorway and Wakefield city centre is TWO BEDROOM mid terrace property benefitting from double glazing, gas central heating and rear gardens. EPC rating E51."
**A 2 BEDROOM MID TERRACE HOME**VERY WELL PRESENTED and READY TO MOVE STRAIGHT IN**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR RENTAL INVESTMENT** Comprising of on the ground floor a lounge with access to the stairs that lead to the 1st floor and kitchen. From the kitchen there is access to the rear patio area and ...
"We are pleased to offer this exciting opportunity of TWO, TWO BEDROOM apartments being sold off plan with full planning permission in place."
Movenowproperties are pleased to offer this 3 bedroom semi detached property for sale. Available with sitting tenants or vacant possession. Having drive offering off road parking. Gardens to front and rear. Spacious living area and kitchen and 3 double bedrooms. 
Unfurnished A two bedroom inner terrace property in a good location with good transport links to Wakefield and a short drive to M1 motorway.
"**A 2 BEDROOM MID TERRACE HOME**VERY WELL PRESENTED and READY TO MOVE STRAIGHT IN**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR RENTAL INVESTMENT** Comprising of on the ground floor a lounge with access to the cellar, kitchen and stairs leading to the 1st floor. From the kitchen there is access to the downstairs wc ..."
"A bright and inviting Ground Floor Apartment located on Chaloner Grove. Birch House is beautifully appointed overlooking green space. Offered to the market with No Upper Chain. Ideal location for Pinderfields Hospital, transport links and train station."
***CASH BUYERS ONLY *** This 3 bedroom semi-detached home sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links....
"Not to be missed this well presented 3 Bedroom Semi-detached property. Non standard construction. Generous size rear garden, lawned garden to the front. Well placed for local amenities, transport links and schooling. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by IAM Sold Ltd."
"Guide Price: £115,000 - £125,000. Two Bedroom Mid Terrace plus occasional room, well presented kitchen plus utility room. No Upper Chain. Enclosed low maintenance year to the rear. Excellent transport links. Viewing is highly recommended. Not to be Missed!"
Reeds Rains Wakefield is proud to bring to the market this two bedroom home with loft room located in the Wakefield City Centre. EPC Rating: D61 Council Tax Band: A 
This attractive 2 bedroom bottom floor appartment sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a quiet street in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. ...
"Rarely do such Apartments come onto the open market. With its own independent entrance this spacious, modern and well presented apartment SOLD WITH SITTING TENANT. Close to Sandal/Agbrigg train station. Lease on the building is owned by the current vendor and No 3."
This extremely spacious 2 double bedroom ground floor apartment is an ideal purchase for a landlord/investor requiring a well presented property with quality tenant already in place. Alternatively it would also be of interest to a first time buyer or those requiring ground floor/single storey li...
"STARTING BID PRICE £110,000 PLUS £5,000 + VAT RESERVATION FEE OR 4.2% OF THE PURCHASE PRICE INC VAT , subject to a minimum of £6,000.00 including VAT. This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information..."
"Welcome to George House, a new high-specification residential developments in the heart of Wakefield’s thriving city centre. "
A TWO BEDROOM second floor apartment located CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES within a short distance to Wakefield city centre and approximately less than four miles from junction 39 of the M1 motorway. With secure intercom security system. Awaiting EPC rating.
"Found in an extremeley popular residential location within close proximity of Pinderfields hospital, this beautifully presented one double bedroom top floor apartment. The property benefits from allocated parking and will apeal to a wide range of potential buyers."
TREAT YOURSELF! We are delighted to be able to offer this first floor apartment as part of this stunning modern development in Wakefield city centre adjacent to Westgate railway station. The property is ideal for a first time buyer who enjoys being close to the city centre. The ...
"Guide Price: £100,000 - £110,000. Situated in a sought after area of Sandal. This One Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment has plenty to offer. Situated within close proximity to local amenities and transport links. Not to be Missed!"
"**** For sale by Traditional Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £100,000 plus Reservation Fee. **** A GREAT OPPORTUNITY TO AQUIRE A TWO BEDROOM, MID-THROUGH-TERRACE HOME REQUIRING REFURBISHMENT, OFFERED AS A BLANK CANVAS WITH ENCLOSED GARDEN TO THE REAR AND USEFUL CELLAR. THE PROPERTY..."
A 2 Bedroom Apartment ideal for the first time buyer or investor. Currently the vendors details do not match the registered title at Land Registry. Please ask the branch for more details. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by IAM Sold Ltd.
ATTENTION ALL INVESTORS & FIRST TIME BUYERS! This 2 bedroom apartment is offered for sale with no chain & within walking distance to Wakefield City Centre! Call Reeds Rains on to arrange your internal inspection!
ATTENTION ALL FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS- TWO BEDROOMS- EN-SUITE-ALLOCATED PARKING-PRIME LOCATION
Holroyd Miller have pleasure in offering for sale this system built three bedroom semi detached house constructed on a Wimpey No-fines system. The property is offered with immediate vacant possession.
"***Investors only*** This one bedroom property is situated in the heart of Wakefield City Centre and within walking distance to local bars, restaurants, shops and gyms. This property is being sold as a buy to let investment, with the current tenants currently paying £650 PCM. Please cont..."
***Investor only*** This new development is situated heart of the city centre and comprises a luxury specification throughout. This makes the perfect investment property due to the high yield and capital growth potential. Perfect for an investor looking for a safe and hands off investme...
"Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in Wakefield. The property is placed well for commuting, it has good links to the M1 motorway, Wakefield city centre, Westgate and Kirkgate train stations. NO UPPER CHAIN."
Manning Stainton are pleased to present to market this upper floor apartment situated in Alverthorpe. The apartment is situated on a cul-de-sac position with on street parking and benefits from no upper chain.
"Guide Price: £95,000 - £100,000. Ideally suit the professional or those wanting a great deal of privacy in a fantastic location for commuting. Covered underground parking in a secure Garage area. Great proximity to train stations, Newmillerdam, Sandal, Hepworth Gallery, Wakefield city centre shops."
"We are pleased to offer, this priced to sell, LARGE ONE BEDROOM first floor apartment, situated in this popular, secure, residential development to the south of the city."
"Two bedroom SECOND FLOOR apartment comprises; communal entrance lobby with intercom access, entrance hall with utility cupboard, spacious open plan lounge/diner/kitchen with Juliet balcony, two double bedrooms and bathroom/w.c. ALLOCATED PARKING space and a communal paved seating area. EPC r..."
"An ideal investment opportunity or home for the first time buyer, available with no upward chain. An attractive TWO BEDROOM second floor apartment, situated in the heart of Wakefield CITY CENTRE with excellent access to Westgate Train Station. EPC rating C71"
"Welcome to George House, a new high-specification residential developments in the heart of Wakefield’s thriving city centre. Yorkshire is tipped to see the UK’s greatest house price growth over the next five years. 2021 was a record-breaking year for the Yorkshire region with the biggest climb..."
"**A 2 BEDROOM END-TERRACE HOME**NO UPWARD CHAIN**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OPPORTUNITY** Comprising of on the ground floor a lounge, kitchen/dining room and stairs leading to the first floor. The lounge is a good size with carpet and neutral décor. The kitchen has a selection of units with a ss sink..."
Located in Pinders heath next to Pinderfields hospital in the converted grade 2 listed building ( former hospital building). This spacious 1 bed apartment is offered as a great BTL investment and comes with sitting tenant paying £545 per c/m until Feb 2024. This first floor apartment has ...
** TWO BEDROOM ** TOP FLOOR FLAT ** ALLOCATED PARKING ** BALCONY **
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £90,000 plus reservation fee. Subject to an undisclosed reserve price. Ground floor apartment with TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. This property is for sale by West Yorkshire Property Auction powered by iamsold ltd. EPC rating C73."
We are delighted to offer to the market this well presented and spacious One Bedroom First Floor Flat located in a most convenient City centre location in Wakefield. Offered with No Upper Chain.
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! A great chance to acquire this investment property with tenant in situ. The property comprises of two bedrooms, family bathroom and open plan kitchen/lounge. Achieving an annual rental income of £5,700 and freehold."
"This attractive 1 bedroom flat sits on a substantial plot and is nestled in a lovely town, in the sought-after area of Wakefield. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive pr..."
"**THIS PROPERTY IS FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. FOR SALE BY CONDITIONAL AUCTION, STARTING BID: £80,000 + RESERVATION FEE** Reeds Rains Wakefield is excited to bring to the market this two bedroom home located within a mile of Wakefield City Centre. "
"Movenowproperties are pleased to offer this top floor, 1 bed apartment available with NO CHAIN! A spacious & modern apartment situated close to local amenities and fantastic bus / train routes for those commuting."
"An ideal opportunity for the first time buyer or investor to acquire this ONE BEDROOM first floor APARTMENT, situated in the heart of Wakefield CITY CENTRE with excellent access to Westgate Train Station. Available with no upward chain involved. EPC rating D66"
"Situated within walking distance to a range of CITY CENTRE amenities, local bus routes and Westgate Train Station. An ideal INVESTMENT opportunity or home for the first time buyer. An attractive one bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment. EPC rating D66"
"Superb 1 bed ground floor apartment in the popular location of St Johns now available with no chain. This apartment would make a great first time buyer or investment property and offers lounge, kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom. To the outside is allocated parking and communal gardens. ..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE - Reeds Rains are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £67,000 for Apartment 5, Hepworth, Woodlands Village, Wakefield. Anyone wishing to place an offer on the property should contact Reeds Rains, 4 Bull Ring, Wakefield, WF1 1HA on prior to exchange of contrac..."
Martin and Co - Wakefield are pleased to bring to the market this well presented first floor bedsit apartment for sale. Set in a converted house consisting of two other apartments. 
The property is for sale via modern method of Auction Superb 1 bed ground floor apartment in the popular location of St Johns is available with sitting tenant paying £575 per c/m until March 2024. This apartment would make a great first time buyer or investment property and offe...
"ATTENTION INVESTORS. Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this one bedroom, ground floor apartment, currently tenanted via Wakefield council. The property would be ideal for a cash buyer. EPC rating E39"
"Public Notice: Apt 2, Delius, Woodlands Village, West Yorkshire, WF1 5LR. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £59,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange. EPC: C Located in th..."
Martin and Co - Wakefield are pleased to bring to the market this second floor one bedroom apartment. Available with no chain and with sitting long term tenant. 
"This tenanted, modern 4th floor studio flat is sure to appeal to landlords and investors looking for an affordable buy to let in Wakefield city centre. Currently let, the property is generating £6,000 per annum which equates to a gross return of more than 12%. The flat has a favourable layo..."
"Movenowproperties are pleased to offer this 1 bedroom, ground floor apartment for sale. The property offers entrance hall, kitchen, bedroom and living room. Available with NO CHAIN.CASH BUYERS ONLY "
Sure to appeal to the buy to let landlords and investors alike. This property is a one bedroom duplex apartment located two miles from Wakefield city centre. The property is currently tenanted by a long term tenant who pays £380 per month meaning the property is currently achieving a gross ...
"Superb development opportunity for those looking for a straightforward project. This one bedroom duplex apartment is in need of modernisation and renovation throughout. Located two miles from Wakefield city centre the property briefly comprises, open plan kitchen and living room to the..."
The 4-bedroom Waysdale has been designed to offer extra space for growing families. Equipped garage & Allocated parking.
"A delightful 17th century former farmhouse with an adjoining two bedroom annexe, a separate studio, and land in an Area of Oustanding Natural Beauty, one mile from the city of Wells. Upper Milton Farm dates back to the 1600s and was added to in the 1800s. It is not listed. The present owners p..."
A charming and very spacious period house in a prime residential area within a short walk of the High Street. Garden and parking.
An exceptional 'grand design' house in a superb location and within walking distance of the Market Place and High Street. Private walled garden and parking.
"A quite superb house in a walled garden within a short walk of the Market Place and High Street. Great living space, well appointed, lots of privacy plus parking. Cul de sac location."
An elegant and stylish Grade II listed detached town house in the heart of the city
"Perfectly positioned in the centre of Wells, 13 Chamberlain Street is a fabulous period family house with over 3000 sq. ft of accommodation laid out over four floors. Constructed in the 1870’s, it retains a wealth of period features that reflect its Victorian heritage whilst offering the op..."
"A charming period house within a short walk of the Cathedral. Spacious accommodation, sunny garden and a double garage."
"Situated in a quiet location is this detached former farmhouse built in the 1920's, having flexible and versatile living accommodation over two floors. There is also an attached one bedroom self contained annex which could either be used for family or an additional income. The property is loca..."
Beautifully presented Victorian townhouse within a short walk of the city centre. An ideal property for an extended family with flexible accommodation or a buyer seeking an income. Currently run as a stylish boutique bed and breakfast with five letting bedrooms and spacious two bedroom independen...
"The Albermarle is a lovely five-bedroom family home with a large kitchen/dining room, a living room and a family room both with access to the garden. Storage on both floors, a utility room with outside access and a downstairs WC come with this home. Two of the five bedrooms have en suite facilities."
"A very appealing house with many qualities and within walking distance of the High Street, schools and other amenities, Scope for improvement and extension."
"** POTENTIAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR TO CREATE A BEAUTIFUL FAMILY HOME ** A beautiful character property in the centre of Wells currently set up as a HMO with ten letting rooms, three bathrooms and two kitchens. Gardens to the front and back as well as a double garage and parking for sev..."
"Available to purchase with NO ONWARD CHAIN. A Fantastic investment property, currently set up as a 10 Bedroom HMO. With the option to convert back into a stunning residential home! Call us now for further information."
"Situated just a stone's throw from the High Street and amenities is Oakleigh House, an impressive Victorian Villa which is currently configured as an HMO (with a license in place until October 2027). The property retains lots of period features and is currently configured as ten letting rooms,..."
"A detached bungalow situated on the ever popular east side of Wells. With driveway parking, enclosed rear garden, 4/5 bedrooms with flexible accommodation, all within walking distance to the centre of Wells."
"A bright and spacious three bedroom detached family home set in a quiet and desirable cul-de-sac within the city centre. The property  benefits from some redecoration, a large south facing garden, garage and off road parking. Having been in the same ownership for a number of years, t..."
"Situated on the desirable Ash Lane is this deceptively spacious detached bungalow nestled in a substantial and secluded spot of over 1/4 of an acre. During the present ownership is has been extended, rewired, replumbed, plastered and had replacement UPVC windows yet still offers scope for..."
"This beautifully presented and stylish detached home available to purchase with no onward chain! As the former show home of the popular Priory Fields development, it provides contemporary and spacious accommodation throughout whilst decorated to an impeccable standard."
A roomy new house in a quiet location in walking distance of schools and amenities. 
"An exceptional detached house within walking distance of the City centre. Offering neat and comfortable accommodation, comprising 3 bedrooms with master en-suite, two receptions, kitchen/diner and ground level W/C. Parking, a garage and a sunny south-facing garden with privacy, complement this pl..."
An imposing stone built semi-detached property built in 1902 with parking set in an elevated position on Bath Road. In need of modernisation and updating throughout. Offering generous living accommodation and a good sized garden. Accommodation Entering via the front porch which leads into the...
" Offered for sale with no onward chain.On the market for the first time since being built in the late 1980's this detached family home has been much loved, well maintained and both extended and upgraded in recent years. The current owners say that the position has been ideal with a primary school..."
SIMPLY A GREAT POSITION. A 4 bedroom house in a quiet setting on the City outskirts. Great value and favourable terms available.
Set within the heart of central Wells is this charming four bedroom cottage in need of a full scheme of modernisation with private garden and garage. Offered with no onward chain.
"A deceptively spacious detached bungalow in a desirable village location, close to the Cathedral city of Wells. The property enjoys views over countryside to the east and west and is presented in good order throughout. It benefits from a mature wrap around garden, driveway and detached double garage"
"A detached three bedroom home set on the ever desirable Stoberry Avenue with a large South-West facing garden, garage, parking and offered for sale with no onward chain. The property is presented in good order throughout whilst still offering scope to extend and improve further if desired."
"The Mayfair is a detached four-bedroom home that offers an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room alongside separate living and dining rooms. Upstairs, the master bedroom enjoys an en suite and there’s a bright family bathroom for the other three bedrooms. Bedroom four could be used as an office."
The Juniper - a beautiful 4-bed detached home offering excellent family accommodation. A large kitchen and dining area runs the width of the property with stunning bi-fold doors leading the garden allowing light to flood in. The separate spacious duel aspect living room offers a lovely area for a...
Get £10k towards your Stamp Duty! The Juniper - a beautiful 4-bed detached home offering excellent family accommodation. A large kitchen and dining area runs the width of the property with stunning bi-fold doors leading the garden allowing light to flood in. The separate spacious duel...
The Juniper - a beautiful 4-bed detached home offering excellent family accommodation. A large kitchen and dining area runs the width of the property with stunning bi-fold doors leading the garden allowing light to flood in. The separate spacious duel aspect living room offers a lovel...
A spacious three double bedroom detached bungalow set within a desirable and quiet cul de sac with outstanding countryside views over open fields. The property is presented in good order throughout whilst still offering scope for a new owner to place their mark.
"This beautiful former show home is situated on the northwest fringe of the Cathedral City of Wells. The property boasts well-planned and spacious family accommodation, as well as a landscaped west-facing garden. EPC rating B. "
The 4-bedroom Waysdale has been designed to offer extra space for growing families.
"An extended, detached bungalow set at the end of a cul de sac with views to the Mendips. Considerably improved and updated with a new kitchen, shower room and central heating boiler since 2016. Offering a particularly light and airy L-shaped reception room and a beautifully landscaped garden. No ..."
"A spacious three bedroom detached bungalow situated on a corner plot with beautiful gardens, ample parking, garage and offered with no onward chain. The property has been maintained to a good standard throughout and is located a short walk to the city centre."
"A beautifully stylish and deceptively spacious Victorian townhouse arranged over 3 floors, with 4 double bedrooms, including a renovated master bedroom on the top floor with shower room. Character features throughout, original tiling in the hallway and elegant fireplaces in multiple rooms. A sout..."
"SUPERB DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME..... We are thrilled to present to the market this excellent home. The property 'Riverview' boasts an abundance of space including four bedrooms, family bathroom, open plan living/dining room, spacious kitchen and ground floor WC. The rear of the property ..."
"A beautifully presented and deceptively spacious detached bungalow on the Eastern side of Wells.  Having been newly  decorated and carpeted throughout, this 'turn key' property benefits from an open plan sitting and dining room, conservatory, kitchen, two double bedrooms, shower room..."
An individual detached house built by the present owner in 2002 and now offered for sale with no onward chain. The property offers generous accommodation with four good sized bedrooms and plenty of living space. Outside the garden is low maintenance with a garage and plenty of parking. Accommo...
A splendid townhouse in a quiet setting within a short walk of the Market Place and Cathedral.
"Plot 1, Woodlands View is a 3 bedroom detached home that comprises of a sitting room, kitchen/dining room, utility, WC, family bathroom, master bedroom with an ensuite and a further 2 bedrooms with ample parking. Located in the preferred northeast area of the city, this exceptional 3 ..."
"Accommodation A well presented semi-detached house offering a particularly smart kitchen with additional living space and enjoying a south-facing garden. At the front of the property there is off road, driveway parking and a useful bike store area. The vendors have found a property and are keen ..."
A Georgian town house in a great location within a short walk of the Market Square and Cathedral. Comfortable with good living space and an inner courtyard. 
"A splendid three bedroom semi-detached family home with large south facing gardens, ample parking and situated within a quiet residential area close to the city centre. The property has been enhanced by the current owners whilst still offering scope to extend further if desired."
"This beautifully presented detached Victorian residence offers comfortable and spacious family living whilst retaining many original period features. Whilst providing easy access to the centre of Wells, the home further benefits from off-road parking, rear garden and multiple reception rooms."
"This beautifully presented and immaculate property provides comfortable family living within walking distance to the centre of Wells. Whilst situated in a popular residential area it provides: three bedrooms, kitchen/diner, separate living space, enclosed rear garden, garage and off-street parking."
"Here at Purplebricks we are excited to present to the market this three bedroom home in the centre of Wells. The property comprises over three floors including three good sized bedrooms, a modern family bathroom, large dining area, lovely cosy lounge, kitchen, utility area and sun room. The outsi..."
"Situated just a short walk from Wells city centre, this spacious four bedroom mid-terrace townhouse makes a fantastic, generously proportioned and flexible family home. EPC rating B."
"Set on the edge of this popular development within a short, level walk of the city centre this spacious and well presented house enjoys flexible accommodation over three floors with an adjacent garage and driveway to the side and a low maintenance, enclosed garden to the rear. Viewing highly reco..."
"Short walk from the City Centre, a four bedroom semi detached townhouse, generously proportioned and flexible family home with well appointed kitchen, spacious sitting/dining room, four bedrooms with master ensuite. Enclosed low maintenance garden, driveway and single garage. EPC rating B."
"A beautifully finished apartment in central Wells with two double bedrooms, ensuite facilities, excellent living space and communal areas all within this attractive development."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom house finished to an exemplary standard, after being enhanced by the current owner, with 8 1/2 years of new build NHBC guarantee remaining. The property has been updated both internally and externally to create a beautiful turn key home on the outskirt..."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom semi-detached home with double garage, ample parking, large south facing gardens (approx. 0.15 of an acre) and offered with no onward chain. The property has been enhanced by the current owner and is presented in an immaculate condition and offe..."
"Offering exceptional, modern and contemporary accommodation this property sits in an elevated position, with glorious views to the front towards Tor Woods, just minutes from the highly attractive heart of the Cathedral City of Wells. EPC rating E. "
"A well-proportioned and bright three/four bedroom family home with stunning views over the Somerset countryside to both the front and rear. This property, originally built as staffing accommodation for the local Mendip hospital, is beautifully presented and has been updated by the current owne..."
"Built in 2021 and set on the edge of the Foxglove Heights development by Persimmon this property is offered for sale with no onward chain and has well presented, versatile accommodation over three floors. With a garage and driveway to the side there is a pleasant garden to the rear. Viewing highl..."
A splendid four bedroom semi-detached family home set within a popular and quiet residential area and having a lovely view towards Tor Woods. The property has been enhanced and extended by the current owners with the more recent addition of a brand new boiler and is presented in good order thr...
"Built in 2022, this immaculate three bedroom double fronted detached house, with a garage and enclosed garden is situated within a new development on the Edge of the stunning City of Wells. EPC rating B. "
"A well presented semi-detached house extended in recent years to the ground floor with an additional reception room and ground floor W.C. as well as having a stylish dining kitchen and modern shower room. Garage and parking to the rear and a low maintenance, sun-trap garden. Definitely one to vie..."
"A Grade II Listed cottage within a short, level walk of the High Street and enjoying an 85' long, south-facing garden. In excellent order throughout the property was re-roofed in 2019 and a new kitchen and shower room fitted since 2021. Viewing highly recommended. No onward chain. Accommodati..."
"A newly built end terrace four bedroom townhouse, offering flexible living accommodation as well as a garage, driveway and garden. The property has been finished to an excellent standard and includes a spacious and light open plan kitchen/ dining /living space as well as a cloakroom and util..."
"Set on popular Priory Fields Development on the North-Western fringes of the city is this spacious mid-terrace town house with enclosed rear garden, garage and parking. The recently completed property is presented in 'turn key' condition with all flooring and carpets already fitted and offers ..."
"A brand new four bedroom terraced property, finished to a high specification and with great attention to detail, focusing on the essentials of family living."
"Set on the popular Priory Fields Development on the North-Western fringes of the city is this spacious end of terrace town house with enclosed rear garden, garage and parking. This recently completed property offers versatile accommodation over three floors, has all carpets and flooring newly ..."
"A brand new four bedroom end of terrace property, finished to a high specification and with great attention to detail, focusing on the essentials of family living."
"A newly built terraced four bedroom townhouse, offering flexible living accommodation as well as a garage, driveway and garden. The property has been finished to an excellent standard and includes a spacious and light open plan kitchen/ dining /living space as well as a cloakroom and utility..."
"Set within the popular Priory Fields Development on the North-Western fringes of the city is this spacious mid-terrace town house with enclosed rear garden, garage and parking. This recently completed property offers versatile accommodation over three floors and is presented in 'turn key' cond..."
"An exceptional three bedroom semi-detached house presented in an immaculate condition throughout with 8 years remaining on the NHBC new build guarantee and offered with no onward chain. The property is less than two years old and has been further enhanced by the current owners, with planting a..."
"A roomy period house in the heart of Wells, near the Cathedral. Good accommodation and a pleasant garden. Available on a freehold or leasehold basis "
"A beautifully presented four bedroom house, a short level walk to the City Centre and with a garage and low maintenance garden. This stunning house offers flexible accommodation with a generous open plan kitchen, living and dining space on the ground floor as well as a study, cloakroom and a..."
"A stunning and enchanting Grade II Listed apartment in central Wells with two double bedrooms, views to the Market Square and Cathedral, excellent living space, communal gardens and designated parking. Must be viewed and being sold with no onward chain. "
"This beautifully presented semi-detached home is situated on a popular residential location towards the outskirts of Wells. Providing easy access to local amenities, it also benefits from: master bedroom with en suite, separate cloakroom WC, garage, off-street parking and spacious rear garden."
"A light and spacious three bedroom semi-detached home set within a quiet cul de sac with garage, parking and gardens. The property is only 2 years old and has 8 years remaining on the NHBC guarantee."
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached property in a desirable location on the popular East side of Wells. Just a short walk to the Bishops Palace with access to nearby countryside. It offers generous accommodation, in particular, the open plan kitchen / dining area. Accomodation A well..."
"A well presented extended semi-detached family home within a sought after location on the East side of Wells. The property offers good sized rooms, gardens to front and back and is within walking distance to Wells City Centre. The accommodation downstairs comprises of a good sized family lo..."
"A beautifully renovated Grade II listed, three bedroom, character cottage set within the heart of Wells and offered with no onward chain. The property, dating back to the 1880's, has been enhanced by the current owner and provides the perfect balance of modern convenience whilst still retainin..."
Renovated and extended in 2017 this semi-detached house is offered for sale with no onward chain and with everything the modern family would want. A blank canvas for the next owner to put their stamp on. Of particular note is the south-facing garden to the rear extending to 70' x 31'. Accommo...
"A splendid three bedroom semi-detached family home offering a wealth of potential to extend and enhance, situated on a large corner plot and offered with no onward chain. The property has been within the same ownership since new in 1967, subsequently extended to the rear but still offering sco..."
"No onward chain! A 3 bedroom semi detached house with masses of scope to extend (stpp) with driveway and garage and a good sized rear garden. Within an easy walk of the city centre and a number of local schools. Viewing highly recommended to see the potential this house offers. Accommodation..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £340,000. 3 bed semi detached property with fantastic potential to create open plan living or extend. Located in a quiet cul-de-sac. Fitted kitchen plus 2 reception rooms. Enclosed rear garden, detached garage & off road parking."
"A charming period cottage retaining many period features and offering well presented accommodation. Set in the popular St Cuthbert Street very close to the city centre with all its shops and amenities. The property comprises of a beautiful lounge with wood flooring, exposed brickwork and woo..."
A 2 storey apartment in a beautiful Georgian building close to the Cathedral and Market Place. Garage. Parking. Private and communal gardens.
"An immaculate top floor apartment in this sought after, gated development in the very heart of the city. With off road parking and pretty, communal courtyard gardens this oasis of calm and peace has direct access into the Market Place. A lovely mixture of period charm and contemporary living. No ..."
An exceptional two double bedroom property situated on the desirable Bishops Green development presented in immaculate order throughout. Occupying a similar floor area of the three bedroom properties number 7 has been designed with two master suites on the first floor. EPC:C
Set in a popular residential area on the southern side of the city with a level plot and a pleasant open outlook to the front this semi-detached bungalow has lots to recommend it. The property has been re-roofed and rewired in recent years with improvements also made to the gas fired central heat...
A modern end of terrace house with three bedrooms and extended ground floor accommodation incorporating a stylish conservatory/living room. Set within a residential cul de sac offering well presented accommodation and an easily maintained garden. Viewing is highly recommended on this very tidy pr...
A deceptive three bedroom grade II listed character property set within the heart of South Horrington with lovely southerly views over beautifully maintained gardens. The property is presented in excellent order throughout and benefits from two off road parking spaces.
A substantial four bedroom town house situated within the centre of Wells with a private garden.  The property had been completely redecorated throughout and is offered with no onward chain.
"A splendid three bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated within a quiet residential area with large gardens, garage, ample parking and offered with no onward chain. The property has been within the same ownership for over 25 years and whilst presented in good order throughout could also benefi..."
"A well presented, terraced cottage-style house built in the early 1990's with a garage and south-west facing garden. Within a short level walk of the High Street yet tucked away in a quiet and peaceful setting. Offered for sale with no onward chain. Accommodation An open porch contains a cupb..."
"A stunning first floor, two bedroom apartment with it's own garden. Set within a beautiful, recently renovated and restored Georgian house in the very heart of the centre of Wells - within 200m of the High St, Cathedral and Market Place. The apartment benefits from an open plan living area, en..."
"This well-presented end-terrace home is situated in a sought after and popular residential development providing easy access to the centre of Wells. It benefits from three bedrooms, off-street parking, and an enclosed rear garden and is certainly ideal for a wide variety of buyers including investor"
"A well presented mid-terraced bungalow offering parking for two cars and a generous level garden to the front and rear. Set on a no through road within a short walk of the High Street and having undergone significant updating since 2018 including a new gas fired boiler, re-wiring, new kitchen and..."
"An exceptional two bedroom penthouse apartment, nestled discreetly behind the High street and benefiting from direct access to the High Street, Priest Row and Union Street. Set in King Alfred's Court Yard - a development of eighteen luxury homes and apartments for the over 55s. Built around a ..."
"A splendid two bedroom semi-detached bungalow in need of modernisation in the desirable cul-de-sac of Manning Close. The property offers lots of scope to enhance and improve, subject to the necessary consents and is offered with no onward chain."
"Charming Grade II listed cottage in a city centre location. Plenty of character combined with a comfortable, modern finish and a generous rear garden."
Tucked away off medieval St Thomas Street this character Grade II Listed cottage offers masses of charm and period features and has been more recently used as a holiday let. A pretty and low maintenance courtyard lies to the front and offered for sale with no onward chain. Definitely one to view!...
"Just 1.5 miles from the stunning Cathedral in Wells, this stylish property offers bright, characterful accommodation within the Mendip former hospital complex, originally designed by Sir Gilbert Scott in South Horrington village, complete with two parking spaces. EPC rating D. "
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this stunning one bedroom first floor apartment. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in fantastic order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture and has a f...
"HUGE OPPORTUNITY.... We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning three bedroom home in the popular village of 'South Horrington'. The property comprises over two floors. The ground floor offers two reception areas, kitchen and WC. A living area and dining area opened into the one room. ..."
"Take a look inside this three bedroom End Terrace property located in a quiet cul de sac within a stone’s throw from central Wells. This property would benefit from some updating but has great potential for someone’s next dream home. The property has a Lounge/Diner, kitchen and bathro..."
"A splendid two bedroom second floor apartment set within the desirable Carlton Court with an abundance of natural light and offered with no onward chain. The spacious property is presented in good order throughout and is situated just a stone's throw from The Cathedral, The Market Place and re..."
"A top floor apartment in this ever popular purpose-built development for the over 55's with a particularly fine double aspect sitting room diner offering light and airy accommodation. Set in a very central yet quiet location with a good range of communal facilities including garden, guest suite a..."
"A splendid two bedroom detached home situated within a quiet cul de sac within easy reach of the city centre and countryside walks. The property is presented in immaculate order throughout, benefits from underfloor heating and would make a fantastic first time purchase, investment or downsize...."
Charming character cottage set in the heart of the City of Wells just a stone's throw from the High Street. The property has a courtyard garden and is for sale with no onward chain.
"Set within walking distance of Wells high street is the characterful 2 bedroom cottage. Internally comprises two double bedrooms, living room, kitchen and bathroom and benefits from stacks of period features throughout. Other benefits include gas central heating and enclosed courtyard at the rear..."
"A first floor flat within this purpose-built development for the over 55's and enjoying a southerly aspect. Set in the very heart of the city centre just a short, level walk from the Market Place. Offered for sale with no onward chain. Accommodation A communal hallway with the development m..."
A characterful maisonette set on the Cathedral Green with wonderful views of the west front of the Cathedral. The accommodation is spread over the first and second floors of this Grade II Listed period building with the unusual feature of a small roof garden. Offered for sale with no onward chain...
A delightful period ground floor apartment with charm and character situated within a superb central location close to the Cathedral. Renovated by the current owners to light and bright property with a spacious accommodation and sizeable shared garden with one other apartment. A perfect 'lock...
"Situated on the Eastern side of Wells, is this charming two bedroom semi-detached period cottage with off road parking. The property offers scope to be enhanced and improved if desired and is offered to the market with no onward chain."
"Situated in the desirable Cathedral City of Wells, Somerset famous for the movie Hot Fuzz, and only a short walk to Waitrose, this affordable Two Double Bedroom Maisonette with Allocated Parking is a must view! "
"A two bedroom retirement apartment in a quiet and tranquil setting right in the heart of Wells, adjacent to the Market Place and very close to the Cathedral."
"On the outskirts of the Cathedral City of Wells, this stunning Grade II Listed two bedroom character property, with the benefit of communal gardens and parking, is situated in the popular village of South Horrington. As well as it’s highly eye-catching presence, this property is ideal for a..."
Set within the ever-popular Mondyes Court sits this particularly spacious and well-presented two bedroom first floor retirement apartment. The property benefits from 'Tunstall' pull cord emergency response system for added piece of mindand is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
In need of updating and refurbishment is this spacious maisonette set in a very central location with the advantage of a private entrance and large rooms. Accommodation The accommodation is spread over the first and second floors with large sash windows overlooking Sadler Street.From the fir...
"A characterful 2 bedroom property, well situated within the popular village of South Horrington, just outside the City of Wells."
"On the outskirts of the beautiful Cathedral City of Wells, this two bedroom house forms part of the stunning Grade II listed former hospital in South Horrington and benefits from communal gardens and parking. This lovely property would make a perfect first purchase, bolt hole or traditional buy-t..."
Set in a popular development by David Wilson within a level walk of the city centre this ground floor flat is the largest design on the site with a double aspect living room and principal bedroom with en suite shower room. Allocated parking space and secure storage area. No onward chain. Accom...
"Price represents a 50% equity share with Home Reach part-buy-part-rent.The Spruce is a lovely 3 bedroom home, perfect for a small family who wants to upsize. Downstairs features an open plan kitchen & dining area with separate utility and patio doors to garden. There is also a cloa..."
"Price represents a 50% equity share with Home Reach Shared OwnershipThe Spruce is a lovely 3 bedroom home, perfect for a small family who wants to upsize. Downstairs features an open plan kitchen & dining area with separate utility and patio doors to garden. There is also a cloakro..."
"A well-presented two bedroom first floor apartment with a sunny southerly aspect and no onward chain. The property is situated in the desirable development of The Cloisters and within easy reach of the city centre. Within the development is a house manager, a communal lounge with regular event..."
"Situated in a quiet area in the centre of Wells, just a stone's throw from the High Street, The Cloisters is a beautifully maintained collection of apartments for the over 55's. This well-maintained retirement community benefits from a house manager, lift and residents lounge. All communal are..."
Beautifully presented and with no onward chain this upper floor flat is rather special. In the same ownership since new the property enjoys a southerly aspect from all of its windows with a view of Wells Cathedral. Another point to mention is the extra dressing area (or study) that runs off the b...
"On the outskirts of the City Centre of Wells, this fantastic 2 bedroom, first floor apartment is located in the popular village of South Horrington. In addition to its highly attractive presence, communal gardens, private parking and visitor space, the apartment is ideal for a bolt hole, holiday ..."
"A smart, 1 bedroom, low maintenance home for first time buyers or downsizers. Downstairs features a large open-plan kitchen/dining/living area and a cloakroom/wc. Upstairs is a large bedroom and a bathroom with a modern, white suite. The Rose benefits from ample amounts of storage and..."
"** Ideal first time buyer or investment property -yield of approximately 5.25% ** A well presented ground floor maisonette with a garden and parking, close to the centre of Wells. Accommodation comprises of a generous sized lounge diner opening into a kitchen with appliances. There is ..."
"** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUYER OR INVESTMENT PROPERTY- Yields approximately 5.5% ** A well presented, purpose built, two bedroom ground floor apartment with a courtyard garden and allocated parking, just a short walk from the City Centre. The spacious hall leads into a large open plan Loun..."
"Just minutes from the heart of the ever-popular Cathedral City of Wells, this conveniently located retirement apartment sits on the second floor of Mondyes Court, with west facing Juliette balcony with views out. EPC rating B."
"Price represents a 50% equity share with Home Reach Shared OwnershipLight, airy open-plan kitchen/dining area opens through French doors to a private rear garden, giving you plenty of room to relax and entertain friends. There's even a cloakroom for your guests. Both bedrooms span th..."
"One of the largest flats in the development this first floor flat (served by a lift) for the over 60's has been refurbished in recent years with a new heating system, fitted kitchen, flooring and redecorated throughout. Set within a short, level walk of the city centre the property is offered..."
A well-presented one bedroom first floor retirement apartment in the ever popular Mondyes Court. The property is conveniently placed in the main building and can be accessed via both stairs and a lift. The apartment also benefits from 'Tunstall' pull cord emergency response system for added pi...
Built by Persimmon Homes and offering variable rates of shared ownership (minimum of 40%) these are an ideal way to get out of rented accommodation and into your own home. Brand new with a 10 year NHBC warranty each of these 3 bedroom properties offers a rear garden and off road parking for 2 car...
Set on the corner of this purpose built development for the over 60's this first floor flat overlooks the communal gardens to the rear of the building and has both a double aspect living room and a window in the kitchen - unusual in this development. Offered for sale with no onward chain. Acc...
*** BRAND NEW 2021 DELTA SWANLEY HOLIDAY LODGES *** BEAUTIFUL IDYLLIC LOCATION WITH FABULOUS VIEWS AND ROLLING COUNTRYSIDE *** 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS *** EN SUITE TO MAIN *** DRESSING ROOM OFF EACH BEDROOM *** MAIN BATHROOM *** OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/KITCHEN/DINER *** LONG 50 YEAR LEASE *** 12 MONTHS A YEAR...
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this second floor flat for the over 60's within easy reach of the city centre and enjoying lovely communal gardens and residents' parking. Other facilities include a communal lounge, laundry, emergency call system and a development manager overseeing the s..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this first floor flat for the over 60's within easy reach of the city centre and enjoying lovely communal gardens and residents' parking. Other facilities include a communal lounge, laundry, emergency call system and a development manager overseeing the sm..."
A spacious second floor flat within this purpose-built development for the over 55's. The building is served by a lift and there is residents' parking and communal garden and courtyards. THE QUOTED PRICE REPRESENTS 70% SHARED EQUITY. ANY POTENTIAL PURCHASER WILL NEED TO BE APPROVED BY THE HOUSIN...
A spacious first floor flat within this purpose-built development for the over 55's. The building is served by a lift and there is residents' parking and communal garden and courtyards. THE QUOTED PRICE REPRESENTS 70% SHARED EQUITY. ANY POTENTIAL PURCHASER WILL NEED TO BE APPROVED BY THE HOUSING...
"A stunning property that artfully blends Victorian period features with contemporary city living. Situated in the very exclusive Oram's Arbour neighbourhood. Offering three bedrooms, two bathrooms, social kitchen/dining room, warm living room, and truly spectacular far-reaching views."
Excellent development opportunity on the edge of Winchester and the South Downs National Park. The site is currently occupied by a 64-bed care home. It is a substantial red brick building over three storeys with a basement which is used for storage and plant equipment. The original (central) pa...
"A landmark listed Regency house elevated, with wonderful views of St. Cross Hospital, St Catherine’s Hill and as far as the Isle of Wight. Mantua House, is undoubtedly one of the finest semi-detached grade II listed town houses in the city. Built in 1837 and designed within a curved crescent o..."
An impressive contemporary house with extensive accommodation arranged as three main wings and a three storey tower around an attractive courtyard.
"The property is situated in a commanding south facing position on Sleepers Hill, a prestigious residential enclave, within easy reach of Winchester city centre. An impressive contemporary house with extensive accommodation arranged as three main wings and a three storey tower around an attractiv..."
"A distinctive ‘Arts and Crafts’ designed home, set in stunning mature grounds of around 0.6 acre."
"Delightful Arts and Crafts family home with impressive accommodation of over 5,000 sq ft, positioned within delightful grounds of just over half an acre."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This impressive home offers four double bedrooms and wonderful ground-floor living accommodation, compl..."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This wonderfully spacious semi-detached home has a wealth of features and four generous double bedrooms."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This fantastic semi-detached property provides outstanding ground floor accommodation and four excellen..."
"An imposing detached family home in a prime location with fantastic gardens, plenty of off street parking and garaging"
"A simply stunning four bedroom end of terrace house with garage and parking, located within a premium position in Winchester benefitting from views across to the cathedral."
"A fantastic recently renovated Grade II listed end of terrace house, situated within one of the finest cathedral streets. Believed to date back to 1413 when it was reputedly a bakery, this special period property exudes original features, charm and character. The current owners have recently com..."
"An exceptional City residence, with parking, a garage and a stunning outlook."
A substantial detached family home within 0.4 mile of the High Street.
"A highly convenient five/six bedroom period family home with off street parking, a fantastic rear garden with outbuilding and within 0.2 miles of the railway station."
"An exceptionally rare opportunity to own a unique family home which was once the Evangelical Church of Hyde (built circa 1870 and converted in the 1980s). The property has been tastefully modernised and converted and now offers 2100 sq ft of stunning, well-proportioned accommodation across two fl..."
"A charming period home within a tranquil setting, close to Winchester Cathedral, the high street and walks out to the water meadows of St Cross and the Itchen Navigation."
"A five bedroom detached family home, close to Winchester city centre with far-reaching views. This property has a high degree of 'kerb appeal' with quality bricks underneath a clay tiled roof. The orientation of the house makes for light, bright and airy accommodation that offers not only an exc..."
"Five bedroom detached house within Kings School Catchment. Located just to the south-west edge of the City of Winchester, Westminster Gate is popular with families as it falls within catchment and a comfortable walk of St. Peter's Catholic Primary School and the well-regarded Kings' School. Thi..."
Substantial detached family home set on a wonderful plot of 0.34 acres.
"A highly versatile 4-bedroom detached property of nearly 3000 sq. ft. with garaging, parking for many cars and a bespoke, premium finish throughout."
"* Approx 2,263 sq ft * Immaculately Presented * Spacious Detached Family House * Private Road * Five Bedrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Three Bathrooms * Double Garage * Off Street Parking * Enclosed Garden *"
"This unique and characterful house is conveniently set within the heart of Winchester city. Dating back to approximately 1460, this Grade II listed property was, we understand, once occupied by the chief stone mason of Winchester Cathedral. Occupying an enviable central position within the city,..."
"Well extended townhouse with excellent accommodation approaching 3000sq.ft, perfectly located for the city and station."
Well-presented Victorian terrace house with spacious accommodation located in Fulflood close to Winchester station. This Victorian terrace house has well-presented and spacious accommodation. Tiled steps lead up to the front garden and to the entrance. The ground floor has a south-west facing s...
"A stunning detached modern home on the fringes of Winchester set back from the thoroughfare with great access to local amenities and schooling. Built in the summer of 2017, this property forms part of a small select development of only three houses in the prestigious north-west corner of Winchest..."
* Three Bedrooms plus Loft Studio * Three Reception Rooms * Two Bathrooms * Original Period Features * Off Street Parking * Enclosed Rear Garden * Electric Vehicle Charging Point * Catchment Area for All Saints Primary and Westgate Secondary Schools *
"**SHOW HOME NOW OPEN** A fantastic four-bedroom home with a south-facing garden. Situated to the front of the development and accessed via the main drive, this beautiful home benefits from an impressive modern layout including a contemporary kitchen with Quartz worktops and Miele ..."
"This substantial double fronted home constructed by Cala Homes in the 'Alfred' design is arranged over three floors and offers in excess of 3000 sq ft of well-proportioned accommodation. Internally the property provides an ideal contemporary layout, perfect for a growing family and has had a hug..."
* Four Double Bedrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Two Bathrooms * Off-Street Parking * Garage * Attractive Garden * Detached * Great Local Schools * 0.75 Miles from Winchester Train Station
"This exceptional waterside city property is located off The Broadway and overlooking the River Itchen providing tranquil living in a central location. This fabulous family home is beautifully presented with its reconfigured interior providing excellent family accommodation. Internally, on the e..."
"An impressive four-bedroom luxury home with beautiful accommodation set over three floors. The ground floor reception hall leads to a wonderful open-plan living area; a stunning Leicht kitchen, dining and family room complete with Quartz work surfaces, Bosch cooking equipment and integral Bosch ..."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This first-floor apartment offers two impressive double bedrooms complemented by stylish living accommo..."
"Dybles are delighted to present this stunning family home, located in the desirable area of Olivers Battery. An early viewing is highly advised to avoid disappointment."
"A truly unique detached period property once a formal Meeting Hall, conveniently situated close to city centre in the popular area of Fulflood. This unique detached property is positioned in the popular area of Fulflood and was formerly known as the ‘The Meeting Hall’ and ..."
A centrally located townhouse with parking.
* No Forward Chain * In Need of Modernisation * Detached * Four Bedrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Two Bathrooms and Additional WC * Off Street Parking and Integral Garage * Garden * Catchment for St Bede and Westgate Schools * Scope to Extend Subject to Planning *
"An outstanding dwelling just moments from the City Centre and mainline railway station, yet discreetly situated in a tranquil gated courtyard."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This truly impressive ground floor apartment offers contemporary living accommodation, two double bedro..."
"Occupying one of the most spectacular positions in this exclusive neighbourhood, this impressive detached home is a wonderful opportunity.  Offering five bedrooms including master suite, social kitchen, large garden room, living room, utility room, double garage/workshop, and off-road parking for..."
"An impressive and spacious detached family home, built around 1993, and set close to Winchester City centre. Exceptionally well-presented detached family home. The house forms part of an exclusive development of twelve homes originally built by Berkeley Homes in the 1990's. The house offers bala..."
"This modern family home, built in 2017 by Messrs Bovis Homes and designed by local architect the late Huw Thomas, which is situated in the highly favoured Winchester Village development. The spacious home, boasts accommodation in excess of 2000 ft, if you include the garaging and outbuildings. T..."
An exceptional luxury apartment in this prestigious setting overlooking Royal Winchester Golf Club.
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This spacious ground floor apartment with exceptionally high ceilings provides two impressive double be..."
* Four Bedrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Two Bathrooms * Kitchen/Breakfast Room * Office * Utility Room * Attractive Garden * Double Garage * Off Street Parking * Quiet Location *
"A substantial detached family home, with a modernised interior and spacious rooms."
"Modern contemporary house in a most sought-after location moments from the Arbour, Station and High Street."
A rare opportunity to acquire a versatile building in the historic heart of the city 
"Show Home Launch Saturday 18th March, 10am to 2pm"
Show Home Launch Saturday 18th March - 10am to 2pm.
"A FANTASTIC NEW DEVELOPMENT IN OLIVERS BATTERY, WINCHESTER Two parking spaces and a host of stylish features. 50% NOW SOLD OR RESERVED."
This exquisite Victorian town house has just undergone an extensive renovation throughout and now offers simply stunning accommodation finished to the highest of standard. Numerous features have been injected back into this family home using experienced craftmanship and the very best materials. ...
"Sophisticated, superbly presented and offering flexible, well-proportioned accommodation, this four-bedroom, three storey semi-detached town house has a generous interior and ample built in storage. There is an immediate sense of space and a light and airy feel throughout the versatile living acc..."
"Offered with no forward chain. This detached home of impressive proportions and exquisite finish quality is located within a convenient position and a short walk from the mainline station, yet within catchment of St. Bede primary and Westgate secondary schools."
"Fantastic five bedroom family home which was built in circa 2014 by renowned builders Redrow Homes and finished to a high standard, offering excellent well-proportioned accommodation with superb natural light through the house. The home is attractively positioned with many rooms overlooking wood..."
"Beautifully presented town house built in 2019, beautifully located in one of Winchester's most sought after roads, close to City centre, Hotel Du Vin, log fired pubs, cinema, and the bustling High Street with boutiques and restaurants. Designed by the renowned architect Huw Thomas, this tradit..."
" Formerly one of Winchester's main brewery houses, and the last to be closed, The Counting House now is a charming three-bedroom family home in Hyde, a sought-after location of Winchester. Upon entering the main area is a large open planned room which lends itself to a versatile way of livin..."
"Detached family home in a superb, quiet position within a most exclusive small development within King's School catchment, enjoying beautifully mature and well-tended front and rear gardens, together with an excellent double garage. This house is approached via a pathway to the front leading to t..."
"* No Forward Chain * Four Bedrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Detached * Garage * Garden Room * Front and Rear Gardens * Driveway Parking * Catchment for Weeke Primary, Henry Beaufort Secondary and Peter Symonds Sixth Form College *"
"A terrific family home near Oram's Arbour with impressive far-reaching views of the city. This period property is one of the most spacious in the road, with flexible accommodation spread over four floors, three bedrooms, three reception rooms, large studio, large garage and enclosed rear garden. ..."
This attractive and spacious detached family home is located in a quiet cul-de-sac enviably positioned within Kings School catchment. The property is approached via a driveway which provides off-road parking for a couple of vehicles and includes the converted garage which is now used as a separat...
* No Forward Chain * Detached Bungalow * Three Bedrooms * Two Reception Rooms * Study * Double Garage * Off Street Parking * Lovely Rear Garden * Quiet Location * Stunning Views over South Winchester Golf Course *
"Totalling 1400 sq ft, a beautiful late Georgian mid terrace, three storey property with south-east facing garden in a central Winchester location"
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY Charming house with flexible accommodation in one of the city's most sought after streets. EPC D
"Beautiful contemporary town house of c2000sq ft in the heart of Fulflood, just a moment's walk from the mainline railway station, local shops and amenities, and close to Winchester's High Street. The moment you enter this beautiful home you immediately get a sense of the imaginative and contempo..."
"A cleverly designed detached family home, with all the contemporary rooms, storage and comfort you need. The Abbey was designed by prestigious developers Cala Homes and offers flexible living and well-proportioned accommodation throughout to suit the needs of a family. A welcoming and spacious ..."
"A rare opportunity to own a superb three-storey family home boasting well- proportioned and versatile living accommodation. The whole property has been well maintained by the current owners. The front door opens onto an attractive entrance hall, off which is the light and spacio..."
"Dybles are delighted to present this spacious four bedroom home, located in Oliver's Battery. The home boasts a variety of features and benefits including ample parking, stunning views as well as a generously sized garden. "
Well-presented detached house within a cul-de-sac location.
"Detached bungalow with scope to modernise, set on a particularly private plot in excess of 0.25 acres."
"Unusually with its own front door, an elegant apartment with a striking kitchen, two bedroom suites and a west facing terrace with views towards Royal Winchester GC. There are two secure, gated underground parking spaces."
"Semi-detached house with exceptional ground floor extension, providing spacious family living within this sought-after position."
* No Forward Chain * Three Double Bedrooms * Two Reception Rooms * Modern Family Bathroom * Stunning Open Plan Kitchen/Dining Room * Downstairs Cloakroom * South Facing Garden * Catchment Area for Western and Westgate Schools * Close to Peter Symonds Sixth Form College *
"Fantastic opportunity to acquire this three-bedroom semi-detached home which is conveniently located in a sought-after road and within walking distance of the mainline railway station. The property is an ideal family home, offering versatile and well-proportioned accommodation throughout, with th..."
"Ewemove - A fantastic period townhouse within walking distance of the city centre, offered with no forward chain."
"Presented to the market for the first time since 1903, this handsome townhouse is spread over four floors and has spacious accomodation throughout. Appealing to both investors and residential buyers alike, the property offers four bedrooms, three reception rooms, enclosed rear garden, and no onwa..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this stunning and well presented townhouse located in central Winchester, a stones throw away from the city centre and mainline train station. Offering close to 1,150 sq ft of accommodation with two bathrooms, four bedrooms and a courtyard garden. "
"Spacious townhouse enjoying far reaching views across the city, with off road parking and a garage."
"Beautifully presented detached home, occupying a quiet position within this established cul-de-sac."
"SHOW HOME LAUNCH SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, 10AM until 3PM.
Langham Place is an exceptional new development by Alfred Homes comprising detached and semi-detached properties plus luxurious apartments. This smart home offers contemporary, open-plan ground floor accommodation complemented by two double be..."
A well presented 4 bedroom family home with a double garage and additional parking
"An excellent four bedroom detached property, located in Badger Farm, Winchester. Two bathrooms, one of each floor, four great sized bedrooms. Large well maintained garden, modern kitchen/diner with bespoke island. Two reception rooms. Driveway and double garage."
"Dybles, in partnership with Acer Renovations, are proud to present this stunning three bedroom period property. Located in Winchester City Centre, the home offers an abundancy of amenities. "
"A light and spacious modern townhouse with accommodation in excess of 1,200 sq. ft and benefiting from a stunning aspect."
"Quirky home with spacious accommodation throughout within this desirable position, close to riverside and countryside walks and the thriving city centre of Winchester along the picturesque Nuns Walk."
"A delightful Victorian home, tastefully modernised and extended and boasting off-road parking."
A stunning detached chalet bungalow set in popular and desirable Oliver's Battery. This four double bedroom property has recently been extended and will make a great family home. It has beautiful views overlooking South Winchester Golf Course.
"A characterful Victorian family home of four bedrooms with extended accommodation, established garden and fantastic central location between Orams Arbour and the Railway Station"
 A superbly located 3 bedroom period property within a short walk to the station
"* Approximately 1,540 sq ft * Four Bedrooms * Three Bathrooms * Three Reception Rooms * Office * Utility Room * Enclosed Rear Garden * Driveway Parking *"
"Home Three is situated to the western edge of the development, this elegant home benefits from an impressive modern layout including a contemporary kitchen with island and French doors opening directly onto a secluded rear garden. The ground floor also comprises a study, utility room and washroom..."
Impressive two bedroom spacious apartment within a mile of the city centre
"Dybles are delighted to present this four bedroom family home, located on the southern edge of Olivers Battery. This home is ideal for a prospective buyer looking to add their own touches to a property as well as having no forward chain. The property also includes off road parking as well as both..."
"***EXCLUSIVELY AVAILABLE FOR OVER 60'S*** Apartment 12 at Pegasus Winchester Holts in Winchester is a 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom home situated on the 2nd floor, spread across approximately 1,096 sq ft of living space."
"Apartment 12 is the largest of the remaining apartments at Winchester Holts. With two generous double bedrooms, both with built-in wardrobes, two shower rooms and a wonderful open-plan kitchen/dining/sitting room featuring a 18' private balcony with stunning views, this apartment is a hidden tre..."
"An impressive property within a conversion of nine homes in the Grade II listed St Thomas Church. There is a fully fitted kitchen on the ground floor with integrated Miele appliances in an open plan, vaulted living and dining space with a double-height ceiling. Off the hallway, there is a downst..."
"This extremely efficient, detached family home has recently been completed to an excellent standard and is located in a no through premier road within Oliver’s Battery. Internally the property provides comfortable accommodation spread traditionally across two floors, the first floor offerin..."
* Detached * Three Bedrooms * Two Bathrooms * Two Reception Rooms * Utility Room * Off Street Parking * Garden * Close to Local Amenities * Quiet Location * Catchment for Weeke Primary and Henry Beaufort Secondary *
"Dybles, in partnership with Acer Renovations, are proud to present this stunning three bedroom period property. Located in Winchester City Centre, the home offers an abundancy of amenities."
A wonderful townhouse requiring modernisation and affording a stunning view towards St Catherine's Hill.
"With a flexible layout that flows well, this detached four-bedroom home is centrally located within the popular Badger Farm. The property has been beautifully updated and extended to provide spacious rooms of good proportions. With its double aspect, the stunning 19 ft sitting room features slidi..."
A wonderful and spacious ground floor apartment with enviable proximity to the City
"This two-bedroom home is perfectly positioned on the edge of Orams Arbour and has been improved and refurbished by the current owner to a very high standard throughout. With well-proportioned accommodation over three floors, this property has a welcoming entrance room on the ground floor, which ..."
"A contemporary house (1,445 ft²) situated in a sought-after address, moments from the station and with an off-road parking space."
"***EXCLUSIVELY AVAILABLE FOR OVER 60'S*** Apartment 22 at Pegasus Winchester Holts in Winchester is a 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom home situated on the 1st floor, spread across approximately 909.2 sq ft of living space."
"This deceptively spaceous family home is located on the edge of a popular development, benefitting from excellent countryside views over green open space and a park. Internally the property offers in excess of 1800 sq ft of well-proportioned accommodation and is cleverly arranged over three floo..."
**LAST FEW APARTMENTS AVAILABLE** Apartment 22 is a superb 2 bedroom second floor corner apartment featuring a wonderful open-plan kitchen/sitting room with a beautiful fully fitted kitchen and double doors leading to a private balcony. This stylish apartment also boasts two double bedrooms...
"**LAST FEW APARTMENTS REMAINING** Apartment 28 is a fantastic 2 bedroom second floor corner apartment, with an open-plan kitchen/sitting room, two double bedrooms, two shower rooms and a double width private balcony. The master bedroom also benefits from build in wardrobes and there is a ha..."
"The extensive apartment spans over 1400 sq ft of accommodation. Built in 2011 by Beechcroft Developments, a leading developer of homes for the over 55's, Milesdown Place is an attractive gated development with underground parking and charming well maintained communal grounds. Number 12 is a grou..."
"Four bedroom detached home, located in in Harestock. This well presented home is ideal for a variety of buyers given the space on offer. The locality of the property benefits from a variety of amenities which include transport links, schools and shops. "
4 bedroom Grade II listed period cottage with private garden set in the heart of St. Cross and within catchment area for St. Faith's school.
"Fantastic detached family house with a garage and driveway, which is neatly positioned within a popular cul-de-sac location in a sought-after suburb to the south of Winchester. The house is very well presented and benefits from a large extension to the rear, which has added an additional receptio..."
This beautifully presented Victorian terraced home has been fully refurbished by the vendor and now provides exceptional modern living spaces with a number of features retained throughout. One of the properties most exciting attributes is the highly finished kitchen providing a timeless lo which...
"A spacious, ground floor, two bedroom apartment. Boasting an open plan living space, and luxurious principle suite. Gorgeous herringbone flooring running through the hallway, and open plan living space, making for a seamless flow throughout the home."
"Featuring an OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining/family room, with FRENCH DOORS out to the garden and a separate sitting room with BAY WINDOW. Bedroom 1 with EN SUITE & FITTED WARDROBE. Complete with SINGLE GARAGE & PARKING.."
"Situated in this ever-popular Kings Barton development built by Cala homes in 2018, this four-bedroom townhouse is finished to an impeccable standard and presented in near show home condition. The ground floor comprises a substantial 26'6 kitchen/dining room/family room with the kitchen equipped..."
A wonderful family home offering an abundance of flexible living space and situated just minutes from local amenities and public transport. The entrance door opens to an inner hallway with stairs to first floor. To the front of the house sits the spacious double aspect sitting/dining room. The...
"Dybles present to the market this spacious and stylish two bedroom home, located off of St Giles Hill."
"Superbly presented fully modernised home, retaining a wealth of original features, positioned just a short walk alongside the beautiful Itchen River from Winchester City Centre and the new Winchester Sport & Leisure Park. This delightful property enjoys accommodation arranged over several flo..."
"Wonderfully quirky three-bedroom home close to the city centre, boasting off road parking."
"This fantastic detached family home offers excellent scope to enhance the accommodation, with a very flexible layout. The entrance door opens to the welcoming hallway, with the benefit of a downstairs cloakroom and leading through to the full width sitting room, which hosts sliding doors to the ..."
Well-presented two-bedroom home with easy access to the city centre and within striking distance of the Winnall Moors Nature Reserve 
"***EXCLUSIVELY AVAILABLE FOR OVER 60'S*** Apartment 26 at Pegasus Winchester Holts in Winchester is a 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom home situated on the 2nd floor, spread across approximately 903.8 sq ft of living space. Set on a quiet, leafy road not far from the heart of this historic city."
A modern contemporary house moments from the station with an off-road parking space.
"** ANNEXE POTENTIAL** This well presented and extended detached family home in excess of 1400sqft offers flexible accommodation over two floors. The property benefits furthermore from driveway parking, entrance hall, large living room with gas fire, garage that has been converted to ..."
"Charming, characterful cottage withing striking distance of the train station and historic Winchester city centre."
"* Extended Property in Harestock * 1,550 sq ft * Very Spacious Over Two Floors * Well Presented * Three Bedrooms * Two Bathrooms * Three Reception Areas * Attractive Garden * Off-Road Parking *"
"Dybles are delighted to present this modernised two bedroom chalet bungalow, located in Teg Down. The property is ideal for a diverse variety of buyers given its high quality finish as well as the wide variety of amenities within the area. "
* Principal Bedroom with Dressing Area and En-Suite Bathroom * Two Further Double Bedrooms * Family Bathroom * Additional Cloakroom * Enclosed Rear Garden * Balcony * Garage * Off Street Parking * Cul-de-Sac Location * Kings' School Catchment *
Beautiful home featuring an open plan kitchen/dining/family room with French doors out to the garden and a separate sitting room. Upstairs bedroom 1 benefits from an EN SUITE & FITTED WARDROBE. Complete with SINGLE GARAGE & PARKING..
Exceptional two double bedroom apartment with private balcony and two allocated parking spaces.
"Attractive and well presented corner plot property with ample parking and enviable far reaching views. The moment you step through the front door, you immediately get drawn to the views ahead of you - westerly views across the golf course courtesy of a generous picture window within a wonderful ..."
"A wonderful two bedroom home, on the third floor of Galahad apartments. The home boasts south facing views off the main living area and a south/west facing balcony. Two allocated parking spaces within the secure underground car park."
"Superb modern family home neatly positioned within a popular development close to amenities on the north western edge of the City. The property is in excellent condition having been constructed in 2018. The ground floor includes a good size sitting/dining room, a stylish and contemporary kitchen ..."
"Fox and Sons are proud to bring to the market this very well presented, MODERN, THREE BEDROOMS, DETACHED FAMILY HOME which offers DOWNSTAIRS W/C, FAMILY ROOM, HOME OFFICE & DRIVEWAY PARKING. Located in the very desirable area of BADGER FARM, WINCHESTER."
Detached bungalow enjoying a large corner plot tucked away within this quiet and sought-after location.
"Ultra stylish brand new two-bedroom second floor apartment, within the sought-after new Berkeley Homes development, moments from the High Street."
"A bright and spacious ground floor, two bedroom apartment. A stunning herringbone floor runs through from first entrance, into the open plan living space. A gorgeous integrated kitchen, with feature shaker doors, is offset from a large living space. Floor to ceiling windows are fitted throughout."
"Superb detached family house which is beautifully presented throughout and benefits from a garage and driveway. The property is positioned within a popular cul-de-sac, nestled in the sought-after suburb of Badger Farm. The home is immaculately presented and has been greatly improved by the curre..."
"A modern and bright two-bedroom first floor Berkeley Homes apartment, offering stylish city living. "
"Stunning two bedroom apartment with balcony off the living area, stylish accommodation, dressing area underground parking, concierge service and communal gym."
"Attractive Victorian house in a quiet and sought after location in Fulflood, within walking distance of the mainline rail station and vibrant city centre."
"This substantial three bedroom ground floor apartment benefits from a stunning private garden incorporated in a small block of only three, whilst providing in excess of 1200sq ft of well-proportioned accommodation, with numerous, attractive and character features having been retained. The propert..."
Fox and Sons are delighted to offer to the market this delightfully presented 3 bedroom semi-detached property with well maintained rear garden and off road parking within walking distance to Winchester town centre.
Winchester Holts has been designed and built for those over 60s looking for an independent lifestyle. A spacious 2 bedroom apartment with two private balconies accessed from the living room and one from the main bedroom. 
"Four bedroom, mid terrace home, located in Olivers Battery. This large home is ideal for the family unit given its versatile space and a fantastic purpose built park and sports courts, minutes away from the home. Leading on from this family area are fields leading through to Hursley, ideal for ru..."
Stylish two double bedroom apartment with two en suites and all allocated parking in the city centre.
"A stunning two bedroom home in Lancelot apartments with a balcony overlooking the communal garden & far reaching views beyond. The home boasts a spacious main living space, with fully integrated kitchen, inclusive of wine cooler. Two large bedrooms; the principle with fitted wardrobes and ensuite."
"Characterful cottage dating back to the early 1800s, with private rear garden."
Well-presented modern home within striking distance of the thriving High Street and mainline train station offered with no forward chain.
"A STYLISH TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT IN DEVENISH HOUSE Two ensuites plus WC, open plan kitchen/living area, allocated parking and storage."
"A superbly presented, detached home enjoying a large corner plot within this tucked away position."
A charming Grade II listed cottage with a long west facing garden. Located at the heart of St Cross with a convenient access to the City.
"An amazing two bedroom home, on the first floor of Galahad apartments. The home boasts south facing views of the communal garden, and two good sized double bedrooms, one of which comes with ensuite and fitted wardrobe. Designated underground parking."
"A fantastic new three-bedroom property by Imperial Homes, in the popular area of Oliver's Battery. "
"Dybles are delighted to present this three bedroom home, located in Bar End. The home is ideal for a purchaser looking for a renovation on a home located within walking distance to Winchesters thriving high street. An early viewing is highly advised to avoid disappointment."
"A two bed apartment in an imposing 18th Century, Grade II Listed building. An imposing 18th Century, Grade II Listed building, sympathetically converted into just 4 luxury two-bedroom apartments, each occupying an entire floor of this magnificent building. Pennyfarthing House has been carefully ..."
* Three Bedroom Terraced House * Sitting/Dining Room * Modern Kitchen * Attractive Family Bathroom * Conservatory * Low Maintenance Courtyard Style Garden * Two Parking Spaces * Renewable Energy Air Source * Fantastic Forest Trails and Walks * Great School Catchment Area *
"Charming period terraced home found in an appealing position in Hyde in Winchester and within St Bede CE Primary School catchment. The house is also close to the railway station, Riverside Park Leisure Centre and the vibrant city centre. From the welcoming entrance on arrival you move through to..."
A charming two bedroom terraced home located in the popular Hyde area of Winchester.
"A brand new two-bedroom ground floor apartment, within the sought-after new Berkeley Homes development, moments from the High Street."
"Found in a quiet cul-de-sac, backing onto an open park, comes this delightful three-bedroom linked detached home which is conveniently located within walking distance of the local shops, amenities and excellent schools. The sunny entrance hall guides you into the home, leading to a fully integrat..."
"Beautiful semi-detached modern home set back from the road and occupying a corner position with a large garden and potential to extend subject to planning. The bright entrance hall guides you into the home and allows access to the stylish sitting room, designed with bespoke taste and perfect for ..."
" Located within the highly sought-after development of Holly Meadows is this immaculately presented two double bedroom, first floor apartment offering more than 1200 sq ft of accommodation with stunning views over the communal gardens. On entering the property, you are welcomed by a spacious ..."
Plot 6 - 50% Now Sold or Reserved in Cromwell Place - 3 Houses Remaining - A fantastic 3 bedroom home with 2 bathrooms & 2 parking spaces. Available now.
"Located in a peaceful position in the heart of Winchester, within walking distance to the stations, High Street and all the attributes this desired location offers. Both Western and Westgate schools are within catchment area (both rated “good” by Ofsted). Internally the house offers ..."
Well-presented link-detached house close to excellent amenities and moments from The Ridge.
"Fabulous two bedroom apartment with balcony off the living area, stylish accommodation, underground parking, concierge service and communal gym."
"Beautifully presented semi-detached home located within this popular development, close to the thriving city centre and countryside."
A modern two bedroom apartment located in the city centre and benefitting from allocated parking. This fantastic property makes for an ideal investment opportunity.
"Immaculate and upgraded modern link-detached home situated on the lower slopes of Badger Farm, close to The Ridge on the southern edge of the city. The entrance hall has stairs to the first floor and doors through to the cloakroom, modern fitted kitchen and sitting/dining room. The kitchen has be..."
"Located in a premier development in central Winchester, this unique apartment offers two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, two balconies and provides a very attractive and flexible layout. The property is nicely positioned within the block offering an excellent aspect across the entire apartm..."
This modern two bedroom house benefits from two allocated spaces directly in front of the property offering a very convenient set up. Internally the property provides a nicely planned kitchen with granite worksurfaces and ample storage. Towards the back of the property is the open plan lounge/d...
"This charming and unique property is nestled within a statement Grade II listed building, conveniently located at the end of Winchester High Street and opposite the beautiful Abbey Gardens. The well-proportioned rooms are arranged over three floors, providing excellent accommodation in a very f..."
"Modern end terrace house, with well-proportioned accommodation over two floors and a low maintenance garden."
"Splendid three bedroom mid-terrace home, which benefits from new windows, rear doors and has been fully rewired, replastered and recently decorated. The property enjoys a generous sitting room to the rear with lovely views out to the good-sized garden and French doors opening to the decked terra..."
A fabulous ground floor city centre apartment with parking and use of a garden terrace.
HOME OF THE MONTH. Stunning family home featuring a HIGH SPECIFICATION kitchen and a spacious dining/sitting room with French doors out to the garden. Upstairs bedroom 1 benefits from an EN SUITE & FITTED WARDROBE..
Bright and airy ground floor apartment enjoying a private courtyard and additional terrace which provides immediate access to the stunning communal gardens.
"A well-presented top floor flat with two bedrooms, two bathrooms, balcony, communal gardens, lift and two dedicated parking spaces."
"Individual two-bedroom semi-detached property with deceptively spacious accommodation hosting an elegantly shaped exterior façade within this prestigious development, whilst only a short walk from Winchester’s city centre and mainline train station. The Royal Hampshire County Hospit..."
"A superb city centre apartment with allocated parking, lift access and a fantastic open plan Kitchen/Living space with floor to ceiling windows."
Perfectly presented ground floor apartment with sole use of the adjoining terrace garden and two allocated parking spaces directly in front of the block. The property is found in a modern development on Chilbolton Avenue in a prestigious area of Winchester. The building is approached via a level ...
"Within close proximity of Winchester Train Station and boasting three double bedrooms, this stunning second floor apartment offers a superb city centre location with all the convenience of local amenities, restaurants and bars being on your doorstep."
Sensational city centre living and within an easy walk to the mainline railway station and the High Street. The apartment is entered via an entrance hallway providing access to the living accommodation and benefits from a secure entry system. This two bedroom ground floor apartment has engineere...
"Three bedroom semi-detached house in the desirable area of Winchester boasting spacious open plan living, This home features a large kitchen diner, lounge with a brick fire place, three bedrooms, a modern shower room, garden and off road parking. A perfect home for a growing family."
Ewemove - A modern terraced family home on the outskirts of Winchester offered with no forward chain.
"Dybles present this 5 bedroom home ideal for investors, located in Stanmore, Winchester. This home has scope as both a family home and additionally a prospective investment. "
Spacious semi-detached home with far reaching views and excellent accommodation arranged over two floors.
"A fantastic two double bedroom home in Winchester Village with a south westerly facing garden. Parking for two cars, home office area and the onward chain complete."
* No Forward Chain * First Floor Apartment * Sitting/Dining Room * Kitchen * Two Double Bedrooms *Bathroom * Communal Garden with Garden Shed * Allocated Parking * Close to Local Amenities *
* No Forward Chain * Three Bedrooms * Kitchen/Dining Room * Sitting Room * Family Bathroom * Garden * Home Office * Garage Nearby and Off Street Parking * Close to Local Amenities * Catchment for Kings Secondary School - Rated Outstanding by Ofsted *
"Cathedral View is located within the historic and characterful Old Highcliffe square. The property has an abundance of charm with easy access to Chesil Street, College Street, and onwards to the High Street and the cathedral, all of which are within a few minutes walking distance. This attractiv..."
"Stunning modern apartment built in 2018 and conveniently located in the heart of Winchester within easy reach of a range of cultural, leisure and shopping facilities, including the cathedral, shops, restaurants and the mainline railway station. This beautiful apartment boasts ample storage and we..."
"Purplebricks, Winchester, are delighted to bring to the market this superb and full of character maisonette with fabulous far reaching views across the city towards the Cathedral! The accommodation on the ground floor includes a spacious sitting room, and a well fitted and good sized dual aspect ..."
** FOUR BEDROOMS ** SOLD WITH NO CHAIN ** DRIVEWAY ** CLOSE TO LOCAL SHOPS AND AMENITIES ** REAR ENCLOSED GARDEN ** TWO BATHROOMS ** LARGE LOUNGE/DINING ROOM ** SEPARATE KITCHEN **
"Two bedroom mid terrace home, located a short walk from Winchester City Centre, boasting stylish presentation. "
"Fabulous two bedroom, second floor apartment, which forms part of a superb conversion within an enviable central location and within an easy walk to the mainline railway station and the High Street. The apartment is entered via an entrance hallway providing access to the living accommodation and..."
"Period charm with stunning cathedral views. This superb two-bedroom semi-detached house has a garden running down to the River Itchen, together with a roof top terrace and is conveniently set within the heart of Winchester city, only a short walk from the thriving town centre and the main line ra..."
** OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN ** THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE ** DRIVEWAY FOR OFF ROAD PARKING ** DOWNSTAIRS WC AND UTILITY ** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ** LARGE REAR GARDEN WITH SIDE ACCESS ** THREE GOOD SIZED ROOMS **
"* Fantastic Central Location * Two Bedrooms * Two Bathrooms * Spacious Sitting/Dining Room * Private Balcony * Communal Gardens * Off Street Parking * Catchment Area for St Bede and Westgate Schools * Vendor will cover the first 12 months of management, service and estate management fees as part ..."
"Exceptional ground floor apartment, set within the prestigious walled development of Marston Gate. The property is within walking distance to both Winchester city centre and the mainline railway station. Internally the apartment benefits from two large built-in storage cupboards in the entrance..."
"Immaculate, spacious, two-bedroom end of terrace house built by CALA Homes in 2017. Set in a pleasant position on the very popular Kings Barton development just north of Winchester City Centre. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom, superb contemporary fitted kitche..."
"Wonderful two bedroom apartment situated on the basement floor of this sensational development, conveniently situated in the heart of Winchester city centre. Converted to the highest of contemporary standards, the apartment benefits from its own entrance. There is an exclusive, private lower pa..."
"Immaculate apartment enjoying stunning, far-reaching views within this elevated position."
"A fantastic ground floor two double bedroom apartment in Argyll Court, St Cross. Two bathrooms, courtyard garden, allocated parking, visitors' parking."
Striking and immaculately presented top floor apartment with private balcony and far-reaching views.
5 bedroom student property located in Winnall. This home also has the versatility of being used as a three bedroom family home.
A superb ground floor city flat with parking.
"Three bedroom mid terrace home, located in Stanmore. The home is presented to a tasteful standard, offering ease to a prospective buyer."
**No Forward Chain** ***Please click the brochure button near the bottom of the Rightmove advert or visit the Purplebricks website to book a viewing 24 hours a day*** This stylish second floor apartment is in an excellent location within walking distance of Winchester Train Station and the City...
"This terrific end of terrace property has been recently refurbished to a very high standard throughout. Offering two double bedrooms, spacious sitting room, newly fitted kitchen, bathroom, enclosed rear garden with side access, garage in block, and no onward chain."
"A spacious ground floor apartment within walking distance to Winchester city centre and railway station. Offering two bedrooms, open-plan kitchen and living room, ensuite and family bathroom, two allocated parking spaces, and no onward chain."
"An attractive two bedroomed detached freehold coach house tucked away in a mews development built in 2005, located within the northern fringes of the city, close to shops, restaurants and mainline railway station. From the front door, stairs lead up to the accommodation on the first floor. Here,..."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 to £375,000. A 3 double bedroom house situated in the popular Badger Farm area on the south side of the city of Winchester near to local amenities and in the catchment for Kings school. Internal accommodation is well laid out and offers a 16ft 9 lounge, 12ft 6 kitchen, 3 do..."
A spacious first floor apartment with lift access.
Tenants in Situ - Views towards St Catherine's Hill - two bedrooms and a garage with this spacious first floor apartment in St Cross.
"*NEW RELEASE* Stylish one bedroom apartment with balcony, allocated parking space and residents gym & on site concierge service"
"Fox and Sons are proud to bring to the market this immaculate apartment, which is located in central Winchester. This ground floor apartment offers two bedrooms, two shower rooms, a spacious lounge with doors leading into the gardens, immaculate kitchen with window and small study/storage room."
"A terrific apartment within the desirable area of St Cross. Offering two double bedrooms, spacious living room with balcony, bathroom, kitchen with integrated appliances, garage in block, well-maintained communal grounds, and no onward chain."
"A wonderful one bedroom home on the ground floor of Galahad Apartments. A wonderful open plan living area with an offset kitchen. South facing windows, and balcony, with views of the communal garden. Stunning Botanic colour palette features throughout the home"
"A modern and bright one-bedroom third floor Berkeley Homes apartment, offering stylish city living. "
"Superb two bedroom apartment situated in the popular Winchester Village, to the south western edge of the city and built by Bovis Homes in 2015, with two allocated parking spaces. This ground floor apartment is perfectly positioned within a small block and benefits from a sunny orientation. Int..."
"Freshly renovated and modernised throughout, Dybles present this two bedroom ground floor apartment, a short distance away from Winchester City Centre, offering no forward chain."
"A light and airy city centre home offered with no forward chain, benefiting from allocated parking."
"Fox and Sons are delighted to bring to the market an excellent opportunity to modernise this spacious, three bedroom semi-detached house, located in the popular location of Winnall."
"Located within a quiet cul-de-sac, positioned on the fringes of Winchester, this beautifully refurbished mid-terrace home is ideally situated for access to all of the local amenities that Badger Farm has to offer. The front door opens into a porch which leads into the spacious sitting room with a..."
"FINAL APARTMENT IN BLOCK. Featuring an OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining/sitting room with French doors to a private BALCONY, EN SUITE and fitted wardrobes to bedroom one. Complete with ALLOCATED PARKING. Walking distance to city centre."
"Two bedroom maisonette, located a stones throw away from Winchester City Centre, available for over 55's only."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire a two-bedroom bungalow in the heart of one Winchester's popular suburbs. Presented to a good standard the bungalow offers communal parking toward the front of the home and small steps that lead to the private front door. Entering into the home you are greeted by...
**Opposite Winchester Train Station** **One/Two Bedroom Modern Apartment** ***Please click the brochure button near the bottom of the Rightmove advert or visit the Purplebricks website to book a viewing 24 hours a day*** This is a stunning modern spacious apartment situated in a popular locati...
"A fantastic two double bedroom apartment with attractive views, a car port and no forward chain. Two bathrooms and very well presented throughout. Potential Rental circa £1,350 pcm."
"No Chain - A westerly aspect garden with this two bedroom house in Badger Farm. Garage, new kitchen and a quiet cul-de-sac location. Potential Rental circa £1,000 - £1,100 pcm."
"Stanford Estate Agents are pleased to offer this immaculately presented, two double bedroom, ground floor apartment with allocated parking. Situated a stones throw away from Winchester Hospital and the City centre this property makes an ideal first time buy or investment. "
"Located in the heart of the city centre and affording excellent proximity to both the main line station and the bustling high street, this two-bedroom, first-floor city apartment comes with the additional benefit of a private garden. The apartment boasts an open-plan kitchen/sitting/dining room w..."
"Penthouse apartment in a city centre location. The property is conveniently situated for ease of access to the mainline railway station and Winchester’s amenities. Set across the top floor, the property comprises an open plan sitting / dining / kitchen area, which includes an oven, hob, ext..."
"A terrific ground floor apartment within close walking distance to both Winchester city centre and railway station. Offering two bedrooms, ensuite, further family bathroom, open-plan living area, and two allocated parking spaces."
"Share of Freehold, two-bedroom, ground floor apartment, located in Winchester City Centre. This home offers the fantastic benefit of being set back from the road with access through private gardens along with a private rear garden of its own, all whilst still being a short walk away to the city's..."
Spacious one bedroom third floor apartment located in the heart of Winchester city centre and within a short walk of the mainline railway station. The apartment provides a wonderful opportunity to experience high class living in an historic city and has been converted to the highest of contempo...
"Traditionally designed development of just ten homes located in the heart of historic Winchester, with the main line train station within easy reach and the vibrant city centre just a stone’s throw away. This first floor two bedroom apartment benefits from open plan living areas and a high ..."
"A very well-appointed, two bedroom apartment. "
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £296,250 with a 75% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
An immaculate apartment enjoying an elevated position on the edge of the city.
"A stylish city centre apartment close to Winchester Train Station. Two bedrooms, two bathrooms and no onward chain."
"Perfectly positioned within the heart of the city in a quiet location, with allocated parking and offered with no forward chain."
"Two bedroom maisonette, located in Teg Down."
"Must be viewed! A contemporary two bedroom apartment in Fraser Gardens, off Chibolton Avenue, Winchester. Secure gated parking and no forward chain."
"Two bedroom first floor apartment for sale with no onward chain. This modern apartment is situated at the front of the building giving it ample amount of natural light and stunning views. The estate includes a secure, gated parking. The local area is on high demand with it being walkin..."
"A ground-floor luxury apartment which is need of some updating internally, located in the highly desirable location of St. Cross, within easy reach of both Winchester city centre and the Water Meadows. The property offers a large sitting/dining room with bay window, luxury kitchen with oven, hob ..."
A bright and airy two-bedroom home located within Fulflood.
"Spacious one bedroom maisonette, located within close proximity to Winchester City Centre."
"INVESTORS ONLY Immaculate one bedroom lower ground floor apartment situated within a fine Grade II listed building. Nestled in one of Winchester's best city centre streets, this fabulous apartment is perfectly placed for you to enjoy life in England's ancient capital city. Mixing modern sty..."
"Offering specular far reaching views and character features throughout, this duplex would work well for both residential and investment buyers alike. Offering bedroom with skylight balcony, bright living room, family bathroom, kitchen, and ample storage throughout."
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* - Let long term until September 2024* A smart three bedroom apartment, close to Winchester Train Station."
"Ewemove - A fantastic 2 bedroom Maisonette in the City of Winchester, which has recently been redecorated. The property benefits from a rear garden and driveway. Virtual Tour available on request."
"A modern one-bedroom apartment within a gated development, quietly situated to the rear of the building, with secure enclosed allocated parking, and offered with no forward chain."
Bright and airy apartment with private balcony. 
"Four bedroom student property, located in Olivers Battery."
Ewemove - A fantastic 2 bedroom duplex apartment in the heart of the city centre.
"Immaculately presented, this one bedroom top floor apartment is within walking distance to the hospital, train station and city centre. It is light and airy throughout. The welcoming entrance hall has good storage and leads into the generously sized open plan kitchen/living room with a higher cei..."
"Modern purpose built three bedroom student / sharer apartment. Located within the very popular and well established Balfour House development. Balfour House, Winchester offers premium all inclusive accommodation. High quality apartments designed and built to provide students and sharers with abso..."
Spacious two-bedroom apartment with wonderful far-reaching views.
"This one bedroom apartment is nestled within a premier development just off Winchester High Street with allocated parking and is being offered with no chain. The property is positioned on the first floor and provides an open plan kitchen/sitting/diner, finished to a high standard and providing a ..."
"Rural outlook, city livingKings Barton is home to a collection of brand-new two-bedroom apartments on a popular development just a short walk from the centre of Winchester, Hampshire.Set around landscaped communal gardens, these new-build homes offer modern and flexible living ..."
"A FANTASTIC FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ALLOCATED PARKING AND A PRIVATE BALCONY Two bedrooms, quiet cul-de-sac and a convenient location. Onward Chain complete."
"Situated in the popular area of St. Cross is this two bedroom, first-floor apartment. The property is a great opportunity for investors or first-time buyers alike."
"Approached via a gated entrance and leafy footpath, this is a wonderful, one-bedroom, top-floor apartment offering spacious accommodation in a Grade II Listed building. Set in communal gardens and conveniently located in very quiet side street in a sought-after area, the property is within walki..."
"One bedroom ground floor apartment, located on the outskirts of Winchester City Centre. This home is being offered with no forward chain, idealistic for a quick transaction."
"An opportunity to acquire a spacious second floor apartment, which forms part of a purpose-built block of apartments, whilst being conveniently situated just off the St Cross Road on the south side of the city and a short distance from the mainline railway station and High Street. The well-prop..."
" Set in an exclusive and modern development on the eastern fringe of Winchester city centre, just a short distance from the bustling city centre and St Giles Hill which offers panoramic views of the city. Pipe Kiln Court is a superb mix of traditional and highly contemporary architecture des..."
"A terrific city centre apartment with magnificent views of Winchester Cathedral. Offering living room, kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom, two balconies, store room, and access to allocated parking space*. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"Well proportioned, two bedroomed ground floor maisonette is being sold with no onward chain and vacant possession. The property comprises of two bedrooms which are doubles, large lounge/dining room, the kitchen is fitted which overlooks the rear garden and a family bathroom which is a..."
"Two bedroom park home in the desirable location of Wykeham Park, just a 10 minute drive into the historic town of Winchester. The property features: two bedrooms, Kitchen/diner, shower room, en-suite to master and new conservatory.The property has got ample parking and enclosed rear garden."
"Terrifically located within the highly desirable area of St Cross, this second floor apartment would suit both residential and investment buyers alike. Offering two bedrooms, spacious living room, kitchen, bathroom, garage in block, and no onward chain."
"Two bedroom maisonette, located a short distance from Winchester City Centre. This home offers no forward chain as well as being let for the next academic year, ideal for a prospective investor. "
"Location The property is situated in the secluded part of Stanmore, to the south west of the City of Winchester, within 1.25 miles of the M3 at Junction 11, also providing easy access the open countryside south of Olivers Battery and the golf course. There is a useful range of amenitie..."
"Two bedroom maisonette, located in Weeke. The home is presented to a fantastic finish, offering a real level of ease to a prospective buyer."
"Two bedroom maisonette, located in Stanmore. This modernised property is ideal for a first time buyer or investor. NO FORWARD CHAIN. "
"High Yield Investment Opportunity within Balfour House - unique, premium student accommodation. Balfour House comprises 22 high quality apartments, to provide students with absolutely everything needed. Completed and let in the summer of 2014, these exceptional apartments are very popular with s..."
"Spacious one double bedroom first floor apartment built by Linden Homes in 2009 to a high standard; it is one of the largest one bedroom apartments, with a square footage of 589. Located just off Andover Road, it is within a pleasant walk to the railway station and city centre. The apartment, whi..."
"This two bedroom upper floor maisonette is being sold with no onward chain in a sought after location of Winchester. The property consists of a large lounge/dining room, two double bedrooms, fully fitted kitchen that leads onto a balcony, family bathroom and plenty of storage cupboards. The added..."
"Superbly positioned one-bedroom, first-floor apartment situated in the centre of Winchester and ideal for any first-time buyer or investor. This splendid period conversion is well presented throughout with light and airy accommodation comprising a large living room to the front of the property, s..."
"Connells offer to the market this wonderfully spacious one bedroom, ground floor flat enhanced with a private balcony and no onward chain. Conveniently, the heart of Winchester is right on your doorstep. Available at 100% Shared Ownership."
"INVESTORS ONLY: CURRENTLY LET UNTIL 14/10/2023 AT £1,000 PCM Capitol House is a stunning conversion of a contemporary office building by renowned local developers Aquitaine Developments. Without compromise, Aquitaine Developments have produced an apartment building far above the avera..."
An immaculately presented flat with allocated parking within easy walking distance of the station and town centre.
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £221,250 with a 75% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this well-positioned ground floor apartment, benefitting from its own private rear garden."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £202,500 with a 50% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"An excellent first-floor, one-bedroom apartment for the over 55s, set in a wonderful location backing onto the River Itchen and moments from the town centre and cathedral. Internally there is a beautifully presented sitting room with direct access to the balcony which boasts simply stunning view..."
"One bedroom top floor apartment in the sought after area of Badger Farm, Winchester. This apartment comprises of a fitted kitchen, a lounge with a door leading to the balcony, spacious double bedroom with a large built in wardrobe and a bathroom. Double glazing throughout."
Splendid garden apartment within this over 55´s development located in central Winchester.
A fantastic one bedroom apartment benefitting from its own entrance and private patio garden in the centre of Winchester
"A spacious over 55's property located within close proximity to the historical city centre of Winchester and the railway station. Offering two bedrooms, kitchen, bright living room, bathroom, plenty of storage, lift access, and no onward chain."
"One bedroom maisonette, located in Stanmore."
No Chain - a bright first floor maisonette with a garden and a private entrance.
Fully refurbished one bedroom retirement home in the heart of the historic city centre of Winchester.
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** GROUND FLOOR FLAT ** PRICED TO SELL ** MODERN KITCHEN ** 0.2 MILES FROM THE TRAIN STATION ** CENTRAL LOCATION **
"This a lovely example of a two-bedroom apartment in a very popular area of Winchester, close to the university, town centre and the train station. No chain and an ideal investment opportunity. Modern kitchen, brand new boiler, two parking spaces and spacious living space."
"Dybles presents this spacious studio apartment, located in Winchester City Centre. the apartment has been modernised throughout, offering no forward chain."
"Minutes away from Winchester city centre and Cathedral, this bright over 55's apartment has been very well-maintained and has pretty riverside views. Offering double bedroom, spacious living room with electric fireplace, kitchen, bathroom, and a peaceful private balcony. No onward chain."
* Investors Only * Located in the Heart of Winchester * Studio Apartment * Recently Refurbished * Basement Apartment * Outside Storage for Bikes * Electric Heating * Resident Permit Parking * EPC Grade C *
"An opportunity to acquire a spacious second floor apartment, which forms part of a purpose-built block of apartments, whilst being conveniently situated just off the St Cross Road on the south side of the city and a short distance from the mainline railway station and High Street. The well-propor..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £151,250 with a 50% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Terrifically located in the heart of Winchester and within close walking distance to the railway station, this bright studio apartment has been recently redecorated and is offered to the market with no onward chain."
First floor studio flat in Winchester city centre being offered with tenant in situ.
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £125,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £120,000 with a 30% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £119,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £118,500 with a 30% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £117,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £116,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £115,500 with a 30% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £115,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £114,000 with a 30% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £114,000 with a 40% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst r..."
"Connells offer to the market this wonderfully spacious one bedroom, ground floor flat enhanced with a private balcony and no onward chain. Conveniently, the heart of Winchester is right on your doorstep. Available at 50% Shared Ownership."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 12TH APRIL 2023 AT THE AGEAS BOWL, BOTLEY ROAD, WEST END, SOUTHAMPTON, SO30 3XH STARTING AT 11AM. A ground floor apartment located on the outskirts of Winchester. Offering double bedroom, spacious living room with access to private patio, kitchen with break..."
"A 40% SHARE IN THIS FANTASTIC FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ALLOCATED PARKING AND A PRIVATE BALCONY Two bedrooms, quiet cul-de-sac and a convenient location. 100% purchase is also available. Onward chain complete."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £98,750 with a 25% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst re..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £96,250 with a 25% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst re..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 12TH APRIL 2023 AT THE AGEAS BOWL, BOTLEY ROAD, WEST END, SOUTHAMPTON, SO30 3XH STARTING AT 11AM. Terrifically located a short distance away from both the city centre and railway station, this Over 55's property offers the benefit of independant living whil..."
"A lovely, recently refurbished one bedroom first floor retirement home for the over 55s, in central Winchester overlooking St Giles Hill. Homerise House is a much sought after retirement home, with lift access to all floors. However, part of the joy of this property is the location - set in Hyde..."
* Offered with No Forward Chain * Suitable for the Over 55's * Communal Lounge and Kitchen Area * One Bedroom Top Floor Apartment * Served by a Lift * Fitted Kitchen with Free-Standing Appliances * Sitting Room * Double Bedroom with Built-In Wardrobe * Shower Room * Short Walk to the Mainline Tra...
"30% Shared Ownership. Spacious one bedroom maisonette, located within close proximity to Winchester City Centre."
"**SHARED OWNERSHIP HOME - BASED ON A 25% SHARE** Call Charters for more details! Plot 580 is a spacious second floor apartment with a Juliet balcony. The apartment benefits from a dual aspect, open-plan kitchen/living/dining room with a fitted kitchen and French doors to the Juliet ba..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £75,625 with a 25% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst re..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £71,250 with a 25% share! Fellowes Rise is a brand new collection of shared ownership apartments and houses located in the heart of Winchester. Enjoy city life in Winchester whilst re..."
"**SHARED OWNERSHIP HOME - BASED ON A 25% SHARE** Call Charters for more details, you are able to initially buy up to 75% of this property. Plot 573 is a spacious one bedroom ground floor apartment with a Juliet balcony. The apartment benefits from a dual aspect, open-plan kitchen/livi..."
Freehold garage conveniently located
"Single garage for sale - conveniently located in May Tree Close, Badger Farm.
Up and over door. Weatherproof and secure - Suitable for vehicle storage or storage of other items.
2.0 miles to Royal Hampshire County Hospital and University of Winchester.
2.7 miles to train station
0.9 miles to city..."
"5 BEDROOMS AND 4 BATHROOMS An imposing detached five bedroom family home located within close proximity to good local amenities and Ofsted rated good schools for children of all ages. The property boasts; two reception rooms, 2 shower rooms, garage and potential to erect an additional property STPP"
RESIDENTIAL/COMMERCIAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN TETTENHALL 8 Apartments / 1 Commercial Unit
"This is a fantastic investment opportunity to acquire a modern FREEHOLD investment property comprising of 14 modern two bedroom apartments, five apartments with ensuites, all currently tenanted and providing a gross rental income of over £8,000 per calendar month (Over £96,000 per ann..."
"An incredibly rare development opportunity provided by a substantial family home with significant potential for improvement and enlargement, planning permission granted for two dwellings to the rear of the plot accessed off Quail Green and the further potential for an additional plot to the side ..."
"Fabulous Development opportunity for 64 apartments, on a site area of approximately 0.4 hectares (1 acre) calculated from Ordnance Survey. Location Situated close to the centre of Bilston with a good range of urban amenities within a mixed residential and commercial area together with easy mo..."
6 recently refurbished Apartments in a prime location leading into Wolverhampton City Centre. The 6 apartments are located in a former Office space on the Tettenhall Road. There are 3 two bedroom apartments and 3 one bedroom apartments. Schools and amenities very close by.
"BUY- TO- LET OPPORTUNITY BLOCK OF FLATS 9 UNITS. A RANGE OF 1 BEDS, 2 BEDS AND 3 BEDS. MODERN, SPACIOUS, COMFORTABLE APARTMENTS. CONVENIENT PENN ROAD LOCATION. PRIVATE PARKING TO THE REAR."
"Guide Price £1,100,000 to £1,300,000 Royston and Lund are pleased to market this incredible 16th century farmhouse situated in Lower Penn, set over 4500sq ft. This property is a grade two listed building and displays original features of the property including the exposed beams. Lower Pe..."
"* The Woodlands * A magnificent 5-6 bedroom luxury detached new-build house within idyllic Tettenhall, presented to an exceptional standard throughout and highly energy-efficient. Featuring a stunning, open-plan family living kitchen and a detached double garage * Hall * Downstairs WC * Cloak/boo..."
"Exciting new development of just Four 5 bedroom luxury homes coming to the market now * Very high specification in a small gated community, off the Wrottesley Road * Bespoke kitchen and bathroom changes available * Plots in the £900s * Please register now if interested - Contact the office..."
"* An exceptionally well-appointed and capacious, modern 5-bedroom detached house in exclusive Tettenhall, finished to an immaculate standard with generous proportions throughout. Arranged over three floors with five en suite bedrooms, a south-facing garden, a double garage and a versatile studio ..."
An unusual development opportunity provided by a well appointed and well presented Tinacre Hill residence which has the potential for extensions (STPP) together with Planning Permission granted for the construction of a substantial two storey house to the rear of the plot with access off Perton R...
"Situated in one of the most sought-after locations in Tettenhall and enjoying a private corner position at the very end of Coppice Lane with no neighboring buildings, surrounded by greenery, and with a plot size of approx. 0.7 acres, this individually designed detached propert..."
"A beautifully appointed family residence, of generous proportions, standing in an enviable corner position, within an exclusive gated development (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)"
An outstanding Victorian residence providing extensive and exceptionally well proportioned accommodation over three storeys in one of the most highly regarded addresses within the area.
"A beautifully situated family home lying in a quiet backwater setting adjoining South Staffordshire Golf Course to the rear. Superbly appinted throughout and with well proportioned accommodation which includes a Reception Hall, Drawing Room, Dining Room, Study, Conservatory, Breakfast Kitchen, Tw..."
An outstanding Tettenhall Village residence with rooms of fine proportions throughout with a delightful southwest facing rear garden.
"**EXCEPTIONAL PLOT - SIZEABLE PLOT OF LAND TO REAR ASPECT NEEDING TO BE SEEN** A fine example of a traditional detached family residence with extensive living accommodation and six/seven bedroom accommodation set over three floors, whilst standing in a highly sought after area upon a ..."
"An amazing and rare opportunity to purchase and occupy a substantial detached residence which has also been previously extended to offer a staggering 8 bedrooms, 6 reception rooms, 4 bathrooms, garage, driveway and mature gardens. Converted from a family home in 1957 to being now currently used a..."
"* A very attractive and generously proportioned 4-bedroom traditional detached house on the outskirts of Tettenhall, within easy reach of local schools. Boasts a large private rear garden, master en suite, views across open fields, and a choice of distinctive reception spaces * Hall with orignal ..."
A prime development site with the benefit of PLANNING PERMISSION for 22 DWELLINGS plus aN EXISTING three-bedroom detached house (45 Rookery Road).
"A fantastic investment opportunity near to the city of Wolverhampton with income from day one. The development comprises of a three bedroom end terraced house, a semi-detached house converted into two flats, a grocers and a car wash all coming with tenants in situ. Viewings by appointment."
"A semi-detached family home with no upward chain offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This three bedroom property is situated in an extremely popular residential and although the property requires some updating and repair works, there is enormous potential on offer. Interior v..."
"If as a buyer, you are looking for a property you can literally move into and enjoy your new surroundings, without having to do anything but relax and be proud of your immaculately presented home, yet being well placed to major commuting links including M54/M6 motorways and a direct road network ..."
"An Immaculate Spacious Family Home in the Sought After Area of Tettenhall & The Wergs. Impressive from the front with excellent side views and rear views too, Enter the property into a light and bright hall, doors lead to the lounge, downstairs cloakroom and gym. The lounge opens up into the o..."
"""Chestnut Green"" is a Most Appealing Four Bedroom Detached Residence standing in a substantial corner position within Woodthorn Road South, a much sought after Tettenhall location and only a short distance to all the excellent independent shops, cafes, restaurants and further amenities ..."
"An outstanding, period property which is one of the oldest houses in the area and which provides beautiful, accommodation of much character standing in a large plot of just over a quarter of an acre in total."
A beautifully presented family home with particularly impressive ground floor accommodation in an outstanding plot of almost 0.4 of an acre in total with a particularly and impressive wide frontage to Woodthorne Road South with a large front lawn and dual entrance carriage driveway
"* A generously proportioned and very stylish 4-bedroom detached house offering contemporary, spacious living close to the heart of Tettenhall village. Recently renovated throughout, with an excellent master en suite, a large, modern dining kitchen, and a substantial through lounge * Hall * Downs..."
"Enderby Drive is an elegant family home with colonial style facade, generous driveway with large garage and gardens to the front and rear. The house is an exceptional family residence providing accommodation with well proportioned rooms to both the ground and first floors. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE..."
A recently refurbished and exceptionally stylish four bedroom detached property standing in a sought after road in a large plot of approximately 0.4 acres in total
" * A stunning new 4-bedroom three-storey detached house just off Goldthorn Hill, offering exceptional, open plan contemporary accommodation. Finished to an excellent standard throughout, with three en suite bedrooms, a south-facing patio, and a vast, open-plan kitchen and living area * Superb ope..."
A stunning prestigious family home set back in a private location close to Bantock Park. The property comes with planning permission to extend it to an ultra modern five bedroom property. This property really must be seen. Enter the property into the welcoming hall that goes to the spacious loun...
"An outstanding, recently refurbished and remodelled property providing contemporary accommodation of the highest calibre"
"* An impressively spacious 4-bedroom detached house at the end of a Wightwick cul-de-sac, backing onto National Trust woodland. Presented to a very good standard throughout, with excellent gardens, and en suite master bedroom * Hall * Downstairs WC * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Through lounge *..."
An exceptionally attractive detached family home overlooking Bantock Park and standing within a large plot of just over a quarter of an acre in total.
"An opportunity to purchase a truly unique 'dream' family home, thoughtfully designed to provide outstanding and spacious accommodation, that can only be appreciated by an interior viewing. This particularly impressive and distinctive family residence is located at the head of a cul-de-sac..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Finchfield, convenient for the majority of amenities, in particular within easy walking distance of the popular attraction known as Bantock Park, this distinctive character property has been thoughtfully extended and restyled to create superb spa"
A beautifully restored period residence of grand proportions in a sought after residential area.
"5 Springhill Park is a well positioned detached fine family home with generous living spaces and arranged over two floors. There is a large gravelled, gated driveway, double garage and gardens to the front side and rear. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE - EPC 'D')"
"Occupying a private position in a much sought-after location, this period Duke of Sutherland cottage dates back to circa 1800’s and yet has been sympathetically extended and modernised, incorporating many of the original period features including exposed beamed ceiling together with ledged ..."
"* A well-presented, extended 4-bedroom detached house of an excellent size, with a large rear garden, generous internal proportions, and planning permission for further extension if required. Includes a double garage and master en suite * Hall * Downstairs WC * Sitting room * Lounge * Conservator..."
"* A very well-presented and stylish 3-bedroom detached bungalow within walking distance of Tettenhall centre. Benefits from master en suite, delightful front and rear gardens, garage, and a stunning kitchen diner * Hall * Dining room * Lounge with wood-burning stove * Large kitchen diner with bi-..."
A beautifully positioned single storey residence standing at the end of a gated drive leading off the prestigious Wrottesley Road
A landmark property standing in a prominent position in one of the City's most exclusive addresses
"Number 47 York Avenue is a fine example of a most attractive and imposing traditional detached property of distinction, having been extensively improved upon over the years to include the addition of a cleverly thought out attic conversion and a stylish collection of modern fittings, provides an ..."
*Stunning Family Home *Sought After Location *Close To Good Local Schools *Four Double Bedrooms *Extensively & Thoughtfully Extended *Generous Rear Garden *Double Garage & Utility *Conservatory *Three Reception Rooms *Master Bedroom With En Suite Bathroom *Guest WC *Viewing Is Highly Recommended
"INCLUDES FLOORING & TURF TO REAR GARDEN - Up to £1,000 towards your mortgage for 12 months subject to t&c's - call Connells for information. Plot 4 ALDER HOUSE at VARDONS KEEP - A Well Designed, High Specification 4 Bedroom Detached Home. Set in private close, in the Popular Village of Tet..."
"A stylishly presented traditional semi-detached property positioned on the highly popular Ettingshall Park estate. This family home has gas central heating & double glazing and briefly comprises; entrance porch, hallway, attractive through lounge, modern fitted kitchen with various integrate..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase a four bedroom, new build property close to the heart of Tettenhall Village in a small cul-de-sac of just 6 homes. ALL PHOTOS ARE EXAMPLES OF SIMILAR PROPERTIES"
"* An enviably positioned 4-bedroom detached dormer bungalow in desirable Wightwick, backing onto open fields. With a large dining kitchen, two bathrooms, gated parking, and an excellent rear garden with wonderful rural views * Porch * Hall * Dining room * Lounge * Conservatory * Large kitchen din..."
"""A CHARMING UNIQUE & CHARACTERFUL PERIOD HOME - ADJOINING SPLIT LEVEL ANNEX STYLE ACCOMMODATION"" Comprising lounge, sitting room, entertainment family lounge diner, kitchen, utility/home office, four bedrooms, shower room, bathroom. Annex comprises lounge, wc & mezzanine Bedroom Five."
"Occupying a prime position in this highly sought after residential area, situated on a large site measuring at approx. 8,234sq feet, this distinctive detached house offers extremely spacious and versatile living accommodation being an excellent opportunity for purchasers requiring an expansive famil"
"A Stunning Property in an Amazing Setting ; at the Top of its' own Lane Overlooking Tettenhall and Adjacent to the local Church of St Andrews and All Angels . Looking for something different, in a quiet picturesque surrounding with small caves, beautiful gardens and local walks all around. Ent..."
A superbly situated detached dormer bungalow with lovely views to the rear over open countryside. The property provides well proportioned and versatile living accommodation which is well apointed and tastefully presented throughout. In brief the accommodation comprises a Reception Hall with oak p...
"Occupying a choice position on a small exclusive cul de sac just off Woodcote Road in a favoured residential area and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village Centre, this modern detached property is an excellent example of its type with internal inspection highly recommended. "
"5 The Heronry is undoubtedly an excellent model of its type, situated in an exclusive cul de sac just off Perton Brook Vale and therefore in one of the most favoured residential areas in Wolverhampton, this modern detached property has been extensively restyled to a very high specification!"
"Extended and modernised detached home offering a wealth of features for the modern family, located in a highly sought after location which is well served by local shops, schools and public transport. Occupying one of the largest plots on the development and with a generous garden to the rear, th..."
"Steventon Land & Estate agents are pleased to be offering for sale, this substantial traditional detached property of generous proportions, having been extensively improved upon over the years, provides an excellent standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is..."
A particularly well located and surprisingly spacious three bedroomed detached bungalow standing in a sought after position within walking distance of the village centre.
A well presented three bedroom detached property set in a large plot in a popular and sought after residential location.
*** YOU MUST BE AN INVESTOR BUYER TO ENQUIRE ABOUT THIS PROPERTY - NOT AVAILABLE TO FIRST TIME BUYERS *** Landlord to Landlord Service - GetAnOffer are looking for LANDLORDS to purchase this home which is currently RENTED producing an income. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property fo...
"INCLUDES FLOORING & TURF TO REAR GARDEN - Up to £1,000 towards your mortgage for 12 months subject to t&c's - call Connells for information. Plot 2 BLACKTHORN HOUSE at VARDONS KEEP - A Beautiful, Spacious 3 Bedroom Detached Home. Set in private close, in the Popular Village of Tettenhall."
"A superb opportunity to purchase a three bedroom, new build property close to the heart of Tettenhall Village in a small cul-de-sac of just 6 homes. ALL PHOTOS ARE EXAMPLES OF SIMILAR PROPERTIES"
"A substantial family home standing in a surprisingly large plot in a small, spur position off a sought after road within easy walking distance of Tettenhall village centre with its full complement of local facilities and excellent schooling for which the area is renowned. Wolverhampton City Cent..."
"Occupying a choice position in one of the most favoured residential areas in Tettenhall and being convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops & local bus routes, this modern detached property has been restyled to provide a most charming and contemporary interior"
"HMO Rental Property For Sale, Tettenhall Road, Wolverhampton, WV3 14 Self-Contained Bedrooms"
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations of Tettenhall and occupying a choice position just off the Codsall Road, this modern detached property has been constructed in recent years to create a fine example of a spacious family home!"
"**A UNIQUE HEAVILY EXTENDED SIX-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFF THE SPINNEY IN FINCHFIELD, WOLVERHAMPTON** A great opportunity to purchase an extended family home in Finchfield, Wolverhampton. Offering three versatile reception rooms with potential use as bedrooms or workspace, a..."
Distinctive individual Detached residence occupying lovely large plot of an exclusive cul-de-sac enjoying delightful position together with easy access into city centre and to wide range of local amenities. Particularly spacious accommodation of pleasant character creating a superb family home. T...
"Undoubtedly one of the finest examples of its type, this incredible three storey detached smart home offers an extensive and comprehensive range of modern living with executive appointments and fittings throughout. The spacious and luxuriously appointed living accommodation incorporates high end..."
A particularly spacious detached residence located in an exclusive neighbourhood of high popularity.
"***Investment opportunity*** Morgan Payne & Knightly are delighted to offer these four 1 - 2 bedroom flats in the highly sought after cul de sac, conservation area, of Park Dale West, off Tettenhall Road. Producing a yield of 6.72% at asking price. "
" **A WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE** Comprising of reception hall, downstairs shower room, lounge, separate dining room, kitchen, first floor bathroom, front and rear gardens, garage. Potential to extend (subject to planning permission). "
"A most attractive & imposing traditional detached property, having been sympathetically improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal as a larger family home."
A well located family home providing extended accommodation in a sought after road.
"A deceptively spacious five bedroom family home in excess of 2,000 sq ft standing within a superb, southwest facing plot in a sought after address. The property benefits from a new roof and off road parking for up to four vehicles. NO UPWARD CHAIN"
"""AN OUTSTANDING & RECENTLY REFURBISHED 5 BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large extended kitchen/ lounge, dining room, ground floor wc, plant room/ storage area, 5 bedrooms, family bathroom & a shower room. Large driveway to front & enclosed rear garden."
"An Exclusive Gated Development of Six Beautiful High Specification 4 and 5 Bedroom Detached New Build Homes Currently available to reserve off plan Estimated Build Finish Summer 2023 Prices from £440,000 to £495,000 Contact Connells Wolverhampton for further details"
An attractive family home providing delightful three bedroom accommodation that would benefit from a scheme of improvement and which has ample potential for works of extension (STPP).
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops and the city centre, this deceptive modern detached property has been extensively restyled & extended "
A well located and deceptively spacious extended detached family residence offering fine accommodation over three storeys
"Situated in an exclusive residential area and occupying a choice position in a most desirable cul de sac just off Perton Brook Vale, this modern detached property has been extensively restyled to a very high specification providing luxurious accommodation throughout and is a superb example of a fami"
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops & the city centre, this deceptive modern detached property has been extensively restyled & extended over the year"
A superbly situated and well presented family home with room of generous proportions throughout and with ample scope for extensions (STPP)
"Behind its deceptively spacious exterior this Detached Split-Level Property offers a generous interior which has been cleverly designed to provide, if required, two self contained homes boasting two kitchens, two bathrooms and separate living spaces, but at the same time can also be interconne..."
A superbly situated four bedroom family home with well proportioned and well presented accommodation throughout.
"Springhill Park is a detached bungalow which occupies a generous plot with ample off road parking, garage and a well established rear garden. The internal accommodation briefly comprises living room, three bedrooms with en-suite to the principal bedroom, family bathroom, open plan kitchen/dining ..."
"Situated in one of the most favoured locations on Goldthorn Park and set well back from the road by a walled & paved driveway, 4 Benson Avenue occupies a prominent position in the small select cul-de-sac just off Ward Road, this imposing & distinctive detached property has been extensively extended!"
"Located in a highly sought after area of Tettenhall, is this beautifully presented and spacious three double bedroom, two reception room detached family home. The property briefly comprises of; Reception hall with stairs to first floor, access to the ground floor cloakroom and access to the dini..."
Royston and Lund are proud to present this substantial three/four bedroom detached family home occupying an electric gated corner plot in Penn. The property benefits from a garage conversion that has created a home cinema room and is ideally situated for easy access into Wolverhampton City Centre...
"""A STUNNING HOUSE WITH STUNNING VIEWS"" This beautiful 3 story character property comprises of, entrance hall, large lounge, large dining room, kitchen, utility, basement, 5 bedrooms, ensuite, family bathroom, driveway, large rear garden, double garage and fantastic views over Bantock Park."
"* A considerably improved and deceptively spacious 4-bedroom detached house in a sought-after residential area, a short walk from local schools. Boasts a stylish bathroom and master en suite, an excellent breakfast kitchen, and a well-presented garden * Porch * Hall * Breakfast kitchen * Large lo..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* An attractive detached bungalow having been extended and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is equally ideal for the growing family or retiring persons."
"Situated in a popular residential area yet occupying a quite location convenient for the majority of amenities, this deceptive detached house has been extensively & professionally renovated to a most superior standard with a host of high quality fittings throughout creating a superb example of a mod"
A particularly well located four bedroom family home standing in a sought after address
We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"Attractive, ENLARGED & re-configured, gas centrally heated, uPVC double glazed semi detached excellently situated in favoured ""backwater"" upon favoured development briefly comprising; Porch, Reception Hall, Through Living/Dining Room (formerly separate rooms), Conservatory, Enlarged..."
"An extended spacious modern semi-detached property, an immaculately presented ""Smart Home"", having all the latest technology. The property boasts solar panels, underfloor heating on the ground floor and infrared radiators on both the first and second floor along with smart lighting system."
"An imposing traditional detached property, having been extended to the ground floor rear elevation and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal as a family home with excellent scope to extend over the garage, subj..."
Fantastic Detached Property...Four Double Bedrooms...Massive Driveway For A Maximum Of Eight Cars...Finished To An Exceptionally High Standard...Stunning Rear Garden...Patio...Utility Room And Cloak Room...Three Reception Rooms...Popular Residential Local...Heavily Extended...Viewings Available Now!
"Old Chelsea is a period property occupying a lovely elevated position adjacent to the historic St Bartholomew’s Church and having off road parking to the fore, with two sets of steps leading up the decking area and frontage. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE - EPC: tbc)"
A substantial four double bedroom property in a highly sought after location
"Royston and Lund are pleased to present this potential 11 bedroom multiple occupancy HMO property which is ideal for investors. The property is fully set up and is an excellent business opportunity. Situated on Wellington Road, Bilston this property is located near multiple local amenities and p..."
"Occupying a choice position in the exclusive & secluded private drive just off the Tettenhall Road A41 and therefore situated in a most popular residential area, this character detached property has been extensively extended and restyled over the years to create a luxury & contemporary interior "
"Occupying a corner position in this small quiet cul de sac yet only minutes away from local schools & shops, this deceptive detached property has been extensively extended & refurbished by the present owners to a superior standard of accommodation, creating a fabulous modern interior!"
"Elegant modern style Detached residence enjoying a particularly pleasant private setting on a corner plot with a wonderful outlook overlooking Manor Park and convenient accessibility to an excellent range of local amenities. Comfortably proportioned accommodation, attractively presented with impr..."
"""AN OUTSTANDINGLY LARGE AND SPACIOUS 5 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining room, 5 bedrooms, 2 en-suites, family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
" To the front of the properties is a shared driveway secluded from the main road with trees. Local amenities nearby including shops, restaurants, cafes and Smestow Valley Nature Park, Wightwick Manor, and Bantock Park are all within walking distance. There are good transport links and great sc..."
"A surprisingly spacious, attractive and well located property providing extensive living space over three floors with four double bedrooms and in a sought after Tettenhall address"
"Set in the favoured residential area of Finchfield, this 4-bedroom family home unfolds over an excess of 2,000 sq ft, with traditional proportions and versatile living spaces to ensure it is perfectly suited to modern family living"
"A most imposing and attractive traditional 3/4 bedroom semi detached property, having been extensively extended and improved upon by the present owners, to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, provides an excellent standard of superbly spacious and exceptionally versatile living accom..."
"Take a period family home, lovingly renovate to the highest standards, and throw in lovely views of surrounding parkland, and you have Finchfield Road"
"A most impressive four bedroom detached property that reaches new heights in its specification and unique features to include: - Bath with waterproof TV, partial underfloor heating to ground floor, fantastic garden room/entertaining room, adjoining 'work from home' office/annexe space to mention..."
"Four bedroom semi detached family home that is modern, well presented and ready to move into with a huge amount of dynamic living accommodation on offer. Situated in a large plot on a highly regarded road with excellent commuting links."
"Innovate Estate Agents are delighted to present this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated in Bilston! The property boasts of DRIVEWAY to side providing OFF ROAD PARKING, entrance hallway, LOUNGE, FITTED KITCHEN/DINER, guest W/C, EN SUITE'S to two bedrooms, first floor Jack and Jill show..."
"NO CHAIN - Exclusive detached home finished to a high standard situated in a popular location close to local shops, schools and canalside walks. The property is set back from the main road and comprises entrance hall, living room, dining kitchen, utility room, ground floor w.c, three double bedro..."
"Immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home, set within a popular residential neighbourhood and with excellent transport links to the Black Country. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the condition and proportions of the accommodation. Call now on to Vie..."
"""A DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED ON A GENEROUS PLOT WITH AWAITED PLANNING PERMISSION FOR A DETACHED BUNGALOW TO REAR SIDE"" Comprising guest wc, sitting room, 21ft lounge diner, dining area, kitchen, 3 bedrooms & a bathroom. Driveway to front, drive in spacious garden, large detached garage"
"""A 5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED EXTENDED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, media room, kitchen diner, utility, bedroom with en-suite, down stairs wc, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom, to the top floor there is a master bedroom with en-suite. Crete print driveway & a rear garden"
"* A large 5-bedroom semi-detached period home of considerable character and excellent proportions. With two reception spaces, five double bedrooms, a garage, and proximity to a choice of local primary schools * Hall * Lounge * Dining room * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Ground-floor shower room *..."
"Occupying a pleasant corner position in a popular location convenient for the majority of amenities, this deceptive & extensively extended semi-detached property has been restyled by the present owners to create a superb example of a spacious family house providing tremendously spacious acc"
"Traditional-style semi-detached property offering extended and modified accommodation with stunning features. Living Room. Fitted kitchen with Dining area, Conservatory with Utility Area. Two first floor Bedrooms. Bathroom with shower cubicle. Double glazing and Central Heating. Off road parking ..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Considerably enlarged 3 Bedroom Detached Bungalow of deceptively spacious proportions, pleasantly positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac position off Sandringham Road within popular locality. Generous accommodation is superbly appointed and would be equally suited to comfortable fam..."
"* A deceptively spacious 3-bedroom link-detached house on a select cul-de-sac, featuring two reception spaces plus a large utility, conservatory, and breakfast kitchen. The property includes a master en suite, an attractive family bathroom, and off-road parking * Porch * Lounge * Dining room * Co..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Wolverhampton located just off the Penn Road and adjacent to the Stourbridge Road, this deceptive semi-detached property is convenient for easy access to the majority of amenities. An excellent example of a family house!i"
"To the front of the property you have the driveway with frontage and a secured private side gate to access the rear garden which leads you through to the garage.  Inside you benefit from a spacious front room with a traditional fully functional fireplace and a bright bay window, a separat..."
A superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached property in a particularly sought after residential area
"Occupying a choice position in one of the most favoured areas in Penn and having the majority of amenities close at hand, this distinctive and most impressive detached property has been extensively renovated by the present owners with no expense spared to create a spectacular family house!"
Occupying a choice cul de sac position in a most sought after location in Penn this detached house has been extensively extended and refurbished by the present owners to create stunning living accommodation and is an exceptional example of a family house. 
"The Clermont home ticks all the boxes. Light, spacious and contemporary is what this home stands for. Offering you a desirable kitchen island, perfect for entertaining, with an open plan layout including important needs of integrated appliances this home really does have it all."
"* A fully refurbished and immaculately presented 3-bedroom detached house on a desirable cul-de-sac, within easy reach of a choice of amenities and schools. Boasts new bathrooms and kitchen with appliances, underfloor heating downstairs, garaging, and an en suite master bedroom * Hall * Downstair..."
"An extremely well presented detached property occupying a delightful and quiet position in a popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This impressive four bedroom family home offers spacious accommodation, tastefully decorated throughout and must be seen to be appreciated. The pro..."
"*PLANNING GRANTED TO EXTEND* An extremely rare opportunity to acquire this highly attractive and interesting semi detached period cottage with recent permission granted for a two story side extension and garage link (22/00224/FUL), surrounded by local countryside and occupying a splendid plot wit..."
"A deceptively spacious, detached bungalow standing in a convenient position within walking distance of local facilities and standing in a highly regarded road in a large plot with a wide frontage to Springhill Lane and a large and private garden to both the side and rear with a large plot size of..."
A beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached property in one of the most sought after roads in the area.
An elegant late 19th Century villa with deceptively spacious accommodation which stands in an elevated position in a sought after location with the added benefit of a driveway and garage to the side
A conveniently situated four bedroom detached family home standing in a sought after area
"Beautifully appointment Brand New detached family home situated in a popular and convenient location with pleasant walks nearby. Finished to a high specification. Three double bedrooms, Modern Ensuite & bathroom, living room, open plan kitchen/ dining/ family room, guest Wc, ample off road..."
"Substantial traditional style Three/Four Bedroom Detached family residence occupying an established residential position of popularity on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton, handy for access to the city centre and a host of local amenities. The property occupies an extensive plot enjoying..."
Spacious four bedroom detached home occupying a choice position at the head of a popular cul-de-sac close to Church Hill. Offering tremendous potential with the possibility of further extension (subject to relevant building and planning consents) the property is available with no onward chain and...
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* A traditional detached dormer bungalow, having been substantially enlarged and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of spacious and versatile living accommodation, which is ideal for a growing family or retiring persons."
"* A very attractive and spacious 4-bedroom link-detached house on a delightful Compton cul-de-sac, with a wonderful contemporary breakfast kitchen, master bedroom with en suite, and a useful home office/second living space/fourth bedroom with patio doors * Porch * Sizeable, contemporary breakfast..."
"""A TRADITIONAL CORNER PLOT DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH REAR GATED CAR PARKING"" Comprising of front, side and rear gardens with dual gate entrance to front and side access, garage to side, lounge, dining room, sitting room, kitchen, conservatory, 3 bedrooms & fitted bathroom."
"Beautifully presented four-bedroom detached family home idyllically situated at the end of a private road in hugely sought after residential location of Penn. This generously sized property is positioned close to local amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, unive..."
"Situated in a popular residential area with the majority of services close at hand, this deceptive detached house has been extended and well maintained over the years to create a charming family home, ideal for purchasers requiring a property to restyle to own requirements including huge ability to "
Fantastic Semi Detached property...Approved Plans For A Three Bed House...Five Massive Bedrooms...Downstairs W.C/Wet Room...Plenty Of Storage...Vast Property...Superb Kitchen Diner...Useful Pantry...Off Road Parking Via The Rear...Converted Loft...Large Outhouses...Viewings Available Immediately!!!
*** NEW DETACHED FAMILY HOME *** FOUR BEDROOMS *** 2 EN-SUITES *** DOWNSTAIRS WC *** SPACIOUS LOUNGE *** MASSIVE KITCHEN/DINER *** 2 RECEPTION ROOMS *** MUST BE SEEN TO BE FULLY APPRECIATED *** Introducing the perfect family home! This stunning 4 bedroom abode boasts a modern design ...
"* An unmissable 2-3 bedroom, first-floor apartment within a glorious Georgian house conversion, set in desirable Wightwick. Offers 2293 sq. ft. of elegant period living with two en suite bedrooms, a 27ft lounge, conservatory, and balcony * Hall * Excellent breakfast kitchen * Utility * Conservato..."
"** Wow! ** ** Massively Extended Semi! ** ** Overlooking West Park! **Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful FIVE BEDROOM semi detached house to the market. This huge house is perfect for a large family or potential for HMO conversion (STPP), only being a 15 minute walk (through ..."
"* A valuable development opportunity in beautiful Wightwick – building plot of approximately 0.3 acres with planning permission for a stunning new 4-bedroom, split-level detached house and double garage, just off a quiet cul-de-sac * Ref: 21/00252/OUT * Detailed planning has been granted *..."
"PART EXCHANGE IS AVAILABLE ON THIS PLOT, OR WITH HELP TO BUY YOU COULD PURCHASE THIS HOME FOR £300,000. Located in the picturesque village of Tettenhall is Woodthorne, a beautiful new development sitting amongst mature trees and wonderful green open space. Each home enjoys its own distinctive cha..."
"* The Cheese House * A characterful and spacious 3-bedroom detached period house over 3 storeys on Tettenhall’s Wrottesley Road, a short walk from the bustling centre of the village. With a wonderful breakfast kitchen, off-road parking, and a covered courtyard garden * Hall * Dining room * ..."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE EXTENDED TRADITIONAL DETACHED HOME"" Externally the property has large off road parking to front & secure parking to side, detached garage, large rear garden & outbuilding. Internally there is a dining room, lounge, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, large converted attic area & bathroom."
"""AN OUTSTANDING & IMMACULATEL PRESENTED SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED 5 BEDROOM FAMILY PPROPERT Comprising of entrance hall, dining room, kitchen/ living area, multi use room, downstairs wc, 5 bedrooms, shower room, loft area. Gym/ hobby room with wc, storage area, off road parking, enclosed rear ga..."
A four bedroom family home in a popular residential location.
"Occupying a prime position set well back from the road, 127a Coalway Road is situated in one of the most favoured residential areas of Wolverhampton having many useful facilities close to hand, this individually designed detached house has been restyled over the years "
""" RARE AND UNIQUE SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED FAMILY HOME OFFERING COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS TO FRONT"" Comprising of pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking and a 20ft garage to side. Internally there is a lounge, dining room, office/ study, breakfast kitchen, guest wc, 3 bedrooms, bathroom."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, ground floor WC, conservatory, four bedrooms, en suite to master bedroom, family bathroom, front and rear gardens, off road parking & ga..."
"* A beautifully presented and very spacious 3-bedroom apartment on the top floor of a modern, luxury apartment building. Superb open-plan kitchen, lounge, and dining area with balcony off, plus a utility, en suite master bedroom, and secure gated parking * Hall * Open-plan lounge, dining area and..."
"Tucked away at the end of a quiet leafy close, is this deceptively spacious and extended four double bedroom, two reception room detached house. Beautifully presented and decorated, the property briefly comprises of; reception hall with access to the ground floor cloakroom, under stairs storage ..."
"Occupying a choice position in one of the most sought after locations on Goldthorn Park, this impressive and deceptive semi-detached property has been extended to create a most generous specification providing excellent accommodation as a family house."
SUPER SONIC SOLAR POWER TO THE RESCUE....HOLY MOLY MACARONI
"**EXTENDED FAMILY HOME NOW AVAILABLE IN QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION** Beautifully presented family home standing in a particularly highly regarded address within easy reach of excellent local primary and secondary schooling. The property comprises, sitting room, extended living room to the side ..."
"Extended modern detached bungalow on a private shared driveway in the sought-after location of Finchfield, located close to local amenities including shops and bus routes and having Smestow Valley Railway Walk and Canal access on the doorstep. This well-presented renovated property has been finis..."
"A recently refurbished detached family home standing in a sought after location with a large, southwest facing rear garden. This is the first time that the property has been offered for sale in ninety years."
""" A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND SHOW HOME STYLED EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED ON A PRIVATE DRIVE"" Comprising of ample off road parking, beautiful gardens and a garage to side. Entrance/ study, spacious guest wc, lounge, kitchen diner, dining room, sun room, utility, 3 bedrooms & bathroom."
"A large, three bedroom semi-detached property in a sought after residential location close to local shops."
"A charming, detached family home providing three bedroom accommodation of much character and appeal."
"CALL SKITTS TO BOOK A PROPERTY VIEWING! **A WELL PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE** close to local schools and amenities. Benefiting from double glazing, gas radiator central heating and CCTV. Briefly comprising of porch, hall, downstairs w.c., lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility room, c..."
"A well presented and extended four bedroomed detached property, occupying a quiet position with ample driveway parking and a good sized rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accom..."
This is a most impressive Three bedroom traditional Semi Detached property having been extended and extensively improved upon to provide an excellent standard of spacious and well proportioned living accommodation which is ideal as a family home.
An immaculate and well presented three / four bedroomed detached property. Occupying a quiet position with private resin driveway and a landscaped rear garden with seating area and garage to the side elevation. The property has been extended to provide a spacious open plan living area which i...
"An attractive and rather deceptive Victorian semi detached property of generous proportions, having been substantially improved upon over the years, to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, providing an excellent standard of superbly spacious and versatile living accommodation, which i..."
"*Well Presented Modern Detached Home *Close To Good Local School, 'The Royal School' *Four Bedrooms With Fitted Wardrobes *Generous Rear Garden *Master Bedroom With En Suite *Modern Family Bathroom *Guest WC *Two Reception Rooms *Fitted Kitchen *Utility Room *Garage And Drive *Chain Free"
"*Well Presented Spacious Dormer Bungalow *Sought After, Quiet Location In Tettenhall, Wolverhampton
*Three/Four Bedrooms *Modern Fitted Kitchen/Diner *Block Paved Drive And Separate Garage *Generous Master Bedroom *Corner Plot *Rear Garden *Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
This substantially extended and much improved four bedroom semi detached home with garage and parking is immaculately presented throughout and enjoys an enviable setting in one of the areas most sought after residential locations close to highly regarded schools and local amenities. A very desira...
"OUTSTANDING EXTENDED DETACHED! This impressive family home benefits from a two storey rear extension, FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO EN SUITE SHOWER ROOMS as well being comprehensively refurbished throughout from front to back. As well as comprising of gas central heating & uPVC double glazing this spa..."
"* An attractive 3-bedroom link-detached house of comfortable proportions on a peaceful Compton cul-de-sac. With a lovely rear garden, a garage, breakfast kitchen, and an excellent open-plan living space * Porch * Downstairs WC * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Large L-shaped open-plan lounge and di..."
This detached house has been thoughtfully extended and internal inspection is essential in order to fully appreciate the ideal family accommodation. It is situated behind a neat frontage in a popular tree lined road within a sought after residential neighbourhood and is ideally located for all...
"""A CHAIN FREE FIVE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, 24ft lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility, downstairs wc, FIVE BEDROOMS, family shower room, side & rear garden, garage to rear."
"Wakeley Hill is a detached family home which has been extended by the current owners and now offers well proportioned living spaces with off road parking for several vehicles and a lovely landscaped garden with an open aspect to the rear. The internal accommodation briefly comprises lounge, kitch..."
"A fantastic and unusually spacious two bedroom apartment, offering superb contemporary living accommodation located within close proximity to sought-after Tettenhall village."
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Grade II Listed Detached Property
"* An enviable 2 bedroom first floor apartment individually designed to a high specification having only had one owner * Immediately off Tettenhall’s leafy Lower Green * Walking distance to local amenities and bus links * Private development * Hall * Open plan kitchen, dining and living area..."
No summary available.
"Presenting to the market a fantastic THREE BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY located on the very recent urban village development offering great access to transport links, amenities and schools. The property has been finished to a high specification with large living spaces and a kitchen dining..."
A well-positioned three-bedroom bungalow within the sought-after residence of Tettenhall.
"A recently renovated and restyled dormer bungalow providing immaculate, contemporary accommodation over two floors in a popular location"
"A superb family house occupying a pleasant cul de sac position in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities including Bantock Park, this deceptive semi-detached property has been thoughtfully extended and restyled to create an excellent family home!"
"LARGE DETACHED HOME. FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED E. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND D. , This property has been comprehensively refurbished and extended to provide a large family home in the desirable location of Compton, close to some of Wolverhampton's best schools. The flexible accommodatio..."
"Occupying a choice position on a popular modern development convenient for the majority of amenities and within easy walking distance of Compton Village & the amenities therein, this delightful property is a superb example of a family home. "
"Situated in one of the most established residential areas in Wolverhampton, this deceptive semi-detached property has been extended over the years to provide a most spacious and versatile interior, presenting an excellent example of a well-appointed family house."
"***This property is affected by historical mining activity with report available upon request*** A stunning, immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached family home situated in a popular residential area of Lanesfield. This spacious residence benefits from central heating, double gla..."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND HIGHLY DECEPTIVE AND EXTENDED DETACHED BUNGALOW ON OFFER"" Comprising of large front and rear gardens, 31ft garage to side, internally there is a lounge, fantastic refitted entertainment breakfast kitchen, utility, 2/3 bedrooms, dining room, separate lounge, bathroom."
** Hugely Extended! ** ** Planning Permission Granted For Further Extensions! ** Belvoir are pleased to present this magnificent and imposing semi detached property to the market. This wonderful home has been kept immaculately and has seen various extensions and improvements over i...
"*Executive, Modern, End of Terrace Home *Beautifully Presented *Two En Suite's *Four Bedrooms *Sought After Location *NHBC Certificate *Block Paved Drive For Ample Parking *Garage *Superb Kitchen/Diner *Lounge And Family Room Enclosed Rear Garden *Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
**DETACHED THREE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION WITH DETACHED GARAGE TO THE REAR** Positioned in a sought-after location with amenities close by including schools and shops and great access links to jobs at the i54 and motorway links to Telford and Birmingham. The property offers a la...
"An impressive and substantial detached four bedroom, two reception room and two bathroom family home. This well presented residence offers family size accommodation, benefitting from central heating, majority double glazing, off road parking for numerous vehicles and a detached double garage...."
"Get your ""Graft on"" and make sure you visit this immaculately presented and fully renovated detached family residence. It offers the most exceptional living accommodation throughout. Restyled and redesigned to a standard you will be blown away with and located within th..."
"FREEHOLD FAMILY HOME. EPC RATED E. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a beautifully presented family home, offering a delightful blend of period character and modern fittings. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom/ WC, two reception rooms, conservatory, modern kit..."
"Perfectly located on one of the desirable streets in Bradmore/Merry Hill, Wolverhampton with amenities nearby such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and excellent transporting links this delightful detached property offers character and charm in abundance along with a well appointed level of acc..."
"* A very attractive and luxurious 2-bedroom ground-floor retirement apartment in a superb, modern McCarthy & Stone community. With master en suite and walk-in wardrobe, a well-appointed kitchen, and a door from the living area directly to the excellent grounds * Hall * Large living and dining spa..."
An immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached property in a highly sought after location. Offered for sale with No Chain
"Appealing traditional detached residence on generous plot in very popular neighbourhood on the north-western outskirts of the city and handily placed to access motorway network. Well proportioned layout and scope for further updating and extensions, subject to relevant planning permission. Porch ..."
" Occupying a large plot within this prestigious Lower Penn address enjoying a semi rural location yet ideally placed to both Wolverhampton city centre and Wombourne village, this substantially extended and significantly improved semi detached family home offers three double bedrooms, house bathr..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of lounge, kitchen diner, downstairs wc and utility room. Upstairs there are 3 good sized bedrooms and a generous family bathroom. Externally to the front there is a driveway leading to the garage and enclosed rear garden."
"This very well-presented TWO bedroom detached bungalow is an exception of its type and can be found close to the outskirts of Penn, a popular residential quarter of the city favoured for its extensive local amenities, schools, and proximity to commuter links. Noted for its most except..."
"An extended family home in a corner position set back from the road. Enter the property into a large porch area that is open plan to the hall, utility and downstairs shower room. Also off the hall is the large spacious lounge and the kitchen/diner/family area with patio doors out into the pati..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a beautifully-presented family home in the popular location of Penn. The accommodation comprises an entrance porch and hall, guest WC, large extended living room, with separate dining, lounge, and snug areas, large breakf..."
"This Four Bedroom Detached Property is located on Park Hall Road in Goldthorn and is within very close proximity to amenities nearby such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and has excellent transporting links heading into and out of Wolverhampton. To the ground floor the property features two re..."
"* A wonderful investment opportunity in a sought-after residential part of Wolverhampton, currently presented as a 2-bedroom end-terrace on a large development plot. Potential to construct a new 3-bedroom dwelling and extend the existing house, subject to planning applications * Hall * Lounge * D..."
"Immaculately presented and conveniently positioned 2 Bedroom modern style detached Bungalow occupying a cul-de-sac position just off Springhill Lane, handy for local shopping facilities and easily accessible to the city centre. The comfortable interior layout features: Entrance Porch and Hall; Lo..."
"Situated within one of the most favourable areas of Tettenhall this most desirable dormer style detached property is placed on a generous plot most conveniently to the A41 and the vibrant Tettenhall Green and Tettenhall Wood respectively with both hosting a variety of independent shops, boutique..."
A well presented dormer bungalow set well back from the road in a sought after Tettenhall location NO UPWARD CHAIN
"An absolute delight to bring to market is this extended and well-proportioned traditional semi-detached house offering three bedroomed accommodation, staircase to fully boarded loft space with Velux windows and spacious extended living to ground floor with the benefits of three reception rooms an..."
"It’s all about open-plan living in our iconic three-bedroom Houghton. If it’s light and space you are after then look no further. The kitchen-diner offers ample space for all of the household, while the master bedroom features an en-suite and fitted wardrobe –"
"This delightful semi-detached home offers five bedrooms, two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, a utility, a three piece family bathroom along with a shower en-suite and a downstairs WC. Externally, this property benefits from a rear garden and a three car driveway. This property presents a fanta..."
A recently refurbished property which is one of the very few properties in the development that benefits from both a driveway and a garage that adjoin the property. Highgrove is a highly regarded retirement scheme and is considered to be one of the finest of its type in the area.
A stunning period residence set over 3 floors effortlessly combines original features and modern fittings is located most conveniently towards the City centre and A41 respectively . This Victorian semi-detached villa enjoys spacious family accommodation which has been subtlety decorated and brief...
"**FIVE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH TWO ENSUITES - VIEWINGS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED** Off road parking, large lounge and conservatory, fitted kitchen/diner, downstairs w.c. four upstairs bedroom with ensuite to master and family bathroom. Double glazing and central heating."
"Situated within walking distance of Tettenhall Village and the amenities therein, this splendid ground floor apartment has been constructed to a well-planned design utilising the maximum space. Built in 2018 by McCarthy & Stone, Thorneycroft is an first class example of a luxury retirement developm"
"NO CHAIN - Spacious detached bungalow occupying a substantial plot with double entry driveway and large garden to the rear. Versatile living accommodation includes large living room with dining room off, superb conservatory, breakfast kitchen, modernised bathroom and two/three bedrooms."
"OVERLOOKING PARK - GARAGE AND DRIVE WAY - FOUR BEDROOMS - ENSUITE - OPEN KITCHEN/DINER - An immaculate four bedroom detached family home overlooking an open parkland, situated on a popular modern development in the Oxley area. The property comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner, utility r..."
A particularly well situated bungalow with well proportioned two bedroom accommodation and lovely gardens in a sought after Finchfield address.
"Innovate Estate Agents are pleased to present this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY situated in Bilston! The property boasts of OFF ROAD PARKING, REAR GARAGE, front entrance porch, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, FITTED KITCHEN, CONSERVATORY, utility room, downstairs shower room, family bathroom, rear garden,..."
A well located link-detached three bedroom family home standing in a sought after cul-de-sac in Finchfield.
A spacious two-bedroom first floor apartment providing well-appointed accommodation within the sought-after area of Tettenhall.
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW RECENTLY MODERNISED THROUGHOUT TO A HIGH STANDARD** Impressive split-level bungalow boasting stunning rear views, newly fitted kitchen/diner area and large lounge area. Two double bedrooms and third bedroom/office space and conservatory. ..."
"Three bedroom semi-detached period family home refurbished to a high standard throughout situated in residential location offering no upward chain. Located within 1 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges a..."
" ***OUR OPENING TIMES ARE 9AM-9PM, 7 DAYS A WEEK!*** This spacious two bedroom bungalow is located in Finchfield which is a very desirable part of Wolverhampton and is within catchment to some very good schools and local amenities nearby. The property briefly comprises of; a hallway, a lo..."
An Immaculate Spacious Family Home in a Quiet Corner Position. Enter the property into the welcoming porch that leads into the hall. Doors lead to the spacious lounge with a light and bright feel; open plan into the dining room. A well equipped galley kitchen that is 'L' shaped and goes towards ...
"An extended semi-detached property complimented by a 'WREN' kitchen with both internal and external bi-foldable doors plus a downstairs shower room is very well presented and offers modern and spacious living accommodation which also includes an entrance hall, lounge, utility cupboard, three..."
"""AN FANTASTIC 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME SIT ON THE POPULAR WOODHALL ROAD"" Comprising of driveway, large enclosed rear garden, entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, separate dining room, downstairs wet room, kitchen, utility, garage, 3 double bedrooms, family bathroom and separate toi..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Compton and occupying an elevated position with a great view to the front aspect overlooking the horizon, this lovely three bedroom link detached property has been well cared for over the years by its current vendors to create superb living ac..."
A well-appointed three bedroom family residence providing extended accommodation to the ground floor.
Braden Road is an extended semi-detached family home which has been considerably enhanced by the current owners during their tenure with off road parking to the front and a large rear garden. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)
"Beautifully presented four/five bedroom detached family home idyllically situated in a hugely popular residential area of Bilston. This generously sized property is located close to local amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities..."
"Beautifully presented two/three bedroom detached bungalow situated on a large corner plot in a hugely popular area in Penn. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport avai..."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is an impressive Modern Three Double bedroom Detached property which occupies a most pleasant position in a sought after cul de sac location and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area and excellent schools near by.
A well located ground floor apartment standing in a sought after address and which has the benefit of a garage and a very long lease
DETACHED PROPERTY - SPLIT OVER 3 FLOORS - LARGE GARDEN - IDEAL FAMILY HOME - GOOD LOCATION
" Soul Estates are proud to present this well presented extended 3 / 4 bedroom semi-detached house For Sale. This perfect family home is situated in a very popular area of Wolverhampton in Upper Penn, with excellent local schools and local amenities near by. The property is located near Penn Hos..."
"Occupying a choice and elevated position this link detached property is situated in-between the amenities of both Tettenhall Green and Compton where both offer a variety of local shops, independent boutiques, cafes, and bus routes towards and away from the City centre. Located within the catchme..."
A well located and well maintained detached family home standing in a sought after cul-de-sac setting
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE AN ELEGANT & IMPRESSIVE TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOME"" Comprising of beautiful front & rear gardens, lounge, sitting room, cloak room, dining room, kitchen, utility, guest wc, cellar, FOUR BEDROOMS, two bathroom areas. VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"
"* A wonderful 2-bedroom, second-floor luxury retirement apartment in Tettenhall’s prestigious Clock Gardens, close to Upper Green. Features an en suite master bedroom and dressing area, a 25ft living space with dual-aspect Juliet balconies, superb communal gardens, and excellent on-site fac..."
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a very well-presented home which has been much improved. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, a fitted kitchen, two generous reception rooms, an inner hall, a ground-floor shower / WC, an office / fourth bedroom,..."
"Located on the very sought after Yale estate, within easy access to Wednesfield town centre is this wonderful four bedroom detached family home. The property boasts 4 bedrooms, with en suite to master, family bathroom, modern kitchen/breakfast room, separate dining room, good sized lounge and clo..."
"Large semi-detached home in a highly sought after location, convenient for Penn Common and the highly regarded St. Bartholomew's Primary School. Extended and with a generous garden to the rear the property includes separate living and sitting rooms, dining kitchen, ground floor w.c, three good si..."
"""THIS BEAUTIFUL PERIOD PROPERTY OOZES CHARACTER"" This three bedroom semi-detached home is situated within close proximity to Wolverhampton city centre and local amenities, this property MUST BE VIEWED TO APPRECIATE ALL ACCOMMODATION ON OFFER."
"An extended, well maintained Two Bedroom Detached Bungalow situated in a very pleasant cul-de-sac within a quiet and well-regarded area. A range of excellent local amenities are nearby including Bantock Park, schools and a number of shops. One of the bedrooms has been extended to provide enh..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and occupying a choice position, this distinctive & unique semi-detached property has been thoughtfully restyled to create superb living accommodation ideal as a spacious family house. "
"""RECENTLY BUILT 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR AREA"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, diner, utility room, downstairs wc, 4 good sized bedrooms, 2 en-suites and a family bathroom. Externally there is a driveway to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"A delightfully presented three-bedroom semi-detached house conveniently situated on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton convenient for local shopping facilities and public transport and with easy access to the city centre. Offering roomy accommodation finished to an excellent standard, the..."
"Occupying a prominent corner position on the corner of Links Road and Wakeley Hill, in one of the most favoured locations in Penn, this distinctive and attractive semi-detached house has been sympathetically maintained over the years to provide an excellent example of a spacious family home. "
"""A STUNNING THREE/FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY WITH A DETACHED GARAGE TO REAR"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs shower room, dining room, kitchen, large open plan lounge, three/four bedrooms (Bedroom Four/study), family bathroom, double detached garage, large wrap around driv..."
"Council Tax band C FREEHOLD We are delighted to present to the market this brand new four-bedroom, end of terrace town house situated on Broadleaf Gardens, Wolverhampton. The property offers a well-adapted layout, spacious and comfortable accommodation making it the pe..."
"An impressive family home which has been well maintained by current owners, occupying a generous plot upon the highly desirable Ettingshall Park estate of Wolverhampton. Being EXTENDED to rear ground floor, this good-sized traditional semi detached property also comprises; gas central heating, do..."
"""A SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, large lounge, dining room, extended kitchen, four bedrooms (set over two floors), family bathroom, off road parking, garden to side & enclosed rear garden."
"NO CHAIN - Extended four bedroom semi-detached home in a highly sought after location with generous living accommodation throughout. Whilst requiring some cosmetic updating, the property offers tremendous living accommodation, including an inviting reception hall, sitting room, living room, snug..."
A substantial detached property occupying a pleasant position in an extremely popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This spacious family home with three double bedrooms is offered for sale with no upward chain and must be seen to be appreciated. This impressive residence bene...
"An attractive, detached residence standing in an excellent corner plot in a popular and sought after residential location. NO UPWARD CHAIN 28 DAY EXCHANGE REQUIRED"
"Occupying a choice position in a small exclusive cul de sac just off Windsor Avenue & therefore in one of the most favoured locations in Penn, this distinctive detached property is a superb example of a good size family home."
"IMMACULATE, MODERN AND STYLISHLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM DETACHED PROPERTY. This extremely well presented family home is located on an extremely popular modern development and has been maintained throughout to a particularly high standard. The accommodation to this residence br..."
"Situated in a popular residential area on the corner of Aldersley Road & Lynton Avenue and within walking distance of local Schools & Shops, this spacious detached house has been built to a well-planned design utilising the maximum space and is an excellent example of a good size family house. Taste"
"Welcomed by the Ample Red Crete imprint driveway this 4 bedroom semi-detached house is not to be missed. Based in Wolverhampton.  The ground floor benefits from a separate dining room, Fitted Kitchen, Utility room, guest W.C, Garden, Driveway and Garage. The first floor offers A family ba..."
""" A LARGE FIVE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, entertainment kitchen, five bedrooms and family bathroom. Off road parking to front and a large enclosed rear garden."
"Set well back from the road just off Stockwell Road and therefore located in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall, within walking distance of Tettenhall Village & the amenities therein, this beautifully presented apartment is positioned on the first floor of this distinctive & modern"
Occupying choice position within this mature and generous plot set back off the road this deceptively spacious and versatile bungalow already provides an excellent choice of accommodation but in our opinion would prove ideal for that discerning buyer looking to acquire a property that they ...
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Traditional-style Detached with pleasant wooded outlook in a much-favoured neighbourhood on the outskirts of Wolverhampton city, located close to Tettenhall Village and within walking distance of local shops and bus stops. Well-proportioned accommodation with further upgrading..."
"A very well presented three bedroom detached property, standing within a convenient location."
" * PART EXCHANGE CONSIDERED * A superb 2-bedroom, first-floor luxury apartment in a magnificent McCarthy & Stone Retirement Plus complex (This apartment was one of the first to be purchased), with Juliet balcony, considerable on-site facilities, secure parking, and beautiful grounds. Just a short..."
"""A SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED & EXTENDED 4/5 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising hall, reception room, lounge, kitchen, bedroom 5, downstairs shower room, 4 first floor bedrooms, en-suite & a family bathroom, brick built storage shed, off road parking, enclosed rear garden"
A beautifully presented Victorian home with the added benefit of an annex
"**DETACHED 3/4 BEDROOM HOME, MODERNISED TO A HIGH STANDARD** Located in a popular cul-de-sac location of Pendeford, with amenities close by including schools and shops and offering easy access to the M54 and bus links. The property comprises; a large lounge, a fitted modern kitchen with an ope..."
"* A comfortably proportioned and well-presented 3-bedroom semi-detached house in desirable Finchfield, within walking distance of considerable local schooling and amenities. Includes extensive gated parking, garage, and planning permission to extend * Porch * Hall * Lounge * Living and dining roo..."
"""DETACHED 4/5 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL DE SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, open plan lounge/ diner, kitchen, utility room, downstairs wc, conservatory to rear, office, 4 bedrooms, ensuite, family bathroom. Large block paved driveway and rear garden."
"* A very spacious, well-presented 3-bedroom detached house in a very enviable position, close to Tettenhall village and the Compton canal basin. Features an excellent rear garden with sandstone rock-face, a sizeable through lounge, driveway parking, and a garage * Hall * Through lounge * Dining r..."
"Occupying a pleasant cul-de-sac position on this popular modern development, set well back from the road and overlooking open greenery at front, this charming detached house is a superb example of a well appointed family home with a number of features throughout."
"This highly presented modern detached property is conveniently located for the I54 business park and offers easy access to the M54, M6 and further road networks beyond. Pendeford itself has a large supermarket along with a range of smaller shops, library, health centre, community centre and a var..."
"** Superb Extended Semi! ** ** Immaculate Condition Throughout! ** Belvoir are delighted to present this magnificent semi-detached home to the market, no expense has been spared with the quality and finish of this wonderful home, perfectly blending contemporary design with timeless..."
"A well situated, detached family home with rooms of excellent proportions in a sought after and convenient location"
"A rare opportunity to purchase a five bedroom family home offering versatile living accommodation and situated in popular residential area in Fallings Park, close to local amenities and schools with easy access to Wolverhampton City centre."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and easy within walking distance of the Village High Street & the amenities therein, this delightful and most intriguing cottage property provides charming living accommodation with a host of captivating and period features throughout."
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME
Comprising entrance hall, downstairs W/C, family lounge, modern kitchen diner, three bedrooms, modern family bathroom plus en-suite, off road parking & garage, & rear gardens with artificial lawn"
"A four bedroom detached property in a corner position in a quiet cul de sac in Moseley Parklands Wolverhampton. Enter the property into the porch that leads to the hall, downstairs cloakroom and lounge which has double doors to the dining room. Also on the ground floor is the kitchen and conser..."
"* A well-proportioned 3-bedroom, modern detached house, perfectly positioned for families. Close to local schools, parks, and other amenities, with two excellent reception spaces, garaging, and a master bedroom with en suite * Hall * Downstairs WC * Lounge * Dining room * Kitchen * Master bedroom..."
"* A comfortable 2-bedroom link-detached bungalow on a select Finchfield cul-de-sac, with beautiful gardens, car port, a well-appointed kitchen, and a garden room/utility * Hall * Large living and dining room with full-height, garden facing windows * Kitchen * Garden room/utility * Two bedrooms * ..."
"Situated in an established residential area and within easy access of the city centre, this characteristic Victorian semi-detached house has been extensively refurbished by the present owners providing a host of attractive & period features throughout adding to the charm and appeal of this tradition"
"A luxury TWO BEDROOM retirement apartment. Situated on the FIRST FLOOR in our prestigious THORNEYCROFT development. Further benefits include two WC's, Walk out balcony with garden views. Imposing hallway. MUST BE VIEWED"
"""4/5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, downstairs wc, lounge, large open plan entertainment kitchen diner, 4/5 bedrooms, large Jack and Jill style bathroom, off road parking to front, generous rear garden area."
"""A CHAIN FREE 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, large open plan lounge/ dining room, kitchen, side storage area/ utility room, 3 good sized bedrooms, large family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front, large enclosed rear garden."
"A superb, traditional three bedroom semi-detached property which has been extended to the rear to create a large living kitchen"
 **A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE** **CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION** **CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS & AMENITIES** **CONSERVATORY** **TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** **UTILITY ROOM & DOWNSTAIRS W.C.** **EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM** **GARAGE AND GATED DRIVEWAY AFFORDING OFF ROAD PARKING** 
"* Apartment 4 * First-floor, 2-bedroom luxury apartment * In an exclusive canal-side location * Peaceful views over the canal * Within walking distance of amenities * Ground-floor entrance porch * Hall * Lovely large, bright open-plan kitchen, living and dining room * Master bedroom with en suite..."
Tyron Ash Real Estate are very proud to present this stunning four bedroom family home located in a sought after area with convenient access to all amenities. Open the Full Ad to find out more!
**DO NOT JUDGE A BOOK BY ITS COVER** as the saying goes...... this bungalow is definitely not as it may seem from the front aspect.... Step inside to a sheer Tardis of a property with surprisingly spacious and versatile living and immensely deceptive with all it has to offer. It could be suggest...
"Deceptively spacious four bedroom semi-detached period family home situated in residential location of Blakenhall offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bu..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Delightfully positioned and deceptively spacious 4 Bedroom, 2 Bathroom Semi-Detached House occupying a semi-rural position on the south western city outskirts with field views to the rear yet conveniently placed for access to facilities at nearby Wombourne and Merry Hill. The ..."
"MUST BE SEEN! - DOUBLE LENGTH GARAGE & CAR PORT - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS - CONSERVATORY - CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION - A superb four bedroom detached family home within a quiet cul-de-sac location in the popular Moseley Parklands area. The property comprises; entrance hall, cloakroom/WC, lounge, se..."
"""A WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, 3 bedrooms, en-suite, family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front, enclosed rear garden."
"A Stunning Bungalow in a Quiet Cul de Sac in Sought After Area. Enter the property into the hallway, all doors lead off and at the end is a convenient utility store area. A spacious well equipped kitchen with breakfast bar into the dining area; patio doors open up into the rear garden. To the f..."
A LARGE 3/4 BEDROOM BUNGALOW WITH PLENTY OF SCOPE FOR DEVELOPMENT. LOCATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA WITHIN EASY REACH OF THE CITY CENTRE AND WITH EXCELLENT COMMUTER LINKS
"* An ideally situated and generously proportioned 3-bedroom detached house with three well-designed, connected but open-plan reception spaces, a large utility, and a sizeable garden at the rear * Hall * Lounge * Kitchen * Utility with downstairs WC off * Dining room * Family room * Two double bed..."
"BACKING ONTO OPEN COUNTRYSIDE - EXTENDED - LARGE GARDEN - DRIVEWAY PARKING - NO UPPER CHAIN - An extended four bedroom semi-detached family home in the sought after area of Lower Penn, occupying a fantastic plot with stunning views across open countryside. The property comprises; entrance hall wi..."
""" A FANTASTIC 3 STORY 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, downstairs wc, lounge, extended kitchen, 3 bedrooms, en-suite and family bathroom. Off Road parking to font, enclosed rear garden with woodland views to rear."
"Spacious four bedroom detached family home well-presented throughout situated within sought after modern housing estate overlooking the park. Located 2.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure f..."
"FREEHOLD. WOLVERHAMPTON CITY COUNCIL TAX BAND C. Large family home in popular area with extensive off street parking. This beautifully presented extended home comprises entrance porch and hallway, lounge, kitchen, dining room, utility room with fitted units, principle bedroom with dressing room, ..."
"Beautifully presented link-detached home in a sought after cul-de-sac location. Extensively refurbished in 2020 the versatile accommodation comprises through living/dining room, re-fitted kitchen, ground floor w.c, ground floor double bedroom, large first floor bedroom and bathroom. Double length..."
"Extended four bedroom detached family home situated on a generous plot in popular residential location of Bradmore. Located close to amenities, including; shops, sought after schools at primary & senior levels, colleges and a number of leisure facilities, with further benefits such as pu..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, kitchen diner, lounge, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom and a garage to side. Generous off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
A well presented two bedroom house in this retirement development with the added benefit of a garage
"An extremely well maintained detached bungalow situated in a popular residential area with two double bedrooms and conservatory. This impressive home offers spacious accommodation and benefits from central heating, double glazing, off road parking plus garage and a delightful and private garden t..."
"NOW VACANT AND AVAILABLE TO VIEW! Four bedroom detached home with driveway, living room, dining kitchen, study, conservatory, four bedrooms, en-suite shower room, bathroom and ground floor shower room. Popular location convenient for public transport links and access to Birmingham and Wolverhampton."
"Occupying a choice position in an established residential area this period, Victorian style end of terrace property enjoys both a spacious and versatile lay out of living accommodation over three floors and has been completely refurbished throughout and is complimented by high ceilings and skirti..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a rare opportunity to acquire this very impressive Four bedroom End Terraced property which occupies a pleasant position and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area including local shops, schools, public transport services, Bantock Park just up the..."
"""A CHAIN FREE EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM BAY FRONTED TRADITIONAL PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising porch, hall, downstairs shower room, lounge, dining room, two part kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, bathroom, garage to side, large off road parking to front & generous rear garden."
"Situated in a select cul de sac location just off Merridale Road and therefore convenient for the majority of amenities, in particular within walking distance of Wolverhampton Grammar School, this deceptive detached property offers spacious and well planned living accommodation"
"""CASH OFFERS IN INVITED FOR THIS CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner, utility room, three bedrooms, wet room, off road parking, front & rear gardens situated on a generous size plot."
"A spacious detached home offering ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is being marketed with the benefit of no upward chain and is conveniently situated on the fringe of Wednesfield town centre and ideally located for all essential  amenities, Bentley bridge retail p..."
"Situated in one of the most popular residential areas of Finchfield and within walking distance of schools & shops, this attractive semi-detached property has been restyled to create contemporary and practical living accommodation with the advantage of being neatly decorated throughout "
"Extended family home offering superb living accommodation and set within a popular location convenient for local shops, schools, public transport and access to the city centre and M54. Large through living room, spacious dining kitchen, ground floor w.c, five bedrooms, bathroom, garage and pleasa..."
No upward chain is offered for this spacious detached home occupying a generous sized plot in a sought after residential area in Penn. The property would benefit from some investment to modernise however it has been very well maintained throughout. Approached via a private driveway and with...
"""A SUBSTANTIAL 5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large open plan lounge/ dining area, second reception room, large kitchen, downstairs shower room, 5 bedrooms, generous family bathroom, garage to rear, enclosed rear garden."
"FANTASTIC PURCHASE OPPORTUNITY THREE BEDROOM **EXTENDED** FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA OF PENN, WOLVERHAMPTON Whitegates Estate Agents have immense pleasure in offering FOR SALE this LARGE well presented, Spacious 1930s home available on Canterbury Roa..."
A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE THIS LOVELY FAMILY HOME WITHIN A POPULAR LOCATION IN WOLVERHAMPTON. DON'T MISS OUT CALL HAART TODAY!
"Beautifully presented and significantly extended four-bedroom detached family home idyllically situated in a hugely popular area of Wolverhampton which backs onto Oxley Golf Course. This generously sized property is located close to local amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, scho..."
This is an extensively Extended Modern Four bedroom Semi Detached property occupying a desirable position in a sought after cul de sac location with a range of general amenities in the area and near to Wolverhampton City centre. The property provides extremely spacious well planned family livi...
"Immensely deceptive detached five bedroom bungalow set back from the main road on a generous plot within sought after residential location with spacious room sizes throughout offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, wi..."
"Uniquely presented traditional three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated in a sought after location of Goldthorn Park within catchment of some of the best schools in Wolverhampton Idyllically positioned close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, unive..."
"""A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, front reception room, rear extended lounge, large open plan kitchen, ground floor Bedroom with wc, three first floor bedrooms, large family bathroom, off road parking"
"Extended three bedroom semi-detached family home decorated to a high standard throughout situated in popular residential cul de sac location of Penn. Located within 1.5 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, college..."
"""A SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED & EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION"" Comprising hall, lounge, extended dining room, extended kitchen, four bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking & a delightful enclosed rear garden backing to Oxley golf course."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE FIVE/SIX BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, ground floor shower room, 32ft lounge, office/study/play room (potential Bed 6), kitchen, FIVE BEDROOMS, family bathroom, off road parking & enclosed rear garden."
A two-bedroom ground floor apartment standing in an elevated and convenient position only a short distance from Compton shops (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & HIGHLY DECEPTIVE EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED HOME"" Comprising sitting room, lounge, family room/conservatory, kitchen diner, breakfast area, utility, three/four bedrooms, two shower rooms, outbuilding (ideal for conversion), hot tub & entertainment pod included in sale."
A well presented detached property located within the heart of Finchfield which itself offers an abundance of renowned stores and also independent shops as well as being in the catchment area of a number of desired schools. The accommodation has been comprehensively updated and re styled to provi...
"** UNEXPECTEDLY RE-OFFERED DUE TO CANCELLATION - NO UPWARD CHAIN ** Modern style 2 Bedroom Detached Bungalow, well presented and usefully enlarged, situated in a delightful private drive setting just off Church Hill on the established south western city suburbs near to local shopping and amenitie..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a Modern Three bedroom Detached property which is pleasantly situated in a small cul de sac location and handily placed for a range of general amenities in this sought after location including shops, excellent schools and public transport services."
"Ideally situated within Bilston town and as such convenient for many local amenities, local METRO Tram and commute beyond. This traditional detached family residence offers deceptively spacious accommodation of two reception rooms, kitchen, generous conservatory, three bedrooms, shower-room, s..."
"""AN OUTSTANDING DETACHED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wet room, three generous bedrooms, family bathroom, generous off road parking, garage & a large enclosed rear garden."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE SPACIOUS TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME WHICH REQUIRES VIEWING TO FULLY APPRECIATE"" Comprising lounge, sitting room, adjoining feature entertainment conservatory, kitchen, ground floor shower room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & large rear garden with car port to ..."
"A beautifully presented family home in a prime position in a quiet cul de sac in Pendeford. On the market with No Upward Chain. Enter the three bedroom detached property into the porch that leads into the hall. On the ground floor is the open plan lounge / dining room, kitchen, utility, downsta..."
"""A LARGE CORNER PLOT DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH DOUBLE DETACHED GARAGE TO REAR (IDEAL FOR CONVERSION)"" This CHAIN FREE bungalow comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, two/three bedrooms (see Agents Note), fitted bathroom, front, side & rear gardens with off road parking & double garage."
"* NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a superior and attractive Extended Three bedroom Extended Semi Detached property which is pleasantly situated in a sought after location with a range of general amenities in the area including shops, excellent schools and public transport services."
"**MODERN THREE-BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME COMING TO MARKET SOON - EARLY VIEWING IS ADVISED** Beautifully presented family home situated on a generous plot, in a much-favoured neighbourhood with a good selection of local amenities close by. The interior layout features: Porch; Entrance Hall with ..."
A recently refurbished semi-detached property standing in a sought after cul-de-sac on the Finchfield / Castlecroft border with a delightful outlook over a central green to the front and a large garden to the rear.
"Spacious Family End of Terraced Home, Ready to Move Into. Enter the property into the entrance hall that leads to the front reception room and the large light and bright lounge which is open plan into the breakfast bar area of the kitchen diner. Double patio doors from the lounge lead into the g..."
**DETACHED BUNGALOW** **TWO BEDROOMS ** **SPACIOUS** **KITCHEN** **UTI ** **FAMILY BATHROOM** **LOUNGE** **DINING AREA** ** GARAGE** DELIGHTFUL GARDEN TO THE FORE**
"CHAIN FREE!!!
Located in a most sought after area, is this beautifully presented and deceptively spacious, two/three bedroom link-detached Chalet Dorma-Bungalow. The property benefits from a good sized lounge and has a separate dining room (previously used as a third bedroom). The kitchen breakf..."
** EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED MODERN SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SET OVER THREE FLOORS ** FOUR WELL PROPORTIONED BEDROOMS ** ENSUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM AND TWO FURTHER FAMILY BATHROOMS ** REFITTED KITCHEN ** LOCAL SUPERMARKET AND NURSERY ON DOORSTEP ** Located in the heart of Wolverhampton -...
"A superb three storey modern town house in a quiet cull-de-sac location offering flexibility of use with good size rooms to all floors and stunning canal views. Offering Four Bedrooms, Garage, Driveway and Spacious Rear Garden. Call Now On to View!!!"
A THREE STORY HOME READY TO MOVE INTO. Modern showroom standard decorated to a the highest standard throughout and very aesthetically pleasing. This is a unmissable opportunity for a beautiful home in a sought after location in Wednesfield. Upon entering the property into the hallway that leads ...
Fantastic Extended Family Home! Belvoir are delighted to present this beautifully appointed home to the market.
"""A SEMI-DETACHED 4 BEDROOM 3 STORY MODERN STYLE TOWN HOUSE"" Comprising of entrance hall, large modern fitted kitchen, lounge, downstairs wc, 4 bedrooms, en-suite, shower room, family bathroom (no fitted bathroom suite). Garage, off road parking to front and a rear garden."
"*Beautifully Presented, Extended Detached Home *Close To Sought After Schools *Garden Room/Office With It's Own WIFI
*Superb Fitted Kitchen/Diner *First Floor Bathroom/WC And Downstairs Shower Room/WC *Block Paved Drive *Rear Garden *Chain Free *Viewing Highly Recommended"
"Much extended and improved over the years by the current owners to offer a spacious family home. This traditional semi-detached home requires personal viewing for full appreciation.Situated within this established residential area to the north-west of Wolverhampton, ideal for local amen..."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE & SPACIOUS CHAIN FREE DETACHED END PLOT PROPERTY WHICH OFFERS FLEXIBLE LIVING ACCOMMODATION"" Comprising off road parking, car port, rear garden with outbuildings, kitchen diner, lounge, wc, FOUR BEDROOMS & GROUND FLOOR HOME OFFICE & UTILITY (annex conversion potential)."
"* A well-proportioned 3-bedroom semi-detached house in Tettenhall Wood, convenient for Christ Church Infant School and nearby shops. With a garage, a substantial outbuilding, a modern breakfast kitchen, and gated parking * Porch * Hall * Lounge * Dining room * Downstairs WC * Modern breakfast kit..."
"Situation on the second floor of New Wing, set in the exclusive development knows as Wergs Hall & in a most picturesque setting with extensive mature surrounding gardens, internal inspection is highly recommended to appreciate the high standard of living accommodation. "
"Spacious, gas centrally heated, majority uPVC double-glazed 3/4 bedroom detached for modernisation upon fine corner plot offering considerable potential briefly comprising; Reception Hall, Lounge (with bay), Dining room, ""Home-Office""(alternative fourth Bedroom), Fitted Cloaks, Kitchen...."
"* A spacious 2-bedroom retirement property on a pleasant, quiet Tettenhall development, arranged over two floors with a patio garden, a bathroom on each floor, and allocated parking * Large L-shaped living & dining room * Kitchen * Ground-floor shower-room * First-floor bathroom * Master bedroom ..."
"* An ideally located 2-bedroom retirement property in charming Tettenhall, arranged over two floors with a patio garden, a bathroom on each floor, a garage, and allocated parking just outside the front door * Large L-shaped living & dining room * Kitchen * Ground-floor shower-room * First-floor b..."
*** BRIDGE VIEW - A BESPOKE DEVELOPMENT OF 3 & 4 BEDROOM HOUSES and 2 BEDROOM BUNGALOWS IN THE DELIGHTFUL VILLAGE OF WHEATON ASTON ***
PLOT 4 - FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED NEW BUILD FAMILY HOME Developer is now offering Assisted Move on all plots within the development. Please call for more details. Off Plan Reservations Being Taken NOW! CALL TODAY on .
Located on a popular road conveniently situated between Codsall Village and Tettenhall Green this semi-detached home is in need internal re-refurbishment yet offers an opportunity for a first time buyer or perhaps a young couple to update to their desired taste. The accommodation includes an entr...
**TWO-BEDROOM BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** *Potential to extend subject to relevant planning permission* A delightful two-bedroom bungalow in a pleasantly quiet and much sought-after location in good condition throughout and is within easy reach of a full range of amenities includi...
"""A CHAIN FREE AN RARE THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining room, downstairs wc, 3 good sized bedrooms, bathroom, separate wc, garage, front garden with off road parking and an enclosed rear garden."
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, set well back from the road, this individually designed semi-detached dormer style property offers surprisingly spacious living accommodation with the benefit of bedroom accommoda"
"Boasting a prominent corner position this well presented Detached House offers great potential for extending (subject to Planning Approval).Situated on a popular residential road the property benefits from three good bedrooms, a generous conservatory, guest cloakroom, GAS FIRED CENTRAL HEATING..."
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Well Extended Three Bed Semi Detached Property Being Situated In This Sought After Part Of Wednesfield Having Pleasant Park Views To The Front Aspect. The Property Comprises Of An Entrance Porch, Inner Hallway With Stairs To The F..."
"Internal inspection is highly recommended in order to fully appreciate this lovely family home. The property is set behind a spacious frontage in one of the areas most prestigious roads and is ideally located for all essential amenities including shops, schools and transport links. The versati..."
"Pleasantly positioned in a consistently popular neighbourhood and well served by local amenities, the comfortably proportioned accommodation is overall generally well maintained and being sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Wolverhampton City Centre is easily accessible with regular transportat..."
"""A SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, sitting room, fitted kitchen, ground floor wet room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Weller Court is a most attractive and imposing development of twenty-one individual executive apartments constructed by Wulfrun Homes in 2002 to a high specification. This tastefully appointed Duplex Apartment/maisonette has spacious living accommodation spread over two floor...
"FREEHOLD FAMILY HOME. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC AWAITED. This is a substantial family home, extended to the rear and with double-height extension to the side, and now providing an entrance porch, entrance hall, a dining room which is open-plan to a large lounge/ sitting room, ..."
PLOT 6 - THREE BEDROOM DETACHED NEW BUILD FAMILY HOME Developer is now offering Assisted Move on all plots within the development. Please call for more details. Off Plan Reservations Being Taken NOW! CALL TODAY on .
"""SIGNIFICANTLY EXTENDED 3/4 BEDROOM PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, various use room/ potential bedroom 4, 3 bedrooms, family shower room, off road parking to front, enclosed rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE WELL PRESENTED MODERN THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising modern fitted kitchen, lounge, sitting room/dining room/play room, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, master en-suite, modern family bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"An absolute delight to bring to market is this deceptive in its size and neutrally decorated throughout, well-proportioned detached house. Offering a secluded position in a favoured residential location, just off Birchwood Road at the head of the cul de sac with a similar designed prop..."
"**VACANT POSESSION** THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION IN WOLVERHAMPTON WITH HUGE POTENTION Whitegates have pleasure in offering FOR SALE this three-bedroom home situated on the popular Lower Prestwood Road, Wolverhampton. The property itself ..."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A RECENTLY REFURBISHED CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM THREE STOREY FAMILY HOME"" Comprising hall, lounge, dining room, ground floor wc, modern fitted kitchen, four bedrooms modern bathroom set over two floors, well presented front& rear gardens with off road parking."
"Three/four bedroom terrace townhouse immaculately presented across three floors situated in an immensely sought after residential cul de sac location of Wednesfield. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities. Public transport is available via bus ..."
"No Upward Chain A well presented three bedroomed detached property, occupying a quiet tucked away position with private driveway and a good sized rear garden giving great privacy. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, sc..."
"A modern three bedroom family home in a corner position in a quiet cul de sac. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the light and bright living room with patio doors to the garden. Also on the ground floor is the spacious kitchen/diner, the utility and the cloakroom. On the first flo..."
"""A FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED DOUBLE FRONTED CHARACTER PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising feature entrance hall, lounge, dining room, large extended kitchen with utility area, pantry, cellar, three large bedrooms, bathroom, small courtyard area to front, side vehicular access & rear garden."
"NO CHAIN - Extended three bedroom detached home in a choice cul-de-sac position comprising living room, extended sitting / dining room, kitchen , three generous bedrooms and bathroom. Driveway, garage to the rear, pleasant garden, well located for local shops, schools and public transport."
Bhylls Crescent sits within a popular residential location and has local shopping facilities available in Merry Hill and Castlecroft and the city centre is easily accessible. The area is well served by schooling in both sectors. This is an excellent size semi-detached property being so...
"Located within a highly desirable part of Wolverhampton, this tree bed semi has been completely renovated to the highest of standards. Viewing is essential!"
*Extended And Well Maintained Detached Home *Superb Extended Kitchen/Breakfast Room With Skylights *Popular Residential Location *Three Good Sized Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Drive To Front *Enclosed Rear Garden *Wooden Built Cabin In Garden *Guest WC *Family Bathroom/WC *Viewing Recommended
"Extended two bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated on a generous private plot within immensely sought after residential location of Penn offering no upward chain. Located within 2.9 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, s..."
"If you are looking for a superb detached EXTENDED family home, situated on a fantastic corner plot with already extended living accommodation to the ground floor and further benefits to extend even more, then look no further! This most impressive three bedroom detached house is ..."
"Viewings are essential for this immaculately presented, modern semi detached property in a sought after residential area of Penn fields. The property has been improved and very well maintained by the current owners and features a private driveway for off road parking for two cars and a generous..."
"Three bedroom semi detached family home newly redecorated throughout situated in sought after cul de sac location of Penn. Located within 1.5 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, w..."
A modern three bed detached family residence situated within a popular estate within the area
A most impressive property which has been improved to a high standard throughout
"A most attractive Grade II listed Georgian end terrace property, having been extensively improved upon over the years to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, provides surprisingly spacious and versatile living living accommodation, which is ideal for professional persons or a younger ..."
"An impressive EXTENDED traditional semi detached property located within popular area of Ettingshall Park. Being much improved & stylishly presented, this deceptively spacious family home is double glazed as well as boasting; entrance porch, hallway with storage, good-sized lounge-diner, at..."
"A fine example of a traditional bay fronted semi -detached property which has undergone considerable improvements by the current owner to create a well presented home located off an established road with accommodation including an entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, sun room, three bedrooms, s..."
Occupying a prime position in one of Wolverhampton's most sought after locations situated on the fringe of Penn Common and local countryside the property is a few minutes walk from St Bartholomew's church and village hall with the much admired and highly acclaimed St Bartholomew's school also clo...
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large lounge diner, recently refitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms, shower room, garage, large driveway to front, delightful enclosed rear garden."
"""A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, second reception room, extended kitchen, 3 bedrooms, loft room, family bathroom. Large rear gravelled area, large timber shed, small courtyard garden to front."
"Occupying a choice position on this extremely popular modern development, within easy access of the city centre & majority of amenities, this modern semi-detached family house has been styled by the present owners to create a stunning, first class home!"
"**NO CHAIN & RECENTLY MODERNSIED **THREE BEDROOMS**REFITTED GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM** EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE** Conveniently placed to Wolverhampton City Centre, this three bedroom mid terrace house offers a great investment opportunity or for a home hunter alike! "
"No upward chain is offered for this spacious and well maintained semi detached property in a sought after residential area in Bradmore, near Penn Fields. The property is well presented and occupies a large private plot allowing plenty of scope to extend. With a driveway to the front allowing..."
"""AN EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, garage, front & rear gardens."
"""A TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, conservatory/sun room, kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom, garage, generous off road parking to front & a wrap around side & rear gardens."
"This extended semi detached home offers ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is situated in a popular residential area and conveniently located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The property briefly comprises storm porch, ..."
"Conveniently positioned upon the enormously popular Ettingshall Park estate, this deceptively spacious, traditional family home is stylishly presented & benefits from rear extension. With gas central heating & double glazing, this impressive property also comprises of; entrance porch, ha..."
"This Three Bedroom Semi Detached Property is located on Rochester Avenue in Wednesfield and is very close to amenities such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and has excellent transporting links heading into and out of Wolverhampton including excellent links to New Cross Hospital and Bentley Bri..."
"An extremely well maintained semi-detached property offered for sale with no upward chain and situated in a popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This extended family home with three good size bedrooms plus a study/office, offers spacious accommodation with a delightful rear gar..."
The Chestnut is a traitional family home. On the ground floor the living room benefits from a dual aspect windows making it light and airy. Kitchen/diner provides the perfect setting with French doors that lead into the garden. The Chestnut also features a cloak room to the ground floor off the h...
"A delightful semi-detached family home providing well presented accommodation, situated in a much sought after location. This three bedroom property briefly comprises: entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge/diner, conservatory, 'L' shaped kitchen, utility room, ground floor W.C, three b..."
Traditional three bed semi detached family home set back from the road situated within a desirable area of Wolverhampton
CALL SKITTS TO BOOK A PROPERTY VIEWING!!! MUCH IMPROVED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE** **REFITTED KITCHEN/DINER** **REFITTED BATHROOM** **SUMMER HOUSE IDEAL FOR ENTERTAINING** **DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE** **VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED** 
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a comprehensively updated family home in the Penn area close to local amenities and popular schools. The accommodation comprises and entrance hall, thought lounge, extended contemporary kitchen/diner, three bedrooms, and ..."
"NEW LISTING in WOLVERHAMPTON - Semi Detached property enjoying an arrangement of 3 Bedrooms, a Reception Room, a Bathroom, a Kitchen and a Spacious Garden WITH Conservatory and Rear Outhouse, also has double glazing and central heating throughout with a Spacious Front Garden. EPC D"
"A well presented traditional family home. Enter the property into a porch that leads into the hall, doors lead to the kitchen with Utility and door into the garage. There is also a spacious open plan lounge dining room - stairs go to the first floor. On the first floor are two double bedrooms, o..."
"""A FANTASTIC CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, two part lounge/dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, family bathroom, garage to side, off road parking to front & large rear garden."
"Three bedroom detached family home sitauted on an expansive prime corner plot tucked away in immensely sought after cul de sac location of Compton offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as ..."
"An absolute privilege to bring to market is this most exceptional EXTENDED family home. You can truly see why the vendors enjoyed this property for over 30 years and did not want to sell until now!! If you are looking for a home that offers spacious accommodation throughout, located w..."
"FREEHOLD FAMILY HOME. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a well-presented modern family home in Fordhouses. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, guest cloakroom / WC, large lounge/ dining room, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms, and a bathroom/W.C. Externally the..."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Are you looking for a STUNNING 3 bedroom family home? Then this could be the one for you! Built in 2018 and still under the NHBC warranty
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price *£260,000 - £280,000*"
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED TOWN HOUSE"" Comprising of entrance hall, ground floor shower room, kitchen diner, lounge, bedroom 4/ office, 3 bedrooms master with en-suite, family bathroom, off road parking, front and rear gardens & outbuilding."
A Spacious Detached Family Home Ready to Move Into. Enter the property into the welcoming hall that leads into the lounge and downstairs cloakroom. From the lounge go into the newly renovated kitchen / dining room updated to high standard with breakfast bar and additional space for dining table ...
"* A 2/3 bedroom detached bungalow at the top of Wightwick Bank, within walking distance of local amenities. Includes an attractive kitchen, two reception rooms, a charming rear garden, and ample off-road parking * Side entrance porch * Inner hallway * Kitchen * Lounge * Dining room / 3rd bedroom ..."
"""A CHAIN FREE 3/4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, downstairs wc, reception room 2/ potential bedroom 4, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom, block paved driveway, rear garden."
"""A HANDSOME 3 BEDROOM BAY FRONTED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large 24ft long entertainment lounge dining area, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, bathroom, large gravelled driveway to front and a generous rear garden with rear access via shared road."
"No upward chain… Situated in a popular and established residential area, this tastefully appointed 3 bedroom traditional semi-detached property has been well maintained over the years to create a practical and appealing standard of living accommodation and is also conveniently situated to..."
"**THREE DOUBLE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION** Located in a popular position with amenities close by including primary and secondary schools and shops. Benefiting from off-road parking to the front, two reception rooms and a fitted kitchen on the ground floor, three double bedroom..."
"A particularly well situated two bedroom, corner second floor apartment in this prestigious retirement development for the over 70s."
"Occupying a choice position in a popular residential area with all local amenities including shops, schools and public transport services close by this traditional three-bedroom semi-detached property has been well maintained over the years yet provision still exists for that discerning buyer loo..."
"Occupying a generous position upon the desirable Ettingshall Park development, a traditional semi detached family home that is well maintained & offers fantastic potential. With part central heating & part double, this spacious property also benefits from entrance porch, hallway, lounge,..."
"Neatly presented traditional style 3 Bedroom Semi-Detached House situated in an established residential neighbourhood of popularity on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton, handy for nearby local shopping facilities and with public transport links to the city centre. The layout features: En..."
A well located and well presented semi-detached family home with rooms of generous proportions to both ground and first floors
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of Entrance hall, ground floor wc, lounge, fitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms family bathroom, front and rear gardens and secure allocated parking."
"If you are looking for a superbly appointed semi-detached house, located in the highly sought after area of Penn, then this property is going to tick the boxes for you that’s for sure!!! Pleasantly positioned in a consistently popular neighbourhood and well served by local ameni..."
An absolute privilege to bring to market this most exceptionally presented and greatly improved family home. It’s curb appeal alone demonstrates what you will see internally once you step inside of this property. Truly remarkable in its sheer presentation and once you see the refitted dinin...
"""A MODERN DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED ALONG A PRIVATE DRIVE"" Comprising of pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking and garage to side. Internally there is a fitted kitchen, guest wc, lounge, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"Extended semi-detached bungalow situated in an established and popular cul-de-sac off Woodhall Road. The property has a spacious living room, modernised kitchen with adjoining dining area overlooking a very pleasant part walled garden, two bedrooms, re-fitted shower room and garage with remote co..."
"Outstanding semi-detached home is a pleasant cul-de-sa location, beautifully presented with impressive open plan accommodation. Entrance hall, spacious living room leading to a modernised kitchen which in turn open through to a conservatory overlooking the rear garden. Three bedrooms, re-fitted b..."
Situated in one of the most favoured residential areas and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village this luxurious first floor apartment incorporates many characteristic features throughout. 
"A distinctive, luxury first floor leasehold apartment with charm and character converted within a detached period residence and nestled in a favoured residential neighbourhood. Within easy walking distance of the varied amenities afforded by the picturesque village of Tettenhall. Further more e..."
A semi-detached house offering well proportioned accommodation standing in an elevated position in a popular and convenient address (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)
"""AN EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM BAY FRONTED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, large extended kitchen diner, 3 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom, driveway to front, side courtyard, enclosed rear garden with brick/timber constructed storage area."
"This excellent semi-detached home offers two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, three sizeable bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom. Externally, the property boasts front and rear gardens, a garage and a driveway. This home presents a fantastic opportunity for any house hunter."
*SITTING IN A HUGE PLOT WITH MASSIVE EXTENSION OR BUILD POTENTIAL!* *A PLOT SIZE OF JUST OVER A TENTH OF AN ACRES!* Belvoir are truly delighted to be presenting to market this unique three bedroom semi-detached family home to the sales market. A property that cannot be missed!
"** Converted Garage! ** ** Open-Plan Living Room/Diner/Study! **Belvoir are delighted to present this wonderful three bedroom home that has been immaculately kept and impressively improved by its current occupiers. Located in the popular area of Pendeford, this delightful home is perfec..."
"Impressive family residence of considerable character, pleasantly positioned in very popular locality with nearby Penn Road providing convenient access into city centre. Very spacious accommodation with nice blend of retained original features and comfortable modern specification. Ideal for famil..."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED AND HIGHLY DECEPTIVE EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOME"" Comprising of 24ft entertainment lounge diner, 16ft fitted kitchen diner, utility, kitchen area 2, 28ft side veranda, 3 bedrooms and a fitted family bathroom, off road parking and a large rear garden,"
"This extended semi detached home offers ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is situated in a popular residential neighbourhood and conveniently located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The accommodation briefly comprises..."
"""A DETACHED 2 BEDROOM BUNGALOW IN FANTASTIC CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, shower room, garage to side, front driveway and enclosed rear garden."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached town style family home situated within a hugely sought after location. Idyllically situated close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public tran..."
"An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this most delightful bungalow situated on the Staffordshire Border of the City with excellent road network links to surrounding areas to include Cannock, Walsall, Stafford and Shropshire. Neatly tucked away within a pleasant cul de sac locati..."
"Extended three bedroom semi-detached family home situated in good condition throughout set within sought after location of Aldersley. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and r..."
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £250,000 plus Reservation Fee. **A CHAIN FREE DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN THE POPULAR GOLDTHORN PARK AREA WITHIN THE MOST DELIGHTFUL CUL DE SAC LOCATION** Comprising of a through living/dining room, kitchen, useful uti..."
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of driveway to side leading to garage, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, wet room, sun room/conservatory and a delightful rear garden with woodland walks to rear."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & HIGHLY DECEPTIVE SEMI DETACHED HOME"" Comprising off road parking, spacious rear garden with entertainment patio, generous lounge, wonderful open plan refitted breakfast kitchen, conservatory/utility, three bedrooms & fitted family bathroom."
"WELL PRESENTED TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS & AMENITIES, BENEFITTING FROM A REFITTED 'L' SHAPED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM AND REFITTED BATHROOM. ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN, DRIVEWAY & GARAGE AFFORDING OFF ROAD PARKING. Contact us on to a..."
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Spacious Three Bed Semi Detached Property Being Situated In The Villiers Area Of Bilston. The Property Comprises Of A Front Porch, A Spacious Entrance Hallway, A Full Length Lounge/Diner And A Refitted Modern Breakfast Kitchen. "
"This semi detached home offers ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is situated in a popular and much sought after residential road and is conveniently located for all essential amenities including shops, schools and public transport links. The property briefly comprises, ..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED & CHARMING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY ON THE POPULAR BRIDGNORTH ROAD"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining groom, kitchen, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front, side & rear gardens, garage with rear access (see Agents Note)."
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A STUNNING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME SET OVER THREE FLOORS"" Comprising entrance hall, ground floor wc, kitchen diner, lounge, three bedrooms, family bathroom, master en-suite, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"Magnolia Court is situated in a popular residential address close to a wide variety of local amenities in Penn and within convenient distance of the further, more wide ranging facilities afforded by the City Centre itself. Furthermore, there are regular bus services running along the Penn Road (A..."
"Incredible three-bedroom first floor executive duplex apartment set on a prestigious residential road in Penn. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bu..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED MODERN STYLED PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs wc, modern fitted kitchen diner, lounge, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, courtyard style frontage & enclosed rear garden with gated access to two allocated parking spaces."
**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This is a great opportunity to purchase a detached family home in a sought after residential area. The property is in a quiet cul-de-sac and has off-road parking and front garden. Inside the double glazed property you have a spacious lounge leading into a generous sized f...
"Three bedroom end terrace situated on prime corner plot within popular residential cul de sac location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and rail...."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE SPACIOUS EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, shower room, modern fitted kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, shower room, off road parking, front & rear gardens & brick built shed."
WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. The property is a three bedroom semi-detached house offering deceptively spacious accommodation however requiring certain updating and cosmetic works. Occupying a convenient location within reach of Sedgley and surrounding areas.
"An attractive, end-of-terrace Edwardian cottage providing beautifully appointed accommodation together with the additional benefit of a driveway and garage to the side"
A superior penthouse apartment providing exceptional accommodation in a highly regarded period conversion in an exceptionally prestigious and sought after address
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND FULLY MODERNISED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME The well laid out and sociable living accommodation briefly comprises porch, a welcoming entrance hall, living room, dining room, stylish fitted breakfast kitchen, three light and airy bedrooms and a co..."
Situated in an established residential area this deceptive semi-detached property has been extended and restyled over the years to provide versatile and spacious living accommodation ideal as a family house with extensive views towards the city centre. 
"A Property with Potential to Modernise and Make Your Home. This semi-detached bungalow is in a prime position at the top of a quiet cul de sac in Bradmore Wolverhampton. In need of modernisation and sold with no chain. Enter into the hall that leads to the lounge, kitchen/diner, bathroom, Bedro..."
"A stylish semi- detached family home, with well appointed accommodation in convenient reach of the amenities that Fordhouses provides."
"""AN FANASTIC THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, large kitchen diner, three bedrooms, family bathroom, detached garage to rear, off road parking to front, car port & enclosed rear garden."
"**If you are looking for that perfect home then this may be just the one for you......** This TWO bedroom property is one you can just move your furniture into and enjoy the benefits of immaculate living accommodation throughout .... This is a property that words cannot describe other than WOW, ..."
Set on a generous plot and tucked away off the popular and convenient Oxbarn Avenue this semi detached bungalow is indeed need of updating but offers the new purchaser the opportunity to re style and update to their own personal requirements. Subject to planning permissions there is also ample ro...
"*Extended Semi Detached Home *Ideal first Family Home *Close To Good Schools, Shops And Amenities
*Three Double Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Fitted Kitchen *Conservatory *Rear Garden *Drive *Viewing Is Essential"
"Set along one of Wolverhampton's most established roads this mid terrace home is placed between Newbridge and Tettenhall village with both offering a variety of independent shops, hairdressers and restaurants with the added benefit of West Park and also Tettenhall Green being close by respectivel..."
"Within walking distance of local schools & Shops, Camellia Gardens is only five minutes from the M54 motorway and therefore ideal for commuting to principal towns. A superb house and ideal for buyers requiring a quality family home ready to just move into! Deceptive externally.."
"A house to make your home, *** Upgraded and partially renovated*** New Boiler & Re-Wired Enter the property into the hall, doors lead to the new kitchen and lounge/dining room with patio doors into the garden. The kitchen leads into the utility room with new boiler. A door leads to the rear g..."
NO UPWARD CHAIN- 12 Months FREE service charge Occupying a prime position overlooking lovely communal landscaped grounds together with a mature wooded aspect within this small exclusive development of retirement homes this recently vacated property is located within the highly sought after and ...
"Extended modern home situated on a highly popular residential development. It is ideally located for Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The well planned and ideal family accommodation briefly comprises, reception hall with guest cloaks, living room, garden room, breakfast ..."
" **A WELL PRESENTED EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE** situated in a cul-de-sac location. Benefits from double glazing and gas radiator central heating. Comprises of porch, hall, lounge, extended dining room, fitted kitchen, utility room, downstairs w.c., shower room, enclosed rear gard..."
**NO UPWARD CHAIN!!** A Home Ready to Move Into. An Ideal First Home. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the lounge and downstairs cloakroom. Also on the ground floor is the spacious kitchen/diner. On the first floor is the master bedroom with en-suite and two further bedrooms and t...
"**FANTASTIC PURCHASE OPPORTUNITY** VIEWINGS HIGHLY ADVISED TO FULLY APPRECIATE WHAT THIS PROPERTY HAS TO OFFER** CORNER PLOT WITH HUGE POTENTIAL STP The property is situated a short distance from the Stafford Road, giving excellent transport links to Wolverhampton City Cent..."
"Stunning three bedroom EXTENDED semi-detached house, immaculately presented throughout with an extended side annexe accommodating a kitchen/living area, double bedroom and ground floor wet room. An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this most beautifully presented and surpr..."
"No Upward Chain An immaculate and fully renovated three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet corner position with an extensive private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local a..."
IN NEED OF REPAIR & RE-FURBISHMENT - POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP) - ADDITIONAL PLOT OF LAND WITH POTENTIAL FOR GARAGE (STPP) - 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 3 RECEPTION ROOMS - A four bedroom end terraced property located just off the sught after Tettenhall Road which is in need of repair and re-furbish...
"**THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION** Located close to local amenities including school and shops, through lounge/diner, conservatory and fitted kitchen with access to the utility room and access to the rear garden and garage off. Three upstairs bedrooms an..."
"A four bedroom, end terraced property located just off the popular Tettenhall Road. Close to the city centre with great travel links."
"Offered with no upward chain a three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with driveway parking and a good sized rear garden with outbuildings housing the Utility area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transpo..."
"Occupying a choice position on a popular and established development this detached property has been sympathetically re-styled by the present owner to incorporate modern lines of high quality appointments throughout, providing present day lifestyle requirements. This well presented modern home ..."
*Beautifully Presented Semi Detached Home *Sought After Location *Three Bedrooms *Car Port And Drive *Tastefully Decorated Lounge/Dining Room *Modern Fitted Kitchen*Conservatory *Family Bathroom *Rear Garden *Potential To Extend (subject to planning) *Viewing Is Highly Recommended
"""CONNELLS ARE PLEASED TO OFFER FOR SALE A STUNNING WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising lounge, ground floor wc, modern kitchen diner, three bedroom, family bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"Stunning Three Bedroom Semi Detached Home being offered with 6 years NHBC Warranty remaining. This property Offers excellent transport links and local Amenities, Aswell as Garage, Driveway, Three Bedrooms and an En Suite. Call now on to view..."
"***LAST ONE AVAILABLE*** New build home now available to view as it is and includes many extras such as down lighters, upgraded sink, integrated appliances, upgraded tiling to bathrooms, chrome heated towel rails These attractive small four bedroom properties consist of:"
"This semi detached home occupies a corner plot in a quiet backwater within a popular residential neighbourhood. It is conveniently situated for all essential amenties,public transport links, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge Retail park. The ideal family accommodation is in need of so..."
A superb family home in a sought after residential location which would benefit from a scheme of modernisation helping buyers to make the home their own.
"One word can only describe this property and this is simply **STUNNING** A privilege to bring to market is this three bedroom semi-detached property, having undergone almost complete renovation by its current vendors to offer a home ready to just put your furnishings in, relax a..."
EXTENDED AND WELL PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA OF WEDNESFIELD CLOSE TO POOL HAYES ACADEMY & POOL HAYES PRIMARY SCHOOL. Paul Carr Estate Agents are pleased to market this extended and well maintained property located in a quiet cul-de-sac off the popula...
FREEHOLD. EPC RATING C. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This is a semi detached family home in the popular Claregate location of Wolverhampton within walking distance to Claregate Primary School. This is an ideal home for families looking for a spacious home in a cul de sac location with ample parking.
"Spacious, gas centrally heated, uPVC or hardwood double glazed three bedroom semi detached that has been conscientiously maintained & improved over the years and now requiring a little sympathetic updating briefly comprising; Reception hall, store, lounge, dining room, upgraded kitchen, Three..."
"Looking for a house to make your home, then take a look at this extended three bedroom semi-detached property. Enter the property into the hallway that leads to the front living room, the extended lounge and the kitchen. From the kitchen is a utility and a downstairs cloakroom/wet room. On the ..."
"Situated in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities including walking distance of Spring Vale Primary School & Cazzers Park, this traditional semi-detached property has been extended over the years to provide a spacious and well-planned designed home!"
"NO CHAIN - Spacious three bedroom semi-detached home in a cul-de-sac location in the favoured area of Penn, well located for access to shops, Penn Common, bus routes into the city centre and the highly regarded St. Bartholomews Primary School. Living room, dining room, kitchen, modernised bathroo..."
"* A well-situated 3-bedroom detached house on a residential cul-de-sac, within walking distance of considerable local amenities. Perfect for renovation with three double bedrooms, a south-facing garden, garaging, and two reception rooms * Porch * Lounge * Dining room * Kitchen * Three double bed..."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE TRADITIONAL AND EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE TO REAR"" Comprising or spacious lounge with adjoining dining area, large kitchen, selection of 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom, pleasant front and rear gardens and a garage to rear."
"Three/four bedroom extended semi detached family home presented well throughout situated within popular residential housing estate. Located within 1.3 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure faci..."
"** Huge Refurbishment Potential! ** ** Incredibly Popular Location! **Belvoir are delighted to present this beautiful three bedroom semi-detached home in Wednesfield, not too far from New Cross Hospital. There is heaps of potential available at Fairview Crescent, from internal redecorat..."
"Situated in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village with the amenities therein, this deceptive and attractive terraced property has been extended and restyled to deliver a high standard of living accommodation."
"Viewings are essential for this charming ay-fronted semi detached family home in a sought after area. With a driveway to the front providing off road parking, and a meticulously maintained enclosed garden to the rear, the property itself features a spacious living/dining room, fitted kitchen, th..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, family shower room, off road parking to front & large rear garden with detached garden room with various usage options (home office/gym/hobby room)"
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE & EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED WITH A LARGE REAR GARDEN"" Comprising off road parking, garage to side, detached games room to rear, lounge, extended sitting room, extended kitchen, three bedrooms & family bathroom. Viewing is highly recommended."
"""A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, large open plan entertainment lounge, kitchen, conservatory, two bedrooms, shower room, driveway & garden to front, car port, garage to side & enclosed rear garden."
"""A FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising driveway to side, garage to rear, kitchen, large lounge, dining room, three bedrooms, family bathroom & attic space."
"An attractive bay fronted semi-detached house standing in a lovely position, overlooking West Park to the front, which would benefit from a scheme of modernisation. NO UPWARD CHAIN - SEARCHES INCLUDED"
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £230,000 - £240,000*"
"A corner plot three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location with prospects for developing the land that wraps around the property (subject to the correct planning permissions) Conveniently located close to essential amenities, including; s..."
"This TWO bedroom detached bungalow is being sold on a corner plot position with NO UPWARD CHAIN and is situated on a quiet Pendeford cul-de-sac, close to local amenities and surrounded by similarly spacious bungalows. Enjoying generous proportions throughout, the property offers spacio..."
"It is an honour to bring to the market, this simply stunning and immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached home set within the ever popular residential location of Moseley Parklands, on the outskirts of Wolverhampton. Situated to the North of the City, conveniently place..."
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATING E. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This three bedroom semi detached family home is available now. Comprising of large lounge, kitchen, conservatory, two double bedrooms, single bedroom, family bathroom and downstairs W/C."
Completed in 2012 by renowned builder 'Persimmon Homes' this contemporary family home has been maintained by the current owners to a high standard and offers contemporary living synonymous with present day lifestyle requirements. The property itself is located within easy access to the convenienc...
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED & HIGHLY DECEPTIVE CHAIN FREE MODERN SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED ON THE EVER POPULAR MOSELEY PARKLANDS ESTATE"" Comprising pleasant front & rear gardens with decked area, off road parking & garage to side, lounge, kitchen diner, three bedrooms, family bathroom."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED & MODERN SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION"" Comprising off road parking, integral garage, pleasant rear garden, spacious lounge, separate dining room, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms & fitted family bathroom."
"This is an impressive Four bedroom Mid Terrace property occupying a pleasant position in a most sought after residential location and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area, excellent schools and public transport services."
A well-appointed ground floor apartment providing spacious accommodation in a convenient location.
Occupying a choice first floor position with a most pleasant elevated aspect this spacious two -bedroom property is situated within a stylish development which in part was known as the Old Spinney club and restaurant which in 2002 was sympathetically re-developed by Wulfrun Homes creating a lovel...
"""AN ATTRACTIVE & WELL PRESENTED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM BAY FRONT SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, front & large rear garden, detached garage/workshop."
*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* An immaculately presented TWO BEDROOM retirement apartment situated on the FIRST FLOOR in our prestigious ALGAR COURT development.
"MUST BE SEEN! - TWO BEDROOMS - LARGE LOUNGE / DINER - LARGE GARDENS - PARKING - A fantastic, two bedroom bungalow located in the Parkfields area, with a wealth of amenities close by including shops, bus links and park. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, spacious kitchen, dining ro..."
*Deceptively Spacious And Beautifully Presented Period Home *Three/Four Bedroom End Of Terrace *Two Reception Rooms *Landscaped Rear Garden *Close To City Centre And Good Local Schools *Modern Fitted Kitchen *Bathroom With Roll Top Bath *Cellar *Viewing Is Highly Recommended *Chain Free
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE SITUATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA"" Comprising lounge, kitchen, ground floor wc, three good size bedrooms, master en-suite, family bathroom, integral garage, off road parking & a low maintenance rear garden."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND HIGHLY DECEPTIVE REDESIGNED AND RESTYLED SEMI-DETACHED HOME AVAILABLE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of off road parking to front, spacious rear garden, lounge, entertainment kitchen diner, family bathroom, 3 bedroom and a MASTER EN-SUITE."
"If you need an EXTENDED semi-detached property with FOUR bedrooms, set within a lovely quiet cul de sac, that you can grow into and adapt more to make a fantastic family home for many years to come, then look no further!! This is such a lovely property, located just of Broad Lan..."
"***This property is affected by historical mining activity with report available upon request*** A particularly delightful detached family residence, offering spacious accommodation that must be seen to be appreciated. This well maintained four bedroom home benefits from numerous noteworthy..."
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £225,000 plus Reservation Fee. This is a rare opportunity to purchase a ""move-in-ready"" property that has been recently renovated throughout to a superb standard and this is most clearly seen once you visit that’s..."
FREEHOLD. EPC RATED G. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This is a semi-detached family home on a large plot with fields to front and rear and having a small barn to the rear that has previously had planning for conversion. The accommodation compr...
"""A CHAIN FREE GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED THREE BEDROOM THREE STOREY FAMILY PROPERTY IN A GATED DEVELOPMENT"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs wc, large open plan entertainment kitchen diner, utility room, lounge, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & rear gardens & off road parking."
"A LARGE THREE / FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA WITH TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS & LARGE DRIVEWAY"
"A THREE BEDROOM Semi Detached Family Home with Well Proportioned Rooms including Through Lounge/Diner, Kitchen and Garage to the Ground Floor. To the First Floor there is a Family Bathroom, Two Double Bedrooms and One Single Bedroom. Externally the property offers a Sunny Aspect Rear Garden and D..."
"**CHAIN FREE** A THREE Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home with accommodation briefly comprising, Enclosed Entrance Porch, Hallway, Lounge, Dining Room and Kitchen on the Ground floor with THREE Bedrooms and a Family Bathroom on the First floor. Externally the property offers Front and Rear Gardens..."
"Stunning Three bedroom Detached house on a spacious Corner Plot. This property is one not to be missed. Comprising of Kitchen Diner, Lounge, Three Bedrooms, Bathroom and Conservatory. This property also offers excellent Transport links and local amenities. Call Now on !!!"
"A traditional three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with driveway parking and a good sized rear garden with lawn and patio seating area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local..."
"Lapper Avenue is a semi-detached family home which has off road parking, garage and a lovely long rear garden. The property benefits from central heating, double glazing and no upward chain. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE) EPC: tbc"
"""A WELL PROPORTIONED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising large open plan lounge, kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathrooms. large crete print driveway affording off road parking, garage & enclosed rear garden with rear gated access."
"""THIS CHAIN FREE SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW ON AN EVER POPULAR ESTATE WITHIN WEDNESFIELD"" Comprising of lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms, well proportioned conservatory to rear, fitted shower room front and rear gardens, off road parking, garage to rear."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED & EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, large open lounge diner, two part kitchen, ground floor study/hobby room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, large crete print driveway & delightful family garden to rear."
"""GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED WELL MAINTAINED 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large open plan lounge/ dining room, modern fitted kitchen, downstairs wc, 3 good sized bedrooms and a family shower rooms, Large crete print driveway to front and a large enclosed rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE THIS DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A POPULAR LOCATION WITHIN WEST PARK"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, loft space & rear garden."
"Two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated within sought after residential location offering no upward chain. This freehold residence presents a fine purchase opportunity suitable for a variety of different buyer types. High levels of interest are expected, and as such all interested..."
"Delightful three bedroom home with no upward chain offering ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. Benefiting from extended kitchen, dining room, two reception rooms and downstairs WC. Conveniently situated for all local amenities including shops, schools and transport li..."
"""A CHARMING TOWN HOUSE PROPERTY WITHIN A CONVERTED PERIOD BUILDING & OFFERING GATED SECURE REAR ACCESS"" Comprising - entrance hall, ground floor wc, generous lounge area with separate kitchen area, two bedrooms, fitted bathroom."
"THIS IDEAL SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME is a large traditional end terraced house with off road parking and it is ideally situated for all local amenities including New Cross Hospital, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. There are public transport links close by giving easy access ..."
"Occupying a prime private position in a small cul de sac just off the A449 Stafford Road and therefore is a most popular residential area, this detached bungalow is an excellent example of its type providing a well planned living accommodation, ideal for purchasers requiring a property to restyle to"
"Perfect family home! Boasting spacious lounge, kitchen diner, downstairs shower room along with family bathroom. Three good sized bedrooms and large rear garden with part decking. The property has been maintained to a high standard and viewing is a must!!"
"""A CHAIN FREE 2 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, shower room, conservatory, generous rear garden and a crete print driveway to front."
"Viewings are highly recommended for this very well presented and maintained character cottage in a sought after area of Tettenhall Wood. The property has been modernised throughout and features a spacious living room, breakfast kitchen, two double bedrooms and a family bathroom. To the rear i..."
"An attractive traditional semi detached property, having been improved upon over the years but requiring additional cosmetic enhancement to realise maximum potential, provides both spacious and versatile living accommodation, which is ideal as a family home."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME OCCUPYING AN PLOT WITH DRIVEWAY TO SIDE"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, master en-suite, bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"Very well presented traditional style semi-detached home in a sought after cul-de -sac location, available with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Driveway provides off road parking and accommodation includes hallway, guest w.c., spacious through lounge/dining room, re-fitted breakfast kitchen, three bedrooms and ..."
"This excellent detached bungalow offers two sizeable bedrooms, a living room, a fitted kitchen/diner and a four-piece bathroom. The home also boasts a rear garden and a driveway. This property presents a fantastic opportunity for property hunters. "
"NO CHAIN - Two bedroom bungalow occupying a generous plot towards the head of a very pleasant cul-de-sac. Offering well proportioned accommodation the property comprises entrance hall, living room with access to the rear garden, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom. There is a driveway providing ..."
Extended three bedroom semi detached in a much sought after location with spacious accommodation and a good sized rear garden
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Superbly Presented Three Bedroom Semi Detached House Situated On The Popular Oaklands Estates In Wednesfield. The Living Accommodation Comprises Of An Entrance Hallway, Spacious Through Lounge/Diner, Modern Fitted Kitchen And A Co..."
"Situated in a popular residential area within easy access of the city centre, this traditional semi-detached bungalow offers surprisingly spacious living accommodation and is an excellent opportunity for purchasers requiring a house to restyle to own requirements. "
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial two bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular village of Wednesfield in Wolverhampton. The property is within walking distance of local amenities. Offering one reception room and one bathroom, the property benefits from having gas ..."
A well presented lovely modern three Bed Mid Terrace Property ideally located on the new Ettingshall Persimmon development. with good access to Wolverhampton city centre and Bilston town centre
"Beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached with a Modern Kitchen, Modern Shower Room, Conservatory and Off street parking,"
"An immaculately presented and well positioned three double bedroom end terrace residence, ideal for a first time buyer as it is ready to just put your furnishings in and enjoy the comforts of this superb starter home!! Located in a popular area of similar quality homes and giving acces..."
"Do you fancy a great starter property in a highly desirable spot, offering excellent road network links close by to both Wolverhampton City Centre, M54/M6 Motorway and surround areas of Cannock, Stafford and Telford.... Well if that is your list of criteria then this may be just the right ho..."
"Extended three bedroom semi-detached family home presented well throughout situated in popular residential location. Located within 3.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with fu..."
"Traditional three bedroom mid terrace family home situated in residential location within 0.8 mile of Wolverhampton city centre offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport ava..."
"EPC RATING TBC VACANT PROPERTY FREEHOLD We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 3-bedroom semi detached house on Sandon Road, Wolverhampton. The property has been beautifully maintained offering a well-adapted layout, spacious and comfor..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED JUST OFF DEYNCOURT ROAD"" Comprising front & rear gardens with off road parking, lounge, sitting/dining room, conservatory, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms & family bathroom."
"CHAIN FREE!!! Located close to all amenities, schools, Newcross Hospital and Wolverhampton town centre, is this deceptively spacious Three bedroom detached character house.
The property is currently tenanted and the seller would prefer to sell to prospective Landlords or Investors however, this ..."
"This extended semi detached home is being sold with the benefit of no chain. It is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac on a  much sought after residential development and is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park.The accommodation is..."
"**THREE BEDROOM HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Traditional semi, nicely situated in popular locality with easy access to motorway network and schooling. In need of modernisation the property comprises, Porch and Hall. Two Living Rooms. Kitchen. Conservatory with door t..."
"Stunning two bedroom extended detached house fully refurbished and presented to the highest standard throughout situated in popular residential location within 0.8 mile of Wednesfield town centre. This freehold residence is located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisu..."
"NO CHAIN - Extended semi-detached home in an extremely popular location with excellent transport links to the city centre and nearby M54. Well proportioned accommodation includes hallway, living room, extended sitting room, kitchen, utility, w.c. three good size bedrooms and modernised shower roo..."
"Situated in a popular residential area & within easy distance of Tettenhall Village and the amenities therein, this mid terraced property has been adapted over the years to create a spacious and well planned interior, being an excellent example of its type. "
"Offered with no upward chain, a well presented and much improved three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with a block paved driveway and private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links..."
"FREEHOLD. WOLVERHAMPTON CITY COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC RATING C. Positioned in the popular Ashmore Park location on a desirable road with links to Kitchen Lane, with off street parking and enclosed rear garden. Accommodation comprises of entrance hall, utility room, kitchen, lounge, conservatory, t..."
This stunning 3 bedroom semi detached home offers an open plan kitchen/diner to the front of the home and separate spacious living room with French doors to the rear overlooking the garden. It also features a ground floor cloak room off the hallway. The first floor consists of three be...
"Situated in the heart of the community within easy access to neighbouring schools, shops and local amenities. This well presented three bedroom semi detached property requires viewing to truly appreciate the living accommodation on offer."
"*** ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS*** Hadleigh Estate Agents are pleased to offer this delightful two bedroom apartment finished to the highest specification. Located in the heart of Wolverhampton close to all local amenities including shops, restaurants, places of education and worship, Wo..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom End Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £205,000 - £215,000*"
This property is being sold through our Advanced sales method to provide complete transparency and security for all parties involved - see full details for more info. This is a three-bedroom traditional semi-detached family home in a popular location with potential for development (STP) With off ...
"Call us 9AM - 9PM -7 days a week, 365 days a year! See a shooting star and make a wish they say! Comet Drive offers this outstanding opportunity for the first time buyer to get started on the housing ladder, ready to move into this contemporary and stylish modern home will have feeling at ho..."
"PROPERTY SUMMARY - **ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS** ONE NOT TO BE MISSED**GREAT STARTER HOME** THREE BEDROOMS**20FT LIVING/DINING ROOM** What a little gem of a property this is! Situated in the highly sought after location of Ashmore Park, Wednesfield, close to local bus routes in..."
"Traditional Family Home at the Top of a Quiet Cul de Sac.. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the lounge with a feature wood burner, a window looks out over the front view of the property. To the back of the property is the dining area and kitchen. On the first floor are two double b..."
"*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* Highly desirable two bedroom, two bathroom, retirement apartment in our prestigious Algar Court development. Part of our retirement living range of properties."
"Three bedroom detached family home situated on a prime corner plot at the head of a cul de sac within popular residential housing estate offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public tra..."
"**THREE/FOUR BEDROOM EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION - CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS AND AMENITIES** Rear allocated off road parking, three reception rooms, downstairs wet room and upstairs family bathroom, fitted kitchen and double glazing. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED, CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR A..."
Immaculate Two Bedroom Semi Detached home in an extremely popular residential estate. Offering great local ammenities and nearby links to Wolverhampton City Centre and Bilston Town Centre all within two mile radius of this beautiful estate. Viewing needed to be truly appreciated.
"Situated within a affluent quiet cul-de-sac road in Finchfield, Bramblewood Drive offers a fantastic opportunity for buyers to take advantage of this great opportunity to acquire this detached family home"
"*FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION***THREE-BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH DOUBLE GARAGE TO THE REAR AND OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN**This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer..."
"Three bedroom semi-detached family home set across three stories decorated to a good standard throughout within popular modern residential housing estate. Located within 2.3 miles of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, c..."
"**THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Having large off road parking to the fore and detached garage, an entrance hall with doors leading to two reception rooms and a kitchen. On the first floor are two double bedrooms, a single bedroom and a fa..."
"Attractive three bedroom end-terraced home occupying a generous plot in a popular location. The versatile accommodation comprises entrance hall, separate living and sitting rooms, kitchen, ground floor w.c, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom and an enclosed garden to the rear."
** Spacious Semi! ** ** Rear Extension! **Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful Semi Detached home to the market. This home is in need of a small amount of cosmetic renovation and would be a perfect family home upon works being complete.
"ATTRACTIVELY PRICED - FREEHOLD, COUNCIL TAX BAND B - Original Victorian Features - Ideal Family Home - Cellar With Electricity - En-Suite To Master - Fitted Wardrobes - Popular Location - Close To Local Amenities & Schools - Excellent Transport & Road Links - Front & Rear Gardens - Double Glazing..."
No upward chain is offered for this spacious detached home in a sought after residential area. The house is one of only six detached properties in the quiet cul-de-sac. Approached via a private driveway leading to secure off road parking and detached garage. To the rear is a manageable priva...
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location in Oxley. Conveniently located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from ..."
"NO CHAIN - Three bedroom detached property in a popular cul-de-sac location, requiring a scheme of internal modernisation. Driveway providing off road parking, open plan living room, dining kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, bathroom, double length garage and garden to rear. Well located ..."
"***OUR OPENING TIMES ARE 9AM-9PM, 7 DAYS A WEEK!*** Located in Bushbury, Wolverhampton, this immaculately presented home was brand new in 2020 and is a fantastic sized two bedroom home ideal for a first time buyer. In brief the layout comprises of, to the ground floor: a hall, a lounge/din..."
"Situated in this popular residential area between Merry Hill and Bradmore, to the West of the City and so convenient for many local amenities. This traditional semi-detached home has benefited from some modernisation over recent years, including double glazing, central heating, re-wiring etc. ..."
** Nearby Local Amenities and Transport Links! ** ** Pendeford Village! ** Are you looking for a spacious family home with amazing travel links and easy access to schools? Then look no further! This wonderful home located in Pendeford Village is offered in great conditi...
"Dixons are proud to present you with this fully refurbished, chain free, modern three bedroom end terrace family home. Set in a hugely popular area of Ashmore Park within walking distance of local amenities and transport links. This superb property is surrounded by greenery and boasts a main..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED & WELL PROPORTIONED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, kitchen, generously proportioned lounge, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & rear gardens."
"Two bedroom semi-detached house immaculately presented throughout situated in popular modern residential housing estate. Located within one mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, wit..."
Affitto Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this newley re-decorated THREE BEDROOM family home which is in the Bushbury area of Wolverhampton and is close to local amenities and with excellent transport links.
Two Bedroom first floor apartment of particularly spacious proportions forming part of this extremely impressive modern building in prestigious setting in Compton and easily accessible to the city centre. Approached through a entrance lobby the apartment includes: Entrance with stairs leading to ...
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 26 The Avenue - We are in receipt of an offer of £230,000 subject to contract for this property. Anyone wishing to place a higher offer must do so before legal exchange of contracts. This property has to stay on the market until exchange of contracts with a public notice once ..."
**TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Well presented 2 Bedroom semi-detached bungalow in a quiet cul-de-sac residential location within walking distance of local amenities and Bantock Park. Providing spacious accommodation with good-size lounge and fitted kitchen off with integ...
"A stylish first floor apartment providing contemporary, two bedroom accommodation in a sought after location"
 Occupying a slightly elevated position in a popular and established residential area this traditional three bed detached property is in need of an extensive course of modernization throughout and provision exists to further extend the footprint of the property subject to planning permission whic...
"Attractive traditional property, conveniently located within easy reach of local schools, shops & other amenities & available with NO UPWARD CHAIN. This stylish family home is centrally heated & mostly double glazed as well as boasting; entrance hallway, lounge, attractive living roo..."
"No upward chain is offered for this spacious and very well maintained semi detached property in a sought after residential area of Bilston. With off-road parking by way of a private driveway to the front and a generous enclosed garden to the rear, the property itself is in excellent condition an..."
"Occupying a superb corner position with gated access fronting Bushbury Lane leading to a large driveway and detached garage. Avaialble with NO ONWARD CHAIN the extended accommodation hallway, large lounge/dining room, modernised kitchen and shower room, utility, veranda and three generous bedroom..."
"* A well-presented 3-bedroom mid-terrace house within walking distance of Tettenhall’s charming High Street, having a spacious lounge, breakfast kitchen, and an attractive low-maintenance garden * Ideal for a first time buyer or investor * Porch * Lounge * Breakfast kitchen * Bathroom * Two..."
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITH STUNNING LARGE FAMILY GARDEN TO REAR"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, extended dining room, kitchen, conservatory, three good size bedrooms, bathroom, garage, brick built workshop, off road parking to front & large rear family garden."
"""A THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising porch, entrance hall, two reception rooms, kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, side shared gated access & rear garden."
"Public Notice: 3 Waterside Close, Wolverhampton, WV2 1HN. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £210,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers to the Selling Agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating: D FREEHOL..."
"Occupying arguably one of the most favoured positions on this small popular development of retirement homes known as The Beeches, Hanover Court is ideally situated within easy walking distance of Tettenhall Village & the amenities therein!"
"**THREE-BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** A spacious family home positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac location on Elston Hall Lane, well-presented throughout the property comprises, off-road parking, garden to the front and rear, through lounge/diner, fitted kitchen and a m..."
"***STUNNING BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM PARK HOME CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES*** Off road parking, two double bedrooms, ensuite to master, open plan kitchen/diner, lounge. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!"
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* An excellent First floor apartment of generous proportions and a good standard of spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal for professional or retiring persons."
"This beautifully presented two bedroom home is located in the popular Ashmore Park development. Briefly comprising of kitchen/breakfast room, lounge/diner, utility room, two bedrooms and modern shower room. EPC - Awaited"
""" A DECEPTIVLY SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY"" This property benifits from pleasant front and rear gardens. open plan entertainement lounge, kitchen, downstairs wc, ample storage throughout, 3 good sized bedrooms, large family bathroom."
" Soul Estates are proud to present this well presented 3 bedroom terraced house For Sale. This perfect family home is situated in a very popular area of Wolverhampton, with good schools and amenities situated close by. The house is close to Wolverhampton College, Wolverhampton Girls' High School..."
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION***FOUR BEDROOM HOME**IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, I am Sold Limited.This method of auction requires..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED ON A LARGE PLOT"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, large entertainment kitchen, downstairs wc, side storage area, three good size bedrooms, family shower room, driveway to front & large enclosed rear garden."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 3 bed family home situated on the outskirts of Wolverhampton city centre, close to an excellent range of local amenities, excellent public transport links, local nearby park and excellent schools/college within catchment"
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a one bedroom first floor apartment offered at 100% SHARE at £190,000 or can be offered at 50% SHARED OWNERSHIP BASIS FOR £95,000. Please enquire for further details. The apartment forms part of the McCarthy Stone Retirement Living Plus Developments "
Fantastic Semi Detached Property...Three Bedrooms...Stylish Throughout...Off Road Parking...Low Maintenance Rear Garden...Three Large Garage/Outhouses To The Rear...Downstairs Bathroom...En-Suite Shower Room...Fully Double Glazed...Great Location...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!!!
Modern End Terrace...Three Bedrooms...Three Floors...Downstairs W.C...Open Plan Kitchen/Lounge...Low Maintenance Rear Garden...Purpose Built Shed/Outhouse...Off Road Parking...EPC Grade = B...Three Years Old...Fully Double Glazed And Gas Centrally Heated...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!!
Modern two bed semi detached residence located within a prestigious estate in Wolverhampton. The property is situated on a choice position on the estate and simply must be viewed to appreciate the potential on offer
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer to market this traditional style family home, situated within the Low Hill area of Wolverhampton. To the ground floor, the accommodation consists of an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/dining room/conservatory and family bathroom. To the first floor, there are thre..."
"PRICED FOR IMMEDIATE SALE - SOLD WITH VACANT POSSESSION, Freehold, Council Tax Band - C , EPC Rating - G (Potential B) , Three Bedroom link detached house, Two reception rooms, Fitted kitchen, Downstairs W/C, Large Rear Garden, Garage for a single car and Driveway parking, Family bathroom and sto..."
Semi Detached Property...Three Bedrooms...Lean To With Downstairs W.C...Modern Throughout...Open Plan Kitchen Diner...Off Road Parking Via A Driveway...Low Maintenance Rear Garden And Patio...Great Location...Chain Free...EPC Grade - D...Very Spacious...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!!!
"A Property Ready to Move Into. Set at the top of a quiet cul de sac overlooking open green areas is this two bedroom semi-detached home. Enter into the hall that leads to the lounge, stairs go to the first floor. Also on the ground floor is the open plan kitchen/dining area with door to storage ..."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom terraced family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location of Bilston. Conveniently located close to the hugely popular Manor Academy and other essential amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, colleges, universities, and lei..."
"Haart Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 3 bed family home situated, close to an excellent range of local amenities, excellent public transport links to Wolverhampton, Birmingham, Dudley, and near the hugely popular Manor Academy as well as colleges"
"Innovate Estate Agents are delighted to offer this THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE situated in Bilston! The property boasts of FRONT DRIVEWAY allowing OFF ROAD PARKING, front entrance porch, entrance hallway, LOUNGE/DINER, FITTED KITCHEN, utility rom, family bathroom, rear garden, GARAGE, doubl..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITH GARAGE TO SIDE"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom, car port, garage to side, front & rear gardens with off road parking."
"What a popular property this will be for all your eyes to see.... presenting to you is this ""one of a kind, hidden gem of a property"" a superb double fronted Victorian villa style detached residence in a delightful cul-de-sac, just South of the City and well served by a vibrant range of..."
"Find your ""way"" to this excellent end town house property that would indeed be the perfect first time purchase or potential down size for someone looking for a more manageable property. Situated within a pleasant cul de sac location, bordering the bustling City of Wolverhamp..."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge diner, kitchen, utility, conservatory, 3 bedrooms, family bathroom, loft area, off road parking with front and rear gardens."
"""A WONDERFUL OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, generous lounge diner, fitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Off road parking with front and rear gardens."
"A well maintained bungalow with a conservatory situated in a delightful and popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This pleasant two bedroom home offers versatile accommodation and benefits from central heating, double glazing, off road parking and a low maintenance rear garden...."
** Huge Potential for Renovation! ** ** Perfect for Family or Investor! **This wonderful three bedroom property is offered with no upward chain and would make a wonderful project for any family or investor!
An attractive three-bedroom end terraced property in a sought after location close to the centre of Tettenhall.
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising lounge, dining room/sitting room, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three bedrooms, upstairs wc, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"A deceptively spacious property being conveniently situated on a popular residential development. It is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. This property offers first time buyers a golden opportunity to take their first step onto..."
"*ATTENTION CASH BUYERS* **FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Off-road parking, garage, four bedrooms, bathroom, fitted kitchen and enclosed rear garden. Ideal investment opportunity located close to local amenities, schools and shops. CALL TO BOOK YOUR..."
"Pugh Road is an end of terraced property with off road parking and a large rear garden. The property would benefit from some updating but it benefits from central heating, double glazing and no upward chain. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)"
Ideal first time investment or first time purchase!
*Well Presented Semi Detached Home *Ideal First Time Buy *Two Double Bedrooms *Lounge/Dining Room *Drive And Front Garden *Double Glazed And Central Heated *Generous Rear Garden *First Floor Shower Room/WC *Popular Location *No Upward Chain
*DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THROUGHOUT!* *THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS* Belvoir are delighted to be presenting to market this wonderfully presented and very sizeable three bedroom terrace home situated in a cul de sac just off Kitchen Lane!
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £185,000 plus Reservation Fee. A privilege to bring to market is this three bedroom semi-detached house located in the highly regarded location of Tettenhall Wood and here is a little insight in to all it has to offer..... ..."
Well-presented traditional-style three-bedroom home offering spacious accommodation with double garage in the rear garden. The property has great access links to Wednesfield and Wolverhampton City Centre with bus and train links close-by. The property comprises; Two Reception Rooms. Fitted Kitche...
This wonderfully presented three bedroom semi detached property on Ashmore park is offered with no upward chain. Viewing highly recommended. EPC Rating - D
"A well presented three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with driveway and private rear garden with seating area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accommodation..."
"A well maintained three bedroom semi-detached family home situated in an extremely popular residential area offered for sale with no upward chain. Thought to be an ideal first time purchase, this spacious residence benefits from double glazing, majority central heating, off road parking, detac..."
"*Well Presented End Terraced Home *Ideal For A First Time Buyer *Close To Local Shops, Schools And Amenities *Drive To Front *Generous Rear Garden *Two Double Bedrooms *Fitted Kitchen/Diner *Lounge *Modern First Floor Bathroom/WC
*Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
"Three bedroom mid terrace family home presented well throughout situated in popular residential location of Wednesfield town centre offering no upward chain. Located 2.7 miles outside of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schoo..."
"Three bedroom semi detached family home on a generous plot in popular area. Deceptively spacious from its initial appearance, this family dwelling boasts plenty of living space and presents a terrific family home opportunity to a variety of buyers. In brief, the house comprises; entrance hallway..."
"Three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on a generous plot within cul de sac of popular residential housing estate offering no upward chain. Located within 1.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, college..."
"Positioned in a popular location is this deceptively spacious three double bedroom, three reception room mid terraced family home. Beautifully presented the property briefly comprises of; reception hall, stairs to first floor and access to; front living room with bay window to front aspect. Rear..."
"A delightful two bedroom bungalow situated in a popular residential area offered for sale with no upward chain. This well maintained semi-detached home benefits from central heating, double glazing, a modern shower room, fitted kitchen, off road parking and a pleasant rear garden. A range of ame..."
"An extended semi-detached family home with no upward chain offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This three bedroom property is situated in an extremely popular residential and benefits from numerous noteworthy features including; double glazing, central heating, two reception ..."
"Two bedroom modern semi-detached home situated within a cul de sac of new residential housing estate. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and rail. This freehold residenc..."
A fabulous three bed semi on the outskirts of Wolverhampton situated with a quiet Cul-de-Sac
"CHAIN FREE!!! Located in a most sought after area, is this deceptively spacious two bedroom, semi-detached Bungalow. The property appears to be in good condition and well maintained throughout. The Bungalow briefly comprises of: Lounge with bay window to front aspect, two bedrooms, with the la..."
"If you're in the market for a well presented three bedroom home in a cul de sac location with no upward chain and vacant possession, look no further than Russell Close!"
"This semi detached home will appeal to first time buyers and investors. It is situated in a popular and sought after residential area and is ideally located for all essential amenities, transport links, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The property briefly comprises, sto..."
"A well presented three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a generous position with front and rear gardens and gated side access to the rear and driveway parking. The rear garden has lawn area and patio seating area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area ..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. This is an ideal first time buy or investment property for buyers looking for a property that does not need significant work. The accommodation comprises a lounge, modern kitchen/dining room, two bedrooms, bathroom /WC, a rear ga..."
Imagine that early morning coffee from the conservatory overlooking a garden that offers a peaceful lifestyle and a garden to adore. If EWE can then register today on . We are 24/7
"""A 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large through lounge, kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is an extremely large driveway to side and front and an enclosed rear garden."
"A Traditional family home ready for you to make your Home. Enter the property into the porch that leads to the hall, doors lead into the spacious lounge/diner and the kitchen. From the kitchen there is a utility area and downstairs w.c. On the first floor there are two double bedrooms, one singl..."
***CASH BUYERS ONLY DUE TO MINESHAFT WITHIN 20 METRES OF THE PROPERTY*** Situated in a cul-de-sac location on Wayford Glade Willenhall this semi-detached property is offered with no upward chain and offers a great cash buy. The property is located in reach to the local road...
"""A PART REFURBISHED TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION (see Agents Note)"" Comprising front & spacious rear garden with detached garage & storage, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms & family bathroom."
"""A MODERN END-TERRACED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT"" Externally this property has pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking. Internally there is a ground floor guest wc, lounge with adjoining fitted kitchen, 2 double bedrooms and a fitted family bathroom."
"""A CHAIN FREE SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH A 32FT DETACHED GARAGE & OUTBUILDING TO REAR (CONVERSION POTENTIAL) Externally there is secure gated car parking & large rear garden. Internally there are two reception rooms, kitchen, 2 bedrooms & a bathroom. (updating is required)."
"A lovely terraced home being sold with the benefit of no upward chain. It will certainly appeal to the discerning first time buyer and also offers any price conscious investor a great opportunity to purchase a ready made buy to let property. It is ideally located for Wednesfield town centre, B..."
A luxury one bedroom top floor apartment designed for the over 60's and built to a high specification in the heart of Tettenhall Village.
"NO CHAIN! Large semi-detached home featuring three reception rooms, three double bedrooms, dining kitchen and ground floor w.c. Ideally located for access into the City Centre and University as well as a range of local shops and renowned schools."
"A modern end terrace property located on a newly built estate off the popular Gatis Street is located conveniently to the City Centre and the road networks found thereafter. Thought ideal for a first time buyer the property enjoys an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, bathroom, gas centr..."
"Situated in a popular residential area in Penn and most convenient for the majority of amenities, 15 The Gallery occupies a ground floor position on this small exclusive development of luxury apartments which has been constructed to a superior specification, offering the upmost in luxury accommodati"
"""A STYLISHLY PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large open plan kitchen diner, utility, downstairs wc, 3 generous bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"Innovate Estate Agents are delighted to present this THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY situated in Bilston! The property boasts of FRONT DRIVEWAY allowing OFF ROAD PARKING, entrance hallway, LOUNGE, FITTED KITCHEN, lean to, family bathroom, rear garden, double glazing and gas central heating t..."
"This ideal first home is situated on a popular residential development and is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The deceptively spacious accommodation briefly comprises, storm porch, reception hall, living room, conservatory, t..."
"""A CHAIN FREE 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH DETACHED GARAGE TO SIDE"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, conservatory, 4 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Detached garage to side, off road parking, front and rear gardens."
"""VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED - A FANTASTIC TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A DECEPTIVE SPACIOUS PLOT"" Comprising entrance hall, dining area, kitchen, spacious lounge, two bedrooms, shower room, off road parking, front & large corner plot rear garden."
"Cash offers only for this extended semi detached home. Internal inspection is highly recommended in order to fully appreciate the ideal family accommodation. It is conveniently situated for all local amenities including shops, schools and public transport links. The property briefly comprises,..."
"A well presented end terrace property is set on an established road and located conveniently to the City centre and the vibrant Tettenhall Green is thought ideal for a first time purchase. Set over 3 floors the accommodation briefly includes 2 reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom, 2 double bedroom..."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Chanterelle Court is a most attractive and imposing development of just fourteen individual executive apartments constructed by Bellway Homes in 2005 to a high specification.
"A superb and luxuriously appointed third floor apartment set in this striking conversion of a 19th Century Flour Mill. The apartment has retained many original features and consists of an open plan living/dining room and kitchen, family bathroom and double bedroom. Externally there is secure gate..."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED & HIGHLY DECEPTIVE CHAIN FREE HOME SITUATED ON THE POPULAR ASHMORE PARK"" Comprising pleasant front & rear gardens, lounge, fitted kitchen, two ground floor offices/utility areas, dining area/breakfast room, two spacious bedrooms, large loft area & fitted family bathroom."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Well Presented Semi Detached Ho...
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £170,000 plus Reservation Fee. An absolute privilege to bring to market is this great three bedroom semi-detached family home situated within the popular residential area of Fordhouses. Offering well-proportioned..."
"Offered with no upward chain A spacious three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with paved driveway parking and private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local ameni..."
NO CHAIN! Three bed family home that requires a complete refurb throughout! The residence is situated on a popular road in the area and has been priced to sell! Don't miss this opportunity!. The property boasts great transport links & is close to good schooling.
"Three bedroom semi-detached family home presented to a good standard throughout situated in residential location within 2 miles of Wolverhampton city centre. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as the i54 & Mc..."
Traditional Mid Terrace Property...Three Excellent Bedrooms...Downstairs Family Bathroom...Upstairs En-Suite W.C...Brand New Boiler...Picturesque Yet Low Maintenance Rear Garden...EPC Grade = E...Twenty Yards From The Tettenhall Road...Two Reception Rooms...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this detached bungalow set on a corner plot comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, w/c, two bedrooms and a family bathroom.
The property benefits further from having gas central heating and double glazing.
Externally you have off road parking and ..."
***LAND FOR SALE WITH PLANNING PERMISSION*** A fantastic development opportunity to purchase land previously used as garages on the popular Ashmore Park estate with planning permission for the erection of a pair of semi detached houses. For further details please contact Redstones or check with ...
"Located in a popular area is this spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home. Ideally priced for the First Time Buyer, it offers a great opportunity to get on the property ladder. The property has plenty of space to the side and the garden is big and long and offers the ability to extend..."
Affitto Estate Agents are proud to offer to the market this SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME in Wolverhampton. This property is close to all local amenities and transport links. Contact us NOW to arrange a viewing!
**EXTENSIVELY MODERNSIED AND RENOVATED THROUGHOUT** THREE WELL PROPORTIONED BEDROOMS** MODERN REFITTED KITCHEN AND GROUND FLOOR REFITTED BATHROOM**EXCELLENT FAMILY/FIRST TIME PURCHASE**WALKING DISTANCE TO BILSTON TOWN CENTRE** An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this rece...
*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* **EXPECT TO BE IMPRESSED** by this extremely desirable and LARGER THAN AVERAGE sized apartment for the development. Located on the TOP FLOOR having LIFT ACCESS TO ALL FLOORS with JULIETTE BALCONY and...
A beautifully presented first floor apartment with views over Bantock Park
This property is being sold through our Advanced sales method to provide complete transparency and security for all parties involved. A vacant freehold three bedroom property.
"Situated in a traditional and established residential area overlooking playing fields to the rear, this deceptive, three-bedroom end terrace property is ideal for those discerning buyers looking to acquire a property that they can re-style to their own requirements and is also conveniently situat..."
"A beautifully presented spacious traditional family home. Enter the property into the front lounge with feature fireplace, that leads to the dining/reception room two with kitchen and bathroom downstairs. On the first floor are two good sized bedrooms with stairs up to the loft area which can be..."
"""AN FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, conservatory, two bedrooms, shower room, loft area, off road parking, front and rear gardens."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House with Entran...
"""A QUAINT AND CHARACTERFUL 2 BEDROOM END TERRACED PROPERTY"" Comprising of lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, family bathroom. Externally there is a gravelled driveway with shared side access, shared rear garden."
"Offered with no upward chain a two bedroomed terraced property, occupying a quiet position with private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a popular location with convenient access to transport links, such as the m54, schools and local amenities. Accommodation comprises;
To the ..."
"A purpose built modern development of apartments from Mcarthy & Stone, for those from 60 years of age, and with all the usual amenities as standard for Mcarthy & Stone and a wealth of surrounding amenities, shops and services within the local and sought after are of Penn, just south of..."
"Ideal for First Time Buyers!!! Three Bedroom Terrace Property in need of updating. The property comprises of Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, Three Bedrooms and Family Bathroom and is close to excellent transport links and local amenities. Viewings recommended."
"""FANTASTIC 2 BEDROOM MODERN MID-TERRACED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, modern fitted kitchen, large open plan lounge, downstairs wc, 2 good sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. Off road parking to front with an enclosed rear garden."
"Situated in an established residential area located just off Gloucester Street and convenient for easy access to the city centre, this deceptive terraced house has been thoughtfully extended over the years to create a well-appointed family house."
"Haart Estate Agents are proud to present this deceptively large two bed modern family residence situated within a popular and desirable residential area. Considerable front and rear garden spaces, this home is ideal for the first time buyer or investor alike"
"Two bedroom semi-detached house well-presented throughout situated within cul de sac location of popular residential housing estate. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and r..."
" **TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW IN NEED OF MODERNISATION** has gas radiator central heating and briefly comprises of reception hall, lounge, kitchen, shower room, front and rear gardens, tandem garage and driveway "
"*A CHARMING END TERRACE TWO BEDROOM PROPERTY BENEFITTING FROM A LARGE CORNER PLOT* This cosy family home is conveniently located in a popular and established residential area providing a wide range of amenities including shops, schools, and public transport services all within walking di..."
"A spacious three bedroomed end of Terraced property, occupying a quiet position with private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accommodation comprises;
To the ground floor; E..."
"A Deceptively Spacious Three Bedroom End Terraced Property With Accommodation Comprising Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, WC and separate Shower Room downstairs And Three Bedrooms And A Bathroom Accessible Via Bedroom Three Upstairs. Externally There is An Enclosed Rear Patio, Large ..."
"""A CHAIN FREE PLEASANTLY PRESENTED GROUND FLOOR LUXURY FLAT WITH SECURITY ENTRANCE SYSTEM"" Comprising 19ft entertainment lounge diner, kitchen, two spacious bedrooms, master en-suite, bathroom & parking to rear."
"NO UPWARD CHAIN - This well presented two bedroom property is conveniently located within walking distance to Wednesfield town centre. There is a well planned kitchen, lounge, two good sized bedrooms and a modern shower room with lovely rear garden. The property also benefits from a downstairs c..."
"Dixons Willenhall are proud to offer this well presented two bedroom mid terraced home located in WV13 In brief the property compromises of a lounge, fitted kitchen diner, DS WC, family bathroom, two bedrooms and a well maintained rear garden. Upon arrival you will also fi..."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY. Exciting news! A 3 bedroom semi-detached home on Durberville Road in Wolverhampton is now available. With a spacious garden, private driveway, and potential for personal touches, this home is perfect for families or investors looking to make it their own. Don'..."
" Soul Estates are proud to present this 3 bedroom terraced house For Sale. This family home is situated in a very popular area of Wolverhampton just off Dudley Road, with good schools and amenities. This property is within walking distance from the well known Phoenix park. The property offe..."
"""A CHAIN FREE SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED IN CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION WITH THE SOUGHT AFTER ASHMORE PARK"" Comprising entrance hall, ground floor guest wc, large kitchen diner, spacious lounge, THREE BEDROOMS, family bathroom,front & rear gardens."
Affitto proudly brings to the market this family home situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in Wolverhampton.
"An extended semi-detached family home with no upward chain offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This three bedroom residence is situated in an extremely popular residential area and although the property requires some updating works, there is enormous potential on offer. Inter..."
***PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS*** Strike is pleased to present this three bedroom mid terraced home in the very popular location of Bilston.
"A well located, spacious, ground floor flat standing within a sought after area with the additional benefit of a period Coach House with conversion potential (STPP). CASH BUYERS ONLY"
"*** ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS*** Hadleigh Estate Agents are pleased to offer this delightful one bedroom apartment finished to the highest specification. Located in the heart of Wolverhampton close to all local amenities including shops, restaurants, places of education and worship, Wo..."
"""POTENTIAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY"" THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, ground floor shower room, 3 bedrooms, large concrete off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"NO CHAIN - Spacious terrace home in a sought after location, available with no onward chain. Living room, sitting room, modernised kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three generous bedrooms and large garden to the rear. Whilst the property would benefit from some general cosmetic improvements, it ..."
"We are proud to offer this One Bedroom Retirement Flat for Over 60's – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £150,000 - £170,000*"
"A spacious two bedroom first floor apartment that is well presented throughout and situated within a popular location close to New Cross Hospital, Bentley Bridge retail park and Wolverhampton City Centre. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £150,000 Buy it now option available
Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. This is a traditional terraced home, just off the Dudley Road, and moments away from a host of shops and businesses, and close to local schools. The accommodation comprises two reception rooms, opened up into one room, a kitchen, ba..."
"A STUNNING 2-BEDROOM APARTMENT LOCATED IN THE SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION OF WOLVERHAMPTON WITH GREAT VIEWS. The apartment benefits from being very bright and airy with DUAL ASPECT WINDOWS and within close proximity to Wolverhampton's town centre's amenities, transport links, schools, and more. Wolver..."
"""A CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM MAISONETTE STYLE HOUSE BENEFITING FROM A LONG LEASE"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, four bedrooms, family bathroom, separate wc, generously proportioned rear garden & side courtyard style area."
*LET ON A LONG TERM 7 YEAR CONTRACT FROM APRIL 2022 AT £768.00PCM WITH A 'HANDS OFF' MAINTENANCE AGREEMENT* Belvoir are delighted to present to market this well presented four bedroom terrace HMO investment property in a popular residential area. Sitting close to Wolverhampton City...
"**A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A THREE BEDROOM END-TERRACE HOME WITHIN A STONES THROW FROM WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE** Comprising of 2 reception rooms,kitchen, ground floor bathroom, 3 bedrooms, rear garden."
"*EXTENDED 999 YEAR LEASE* A particularly well presented modern ground floor apartment having been substantially improved upon the years, provides an excellent standard of surprisingly spacious and comfortable living accommodation, which is ideal for the first time buyer or for professional persons."
New to the market is this amazing two-bedroom apartment situated in the sought-after area of Wolverhampton This property is like no other with the characterful features and sense of community as you drive up to the property.
"Guide Price = £138,000 - £148,000 Freehold Vacant Extended and Refurbished Semi Detached House Property for auction on 29th March at 13:00 at Avery Fields, 79 Sandon Rd, Birmingham B17 8DT - Public Auction including Live Stream & Telephone Bidding."
"An excellent two-bedroom ground floor apartment being part of a ‘retirement’ development, specifically for those aged over 60 years of age, and situated in one of the premier residential areas of Tettenhall, to the Western fringe of Wolverhampton and its extensive range of shopping..."
"A recently refurbished two bedroom semi detached bungalow offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, benefitting from double glazing, majority central heating, off road parking and a good size rear garden.Situated in a popular residential area close to a range of amenities, this ple..."
"Deceptively spacious three bed family home located within a quiet cul-de-sac street in Wolverhampton. The property has been maintained to a high standard, has excellent transport links and lies within a good catchment area for local schools. Viewing Highly Advised!"
"""A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY BENEFITING FROM NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of entrance hall, good sized lounge, kitchen, downstairs wc, 3 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom."
"**NO CHAIN & RECENTLY MODERNISED **TWO BEDROOMS**REFITTED FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM** EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE** Conveniently placed to Wolverhampton City Centre, this two bedroom end terrace house offers a great investment opportunity or for a home hunter alike! Si..."
* AVAILALBE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION - END DATE FOR THE AUCTION 11/11/22 AT 12:30 * LARGE DRIVEWAY PARKING * GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * EPC RATING D * FREEHOLD *
"*999 YEAR LEASE* Bewick Court is a most attractive and imposing development of twenty three individual executive apartments constructed by Redrow Homes in 2002 to a high specification. Number five Bewick Court resides in an enviable top floor position within the development, offering an excel..."
"National Residential are proud to present this spacious, 3-bedroom end terrace property located in the highly sought-after Telford Gardens cul-de-sac within the popular area of Merry Hill, Wolverhampton."
"* NO UPWARD CHAIN*
Attention buyers, a fantastic opportunity to acquire this well proportioned three bed house within walking distance to the City Centre"
"Ideal for First Time Buyers and Investment Buyers, This Three Bedroom Mid Terraced Home comes with; Two Reception Rooms, Three bedrooms, Upstairs Bathroom and Off Street Parking. This property has Excellent Transport links and local amenities. Call now on to View!!!"
New to the market is this amazing three-bedroom property situated in the heart of Wolverhampton. This property is like no other with the characterful features and sense of community as you drive up to the property. 
"""A CHAIN FREE PURPOSE BUILT GROUND FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen 2 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is garden to front, Juliet balcony leading to rear overlooking the car park with an allocated parking space."
"This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold Limited This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days of the draft contract for sale bei..."
"""A CHAIN FREE ONE BEDROOM MEWS STYLE HOUSE SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising large open plan lounge, kitchen, inner entrance hall, downstairs bathroom, large upper level bedroom. Externally there is an allocated parking space and a delightful enclosed rear garden"
"NO CHAIN - Cash buyers are sought for this spacious semi-detached family home which is of Non Standard Construction. Requiring general updating the property offers tremendous living and letting potential being within easy reach of local shops, public transport and Highfields School. Driveway for ..."
A well maintained end terraced property offered for sale by way of The Modern Method of Auction and with no upward chain. This pleasant three bedroom family home is situated in a popular residential area local to a range of amenities and providing easy access onto Birmingham New Road/A4123 ideal ...
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, bathroom, three bedrooms, courtyard style garden to front & enclosed rear garden with shared side access."
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £135,000 plus Reservation Fee. This traditional, three bed semi detached property is sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Bushbury is a suburb of Wolverhampton, just two miles from the city centre with good bus routes. Schools in the catc..."
"MODERN TOP FLOOR PENTHOUSE APARTMENT SET BEHIND SECURE GATED ENTRY WITH A FEATURE CORNER SEATING BALCONY TO RELAX ON AND ENJOY WATCHING THE WORLD GO BY! CONVENIENTLY PLACED TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND ROAD NETWORK LINKS, THIS IS AN APARTMENT NOT TO BE MISSED.. What an e..."
" **ONE BEDROOM GALLERIED BUNGALOW** situated on the popular Hadley Heath Estate close to local schools and amenities. Lounge with stairs leading to bedroom, fitted kitchen and ground floor bathroom. Off road parking and front and side garden. Ideal for first time buyers. CALL OUR WILLENHALL OFF..."
"NO CHAIN - Very well presented second floor apartment in an established retirement development conveniently located for Tettenhall village and Upper Green. Set within beautifully maintained grounds the property has resident and visitor parking, lift access and generous accommodation comprising ha..."
"******* FOR BUY TO LET LANDLORDS ONLY ******* Three-bedroom mid terrace family home in a hugely popular residential location. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public t..."
"** Fantastic Investment Opportunity! ** ** Perfect BTL! **Investors at the ready, because Belvoir is offering another fantastic opportunity. Don't let that money eat a hole in your pocket, instead invest in this wonderful two bedroom semi-detached home. This fabulous propert..."
"""AN IMPRESSIVE WELL PROPORTIONED ONE BEDROOM UPPER FLOOR APARTMENT OFFERING SPACIOUS LIVING ACCOMMODATION & COMES TO THE MARKET WITH NO CHAIN"" Comprising communal entrance, hall, generous open plan lounge kitchen, cloak room, one bedroom with balcony, en suite, allocated parking, communal gard..."
"MODERN APARTMENT SET BEHIND SECURE GATED ENTRY, CONVENIENTLY PLACED TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND ROAD NETWORK LINKS! Perfect for young professionals who are looking for their first home or even ideal for the discerning investor! Located in the heart of Wolverhampton, having e..."
"Three-bedroom mid terrace family home in need of some updating in a hugely popular residential location. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bus, rail and t..."
"IDEAL BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT - SECURE PARKING - EN-SUITE TO MASTER - LOUNGE/DINING ROOM - IMMACULATE CONDITION - A fantastic two bedroom, second floor apartment on the edge of this modern development - The property comprises; communal entrance, entrance hall, a large lounge/dining room, modern fit..."
"**CASH OFFERS ONLY - TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Balcony, en-suite to master bedroom, lounge currently used as a third bedroom, fitted kitchen, ideal first time purchase, allocated parking. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED, CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR ..."
MODERN TWO BEDROOM LARGE GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT CONVENIENTLY LOCATED CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO WOLVERHAMPTON RAIL STATION. Preferably sold with Long term Tenants in situ paying £750 per calendar month or first time buyers seeking ground fl...
"Beautifully presented and deceptively spacious modern, two bedroom first floor apartment. Just off the Stafford Road and close to the i54 and M54 motorway"
"Two bedroom ground floor flat situated in immensely sought after residential location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as the i54 & McArthur Glen designer outlet. Public transport..."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - SUPERB READY MADE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! Very well presented terrace home with two living rooms, good size kitchen, two double bedrooms and first floor bathroom. Let on a 3 year contract from 1st February 2022 at £650pcm."
"""A 2 BEDROOM TOP FLOOR CITY CENTRE APARTMENT"" Comprising of communal entrance hall, entrance hall, large open plan lounge leading to kitchen, two bedrooms one of which is en-suite, bathroom. Externally there are communal gardens and 1 allocated parking space."
"Three-bedroom terrace family home situated within a sought after residential location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bu..."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Beechwood Court, a McCarthy & Stone Development, is for those wanting to retire to an area with local amenities. It is a condition of purchase that residents be over the age of 60 years although for couples one can be over 55 ye..."
"A mid terraced property with no upward chain offering two double bedrooms, living room, kitchen/diner, utility area, first floor bathroom and a good size rear garden. The property is local to a range of amenities including shops, schools and public transport services close to hand, and is with..."
NO UPWARD CHAIN. Occupying a first floor position within a small secure gated complex this deceptively spacious one bedroom apartment enjoys a pleasant aspect from principle rooms and has been well maintained over the years to provide an appealing standard of living accommodation and is thought ...
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Detached Bungalow
"A First floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hal..."
"Newly decorated two-bedroom contemporary first floor apartment situated in purpose built gated development offering no upward chain suitable for a multitude of buyers including first time buyers and investors alike Briefly comprising; communal entrance, entrance hallway, open aspect li..."
"**TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT ON POPULAR MCCARTHY & STONE DEVELOPMENT, OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Located in a private location overlooking lawn gardens and within easy reach of Tettenhall's village centre, the property benefits from, two double bedrooms, a large lounge with..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATED FOR LOCAL SHOPPING, NEW CROSS HOSPITAL & BENTLEY BRIDGE RETAIL PARK"" Comprising front & rear garden, off road parking, garage, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms & shower room."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE AND PART REMODERNISED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR STAFFORD ROAD AND MOTORWAYS"" Comprising of front and rear gardens, lounge, dining room, refitted kitchen, utility, two double bedrooms and a fitted bathroom."
"Newly refurbished two bedroom mid terrace house situated in cul de sac location of residential location near city centre offering no upward chain. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Should you view, offer or bid your data w..."
""" INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY"" This 3 bedroom mid-terraced property is located close to Wolverhampton city centre. Internally this property has 3 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom. Externally there is a small paved courtyard to front, small paved courtyard to the rear, side gated access."
"Spacious Two Bedroom First Floor Apartment on a popular estate being offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN. comprising of Kitchen-Diner, Bathroom. Two Bedrooms, Allocated Parking Space. Viewings high recommended to be appreciated... Call now on to view!!!"
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED C. WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. Modern-style family home in the New Park Village area. The accommodation comprises and entrance porch and hall, store, downstairs WC, lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms, and a bathroom / WC. Externally..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN*This is a modern purpose built ground floor apartment situated within an established, sought after location while so handily placed for a comprehensive range of amenities and transport links within walking distance"
"""A CHAIN FREE DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS TWO/THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY WHICH IS A FANTASTIC FIRST TIME PURCHASE OR BUY TO LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY"" Comprising lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, two/three bedrooms (see Agents Note), courtyard style frontage & enclosed rear garden."
"Beautifully presented and deceptively spacious modern, two bedroom ground floor apartment. Just off the Stafford Road and close to the i54 and M54 motorway"
"This is a perfect example of surprisingly spacious and low maintenance living accommodation, but not only that... this is a TWO BEDROOM HIGHER FLOOR apartment for that added security that is situated in the heart of Wolverhampton City, appealing for those that may need the benefits to take a shor..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: To be sold by public auction on the owners' instruction. A purpose-built block of two two-bedroom flats in Wolverhampton, Staffordshire. Ideal for investors. Tenanted. Separate titles to be sold as one Lot. Leasehold with 50 years remaining for each flat. Auctioneer..."
"""A DELIGHTFUL SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION!"" Comprising - communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, family bathroom, allocated parking, well presented communal gardens."
"CHAIN FREE!!!
Tucked away at the end of a leafy close is this beautifully presented and deceptively spacious modern, two bedroom upper floor apartment. Of all the apartments on this new build estate, this is probably the best location! The property briefly comprises of; Secure communal intercom ..."
Fantastic Apartment...Two Bedrooms...Secure Gated Parking...Modern Throughout...Recently Decorated...First Floor Apartment...Stylish Fitted Kitchen...Popular Residential Location...Lift Access...Close To A Variety Of Amenities...Great Investment Opportunity...Viewings Available Now...113 Year Lease!
"""A DELIGHTFUL TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising lounge, kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom, garage & communal parking."
"*FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FIRST HOME* Whitegates have immense pleasure in offering FOR SALE this TOP FLOOR TWO BEDROOM apartment on ALBION STREET, WOLVERHAMPTON. This property is located within walking distance to the Wolverhampton Town Centre, Bus/Train/Metro Station and y..."
GROUND FLOOR Having been updated and modernised in 2018 to a high standard this ground floor McCarthy and Stone apartment is set in the ever sought after over 55's development of Beechwood Court which is located in between the convenient areas of Tettenhall Green and Tettenhall Wood with both ...
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THIS SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS 2 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, 2 bedrooms, bathroom, separate wc, front and rear gardens."
"""A SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AVAILABLE TO PURCHASE WITH OR WITHOUT CURRENT TENANT (subject to terms & conditions)"" Comprising lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom."
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION***THREE BEDROOM HOME**IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, I am Sold Limited.This method of auction require..."
Lovett&Co. Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this unique one bedroom ground floor apartment set on the private gated site of the Old Mill in the heart of the city centre.   The property is being offer with NO ONWARD CHAIN and features: open plan lounge /diner and kitchen with up...
"A well located, spacious, one bedroom flat within a sought after area which would benefit from some upgrading."
"Situated on the ground floor with the convenience of direct entry, this lovely apartment offers generous proportions, gas and central heating and double glazing with allocated and gated parking to the rear."
"FIRST-FLOOR MODERN APARTMENT. LEASEHOLD WITH 105 YEARS REMAINING. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. EPC RATED C. Ground rent £100 p.a Service charges £1011.26 p.a. Offered with no upward chain, the accommodation comprises an entrance hall, large living room / kitchen, bedroom..."
"Traditional two bedroom mid terrace house situated within residential location available to buy to let investors. This freehold residence is a ready made home with a tenant currently in situ paying £500 rent per calendar month presenting a yield of 5.4%. In brief, the property compris..."
"CHAIN FREE
Two bedroom ground floor apartment, with spacious lounge/dining/kitchen. Master bedroom with en-suite shower room, 3pc bathroom suite, allocated parking in a secure gated parking area located to the rear of the property situated amongst the communal gardens. Secure door entry system in..."
"""CASH OFFERS INVITED - A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY LOCATED CLOSE TO TRANSPORT ACCESS LINKS"" Comprising hall, lounge, dining area, good size kitchen, additional room (potential Bedroom STPP), en-suite shower room, three bedrooms, bathroom, front & rear gardens."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Semi Detached Investment Property Current Gross Income: £7,500 pa"
"* A good-sized 2-bedroom, first-floor retirement apartment on a quiet development just a short walk from picturesque Upper Green. With allocated parking and delightful communal gardens * Hall * Kitchen * Spacious lounge * Two bedrooms * Bathroom * Allocated parking * Outdoor store * Fully maintai..."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & CHAIN FREE FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising communal security entry, 19ft lounge, refitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, fitted shower room & COMMUNAL LAUNDRY AREAS TO REAR"
""" A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising of entrance hall, two bedrooms, large open lounge/ diner, kitchen and family bathroom, communal walk ways as well as communal gardens."
"NO UPPER CHAIN - IDEAL BUY-TO-LET - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 2 RECEPTION ROOMS - A two bedroom terraced property in the Dunstall area within easy reach of the City centre and amenities - an ideal buy-to-let purchase. Accommodation comprises; entrance into lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor bat..."
"For Sale by Modern Method of Auction, Starting Bid £110,000 plus Reservation Fee. This traditional semi-detached house presents a ready-made home solution suitable to a variety of buyer types, with its fantastic location, offering close proximity to New Cross Hospital, Bentl..."
"Two bedroom mid terrace house presented well throughout situated in residential location offering no upward chain. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Should you view, offer or bid your data will be shared with the Auctione..."
"Do you need help selling your property? Do you need help finding the right mortgage? Do you have a property to let? Here at Paul Dubberley and Co Willenhall we offer free advice on the house buying, selling and letting process. Contact us on "
"Spacious Two Bedroom First Floor Apartment on a popular estate being offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Having a open plan Living area, Bathroom. Two Bedrooms, (master with en suite), Allocated Parking Space. Viewings highly recommended!"
"Positioned in a popular location is this well presented one bedroom, purpose built flat.
Being offered CHAIN FREE! This property offers great opportunity for the first time buyer to get on the property ladder. With low ground rent and maintenance costs, this property offers great potential. Spac..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR ACCESS TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND FURTHER AFIELD"" Comprising of lounge, dining room, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, family bathroom, front courtyard style garden, enclosed rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT CLOSE TO POPULAR TRANSPORT LINKS"" Comprising communal entrance hall, entrance hall, 17ft lounge, modern fitted kitchen. two bedrooms & bathroom. Externally there are communal gardens to front and rear."
"A prominently positioned first-floor apartment in a highly favoured retirement complex within a particularly pleasant setting with amenities within walking distance to Tettenhall village and Tettenhall Wood. Neatly presented accommodation, very comfortably appointed and offering independent lifes..."
Belvoir are delighted to be presenting to market this fantastic ground floor flat in the heart of Wednesfield making a perfect bungalow alternative!
"A ground floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance ha..."
"A First floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hall, 'o..."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! City centre apartment currently let on a 3 year tenancy at £525 pcm. Allocated parking, living room with kitchen off, double bedroom and bathroom. City centre location with exciting developments proposed nearby."
"*NO CHAIN* Spacious two bedroom apartment situated in a convenient yet quiet location close to the town centre. The apartment property comprises modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge with laminate flooring, two good sized bedrooms and bathroom with electric shower over bath, all with neutral dec..."
"""A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising of communal entrance hall, entrance hall, large lounge, kitchen, 2 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom. Externally there is shared communal areas."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED SECOND FLOOR CITY CENTRE APARTMENT AVAILABLE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of own car parking space, security entry system, lounge, 2 bedrooms, fitted bathroom and a fitted kitchen ( the property has also recently been re-carpeted)"
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom property in need of some refurbishment comprising of lounge, dining room, kitchen, shower room, three bedroom (one of which is a walk through another bedroom)
The property benefits from having double glazing and an enclosed rear garden..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom first floor flat which is ideal for first time buyers or investors.
The property comprises of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two double size bedrooms, bathroom and separate W/C. In addition you have gas central heating and double glazin..."
"BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY – SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU, Tenure – Freehold, EPC Rating – D (Potential - C), Rental Income - £450 pcm, Yield - , Council Tax Band - A, Rental Details to Follow**, Tenant in Situ Since - , Contract Type - , Contract Remaining - , Buyer’s Reservation Fee Applicable."
Wonderful opportunity to acquire a ground floor apartment. This property has been freshly renovated throughout and offers a recently installed boiler and electric heating.This Independent Living apartment is for 60+ years and partners can be 50+ years . Call now on to view...
"A First floor one bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hall, lo..."
"A freehold site of approx. 6,835sq ft/ 635sq meters in the popular residential area of Wolverhampton just off the Stafford Road with Planning Permission granted for the construction of a detached two bedroom bungalow with a floor area of approx. 66.84sq metres/719.4sq feet."
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY"" Comprising lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor shower room, three bedrooms, shower room. Externally there is a small courtyard style garden to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"Live stream auction on 16TH MARCH 2023 6PM START. Bidding will be available by either telephone, proxy or online bidding. If you wish to bid, please register on line via the Auction House website using the Register to Bid tab"
"One bedroom first floor maisonette recently refurbished throughout, situated in popular residential location offering no upward chain. This leasehold residence offers a ready-made home solution for a multitude of buyers, with rare views across the adjacent park and boasts scenic walking rou..."
"One bedroom ground floor maisonette recently refurbished throughout situated in sought after residential housing estate with a tenant in situ having a history of paying rent. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such a..."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £100,000 Buy it now option available
Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information
***OPEN DAY*** SUNDAY 5TH FEBRUARY*** 3.30PM - 4.30PM *Call or click request a viewing to book your slot now!"
"LEASHOLD FLAT WITH 86 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED D .CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. . GROUND RENT £10. p.a.. Service charges vary. This is a spacious top-floor apartment in need of general cosmetic updating and modernisation. The accommodation comprises a lounge, fitted kitchen, t..."
"A fantastic modern two bedroom ground floor apartment presented to the highest standard and ready to move into or be purchased as a great investment, with a tenant potentially in situ currently paying £600 pcm offering over a 7% annual yield. With a long lease to offer, thi..."
"* A good-sized 1-bedroom retirement apartment on the top floor of a sought-after Tettenhall development, walkable for the village centre and enjoying garden views * Hall * Living and dining space * Kitchen * Bathroom * Sizeable master bedroom * New carpets * Resident and guest parking * Glorious ..."
"* A spacious 1-bedroom over 55's retirement apartment within a secure, accessible development only a short walk from the centre of Tettenhall. Boasts excellent garden views, plenty of parking, on-site resident’s facilities, and beautiful communal grounds * Hall * Kitchen * Lounge * One larg..."
"* A spacious 1-bedroom first-floor apartment on a Bradmore cul-de-sac, within a few minutes’ walk of shops and services * Hall * Lounge * Kitchen * Bathroom * One double bedroom * Less than five minutes’ walk from the considerable amenities provided across Bradmore, this 1-bedroom ..."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This TWO BEDROOM apartment is situation on the FIRST FLOOR and is in the very desirable PENN area of Wolverhampton. The apartment is just minutes away from many major transporting links and amenities are just within a walking distance too. Internally the property has an open pla...
"Paul Dubberley are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £90,000 for 53 Lewis Street Bilston WV14 7LZ. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Paul Dubberley 69 Church Street Bilston WV14 0AX on before exchange of contracts."
"IDEAL FOR INVESTORS OR FIRST TIME BUYER. This Beautiful One Bedroom Ground Floor flat is being offered with an extended lease and no Ground Rent costs. Comprising of; Entrance Hall, Bedroom, Kitchen, Bathroom and lounge. This also comes with excellent transport links and local amenities."
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION**TWO BEDROOMS & TWO RECEPTION ROOMS***CALL FOR MORE INFORMATION** This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, iamsold Limited.This method of au..."
LEASEHOLD FLAT WITH 128 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. Ground rent £250 p.a. and service charges approximately £1100 p.a. This is a well-presented first-floor apartment in the popular Newbridge area of Wolverhampton. The accommodation comprises...
"TOP FLOOR - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - CLOSE TO AMENITIES - IDEAL BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT - A two bedroom second floor apartment, situated within a well maintained purpose built development, only a short distance away from the city centre. In brief, the property comprises of ; entrance hallway..."
"Situated to the North of the City and thus convenient for Wolverhampton, Wednesfield plus New Cross Hospital and Bentley Bridge. This ground floor maisonette is situated within a cul-de-sac of similar properties plus communal gardens and parking spaces. The two bedroom accommodation has double..."
"A one bedroom first floor apartment currently tenanted and looking for a new landlord to takeover. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge opening to kitchen area, a double bedroom and bathroom. To the front of the property is an attractive green area whilst allocated parking can be found a..."
"Two bedroom mid terrace house situated in residential location within 1.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre offering no upward chain. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Should you view, offer or bid your data will be share..."
"Sold With Tennants in Situ. A stunning one bedroom ground floor apartment in the old girls school keeping all of its original features. The accommodation comprises of an open plan new fitted kitchen/living room bedroom, hall and fitted bathroom with shower."
"Offered with no upward chain, an immaculate and well presented one bedroomed Apartment with allocated parking. Ideally located in a quiet and sought after location with convenient access to transport links, Schools and local amenities.
Also new Cross Hospital and Wolverhampton City Centre. Ac..."
* A well-situated 1-bedroom retirement apartment on the first floor of a sought-after McCarthy & Stone development for the over 55's. Enjoying a village position within easy reach of local amenities * Hall * Living and dining space * Kitchen * Bathroom * Sizeable master bedroom * Resident and gue...
Occupying a choice position in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village this well-designed first floor apartment is an excellent example of its type in a modern development of retirement apartments.The attractive living accommodation has
"""A CHAIN FREE CITY CENTRE ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT"" Comprising of communal entrance, entrance hall, open plan lounge kitchen, family bathroom, bedroom. Externally there is 1 allocated parking space."
We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Duplex Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"NEW BUILD SHARED OWNERSHIP HOMES - NIGHTINGALE PLACE, WOLVERHAMPTON"
The Ash is a fabulous 2 bedroom apartment available via the Shared Ownership Scheme enabling you to purchase between 25%-75% of this home. The price reflects a purchase of 50 % of this home. Call to speak to one of our advisors for more information regarding qualifying for the Shared Ownership S...
"""50% SHARE - AN AMAZING OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM HOME"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, 29ft lounge, fitted kitchen, utility, two bedrooms, shower room, off road parking & garage, front & rear gardens."
"Well presented one bedroom apartment situated in a popular location ideal for first time buyers or buy to let investment. The property is accessed via a secure communal entrance and comprises hallway, living room, kitchen, one double bedroom and bathroom. Allocated Parking Space. Intercom System."
"First floor purpose built one bedroom modern apartment in city centre location offering no upward chain. Briefly comprising; communal stairwells and hallways, entrance hallway, living room with open aspect into kitchen, bathroom and double bedroom. The property is further benefitting..."
"A delight to bring to market is this first floor maisonette set upon a secure gated modern development, within easy reach of Bilston Town Centre and all its local amenities of local shops and public transport. Excellent road network links are close-by giving easy access to surro..."
"Modern and well presented one bedroom apartment that is available with no onward chain. Situated in the popular Blue brick development, perfectly placed for the city centre amenities and Wolverhampton rail station."
"Set around an area of open mature grounds, neatly tucked away within a secluded and private cul de sac location off Merridale Road on the fringe of Wolverhampton City, therefore in ease of excellent commuter links and local amenities. This well-proportioned ONE BEDROOM second floor ap..."
**ATTENTION INVESTORS** **NO UPWARD CHAIN** Located in the city centre and within close proximity to local amenities and a number of transport links
A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Pendene Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 40 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an eme...
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Pendene Court is an impressive and attractive purpose built retirement complex constructed by McCarthy & Stone in 2000 to a high specification, set in delightfully mature and private grounds, providing a most pleasant and enjoyable living environment for persons of sixty years a..."
"""CONNELLS WOLVERHAMPTON ARE OFFERING FOR SALE A FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WHICH OFFERS FRONT & REAR GARDENS WITH OUTBUILDING & COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS TO FRONT"" Comprising entrance hall, landing, lounge, kitchen, bedrooms and bathroom - INTERNALS TO FOLLOW SHORTLY."
"""A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT IN THE POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA OF PARKFIELDS"" Having Open Plan Kitchen, Lounge, 2 Bedrooms, Master En-suite Shower Room, Bathroom, Allocated Off-Road Parking, Well Maintained Communal Gardens and excellent transport links into Wolverhampton City centre."
"MUST BE SEEN - TOP FLOOR - 2 BEDROOMS - PRIVATE GATED PARKING - A modern two bedroom first floor flat in a popular location just off the Birmingham New Road and offering easy access to amenities and road links. Accommodation comprises; communal entrance hall, hallway, open lounge/diner and kitch..."
First Floor Flat...Two Bedrooms...Off Road Parking...Great Location...Spacious Rooms...Fully Double Glazed...Electric Storage Heaters...Close To New Cross Hospital...Carpeted Throughout...EPC Grade = E...Chain Free...Low Service Charge & Ground Rent Costs...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!
"""AVAILABLE FOR SHARED OWNERSHIP AT 50% A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY BENEFITING FROM NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of entrance porch, large open plan lounge, kitchen diner, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is a small front garden area and an enclosed rear garden."
"**ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR MAISONETTE OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** First floor maisonette situated in popular residential location with easy access to Wolverhampton City Centre, schools of all grades, local amenities and public transport. The property briefly comprises: Separate entrance door..."
"A FIRST FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT OVERLOOKING COMMUNAL GARDENS Pendene Court is situated within a short distance of local shops, Doctors surgeries and with access to local bus routes via bus stop near to development. Constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and compri..."
CALLING INVESTORS - this two-bedroom flat is offered for sale with a sitting tenant on a Periodic Assured Shorthold Tenancy Agreement achieving £595 per calendar month. Service Charge - £1072 Pa Ground Rent - £250 Pa Year remaining on lease - 79 YEARS Council Tax Band - A 
"""ATTENTION CASH BUYERS - A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT"" Comprising entrance hall, open plan lounge kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom, communal grounds and located parking."
"** Tenanted Investment Opportunity! ** ** In excess of 8% yield! **Belvoir are delighted to present this wonderful apartment to the sales market. We are looking for Landlords to take over this new tenancy currently paying £625 PCM, resulting in a yield in excess of 8%!"
"One bedroom second floor modern apartment situated in Wolverhampton City centre offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and rail. This leasehold re..."
Investment Opportunity | Tenanted | No Chain | Low Maintenance | 79 Years Leasehold Remaining | EPC Rating D | Balcony | Garage Included | 8.9 % Yield
"**ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT IN POPULAR CITY CENTRE LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** An ideal investment opportunity located close to local amenities and within walking distance to Wolverhampton City Centre. Having allocated off-road parking, communal entrance, one double bedroom..."
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Semi Detached Property
"One bedroom first floor modern apartment decorated to a good standard situated within purpose built block in Wolverhampton city centre offering no upward chain. Located in the midst of the city centre, this has the advantage of being close to all sorts of useful amenities, including; shops, ..."
"WIith ""NO UPWARD CHAIN"" this one bedroom ground floor flat is located in a convenient area with access to many local amenities and local transport networks. The flat also benefits from having off road parking, which provides space for multiple cars. "
The Ash is a fabulous 2 bedroom apartment available via the Shared Ownership Scheme enabling you to purchase between 25%-75% of this home. The price reflects a purchase of 25 % of this home. Call to speak to one of our advisors for more information regarding qualifying for the Shared Ownership S...
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Residential Investment Property Current Gross Income: £7,200 pa.
BEING OFFERED ON BEHALF OF THE JOINT ADMINISTRATORS"
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Residential Investment Property Current Gross Income: £6,300 pa.
BEING OFFERED ON BEHALF OF THE JOINT ADMINISTRATORS"
"Take a look at this one bedroom flat in Warstones, an ideal first home or investment. Enter the property into the hallway that leads to the lounge, kitchen, bathroom and bedroom, a property to make your own. In the convenient location of Warstones close to Merry Hill with an array of local sh..."
Spacious two bedroom apartment providing an ideal Buy To Let opportunity with tenants in place. Situated on the 16th floor the property is ideally located for nearby New Cross Hospital and is well served by public transport. There is an allocated parking space and spacious accommodation comprisin...
"GORUND-FLOOR MAISONETTE IN NEED OF SOME IMPROVEMENT. LEASHOLD WITH 105 YEARS REMAINING. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC RATED C. Ground rent £10 per annum, service charges to be confirmed. This is a traditional apartment in the Bushbury area of Wolverhampton and ideal for inve..."
*EXCELLENT INVESTMENT PURCHASE* This ground floor Maisonette is situated in a popular residential location. The property offers spacious living accommodation and is conveniently located a short distance from New Cross Hospital & other local amenities including motorway and bus routes.
**EXCELLENT INVESTMENT PURCHASE** This first floor Maisonette is situated in a popular residential location. The property offers spacious living accommodation and is conveniently located a short distance from New Cross Hospital & other local amenities including motorway and bus routes.
"A surprisingly spacious two bedroom apartment located in the increasingly popular St Cecilias Court. Internally the accommodation offers very well proportioned rooms, and benefits from gas central heating. Residents benefit from a secure entrance and private barrier controlled car park, with one..."
"Deceptively Spacious TWO Bedroom Flat located on the 7th Floor of the Popular St Cecilias Court. Spacious Apartment with accommodation comprising of Lounge, Kitchen, Two Bedrooms, Bathroom and separate WC. The property benefits from a Central Heating System and Double Glazing as well as an alloca..."
Freehold House Vacant Possession
"""OVER 55'S RETIREMENT PROPERTY"" Comprising of communal grounds, communal parking, communal entrance hall, walk way area, entrance hall, large bedroom with dressing area, good sized lounge, modern fitted kitchen, modern shower room,"
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: To be sold by public auction on the owners' instruction. A purpose-built two bedroom flat in Wolverhampton, Staffordshire. Ideal for investors. Tenanted. Offered as a Lot of two flats with separate titles to be sold as one auction Lot. Leasehold with 50 years remaining for ea..."
"Second floor ONE bedroom retirement apartment. This property has the advantage of no floor above and is situated at the front entrance of Grosvenor Park, overlooking the communal grounds and you can watch the world go by each day of those visiting. The accommodation compris..."
"Desirable first floor apartment for those aged 55 and over and being part of a development readily accessible to the City Centre, with diverse local shopping nearby plus a range of amenities in the surrounding neighbourhood including Doctors, post office, library, and bus routes.Having ..."
"""A WONDERFULLY PRESENTED GROUND FOOR APARTMENT LOCATED WITHIN A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT IN PENN"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, one bedrooms, shower room, allocated parking, communal gardens."
"Beautifully presented Ground Floor Apartment in popular retirement complex providing sheltered accommodation for the over 55s, enabling independent lifestyle within secure environment. Attractively finished with particularly well appointed specification and nicely proportioned layout comprising; ..."
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Detached Property
"Offered With No Upward Chain A well presented one bedroomed flat occupying a quiet position with allocated parking. Accommodation comprises; Entrance hall, lounge/dining room, one double bedroom and the bathroom. The property is an ideal first time or investment purchase in a popular locati..."
"LEASEHOLD APARTMENT WITH 85 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. SERVICE CHARGES £1840.01, TWICE YEARLY, AND GROUND RENT £264.60 TWICE YEARLY. This is a well-presented, first-floor apartment in a popular retirement complex for the over 55s in Penn. ..."
"A Well Presented One Bedroom Flat located on the 5th Floor of the Popular St Cecilias Court. This Spacious Apartment is offered in a condition that is ready to move into, with accommodation comprising of spacious Lounge, Kitchen, Bedroom and Bathroom. The property benefits from a Central Heating ..."
"Ground floor ONE bedroom retirement apartment. This property has the advantage of being located on the ground floor level and is situated at the front of the development at Grosvenor Park, overlooking the Penn Road so you can watch the world go by each day. Further benefitting from a g..."
RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR THE OVER 55's - EXCELLENT CONDITION! - POPULAR LOCATION - COMMUNAL GARDENS - PARKING - A second floor retirement flat which is presented in excellent condition and specifically within a development for the over 55s in the sought after Penn area of Wolverhampton. A...
"Grosvenor Park is a highly regarded retirement development for the over 55's and this particular property is a superb example of its type. The property briefly comprises lounge, fitted kitchen, double bedroom and shower room. There are double glazed windows and electric night storage heating. The..."
*** CONNELLS LAND DEPARTMENT IS OFFERING FOR SALE A SMALL PLOT OF LAND SITUATED IN THE DESIRABLE AREA OF PENN *** This current homeowner is selling the land with the hope the potential purchaser will be able to gain planning permission for a detached dwelling.
**Plot Of Land For Sale Within The Highly Regarded Locality of Penn**Currently A Gated Parking Area** The current homeowner is selling with the hope that the potential purchaser maybe able to gain planning permission for a single dwelling. This is all subject to building regulations and pla...
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* *OVER 55's ONLY*
Sold as seen (excluding chattels).
A well located, spacious, one bedroom flat within a sought after area which would benefit from some upgrading"
"Ground Floor - Two Reception Rooms, Kitchen, Bathroom/WC, First Floor - Two Bedrooms, Rear Garden, Wolverhampton City Centre is approximately 1 mile to the south east, Video Tour available below
"
"**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Vacant Two Bedroom Semi Detached House Freehold Guide Price = £35,000+ Location The property is situa..."
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Leasehold Purpose Built Apartment
"Guide Price £19,000.00 For sale by 27/03/2023 12:00 Online Bidding Pre-registration is required via our website bpauctions.co.uk Three Bedroom Vacant Semi Detached Property. Ground Floor - Hallway, Living room, Kitchen, Utility room, shower w/c & conservatory
First Floor - Bathroom..."
"Guide Price £9,000.00 For sale by 13/03/2023 12:40 Online Bidding Pre-registration is required via our website bpauctions.co.uk Freehold Two Bedroom Mid-Terrace Investment Property. Rented at £4800 per annum This property has a 28 day completion timeframe (refer to contract)..."
"Guide Price £9,000.00 For sale by 27/03/2023 12:50 Online Bidding Pre-registration is required via our website bpauctions.co.uk A Three Bedroom Mid-Terrace Property. Vacant 28 Days Completion. Place a prior auction offer by sending an email to Administrati..."
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Leasehold Ground Floor Studio Flat
"Location: The site is bounded on Westbury Street by the Planet Night Club and on Whitmore Street by the Masjid Alrahma in Wolverhampton City Centre. Opposite the site is Broad Street Car Park, with the Ring Road (A4150) beyond that the north and east. Small pockets of terraced, residential dwel..."
"SHARED OWNERSHIP 40% SHARE. A two bedroom townhouse, situated in the desirable Diglis location which is a short walk from the city centre. The property compromises entrance hall, downstairs w/c, two bedrooms, bathroom and lounge/kitchen. There is an allocated parking space for one car."
"Grange House is a rare and individual property, set in private gardens of 1.53 acres, on the outskirts of the village of Rushwick, Worcestershire. The property has split level accommodation and extends to almost 3000 Sq Ft, (3422 Sq Ft including garage and workshop), offering flexible and spaciou..."
"A handsome and spacious Edwardian family house in a convenient location close to Waitrose, with easy access to the town centre and Motorway network. Cromwell Crescent is situated in the South East of Worcester in a convenient location close to Waitrose and only 1 mile from the city centre. Redg..."
"A stylish and much-loved family home. In a quiet location off the London Road, with fast access to the motorway network and Parkway Station. Garicoits House has a wealth of accommodation (5087 sq ft), over four floors"
"**A SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED FIVE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME** This beautiful, family home, is located in a rural setting overlooking countryside to the Malvern Hills with excellent links to the motorway, Worcester Parkways train station and Worcester City Centre. The area is well served with an excellent s..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a truly stunning six bedroom detached town house situated within the highly desirable area of St Johns. Set over four storeys the property offers gorgeous views of the River Severn, allowing mooring & fishing rights with exclusive use of the harbour. The ..."
"A superb modern townhouse in a magnificent, elevated position overlooking the River Severn and Worcester racecourse with electric gated entrance, separate studio and double garage."
"This is an extraordinary opportunity to invest in a row of studio flats with a three-bedroom house, large gardens, garage and outbuilding with plenty of parking and fabulous views. You will get a considerable annual return on your investment. House
This property is entered via a privacy glazed p..."
"A fine example of a part Victorian/part Georgian Grade II Listed period family home, situated within walking distance of Worcester City centre, offering 5 bedrooms and 4 reception rooms. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, Breakfas..."
"A stunning and very deceptive family home tucked away in a very peaceful spot in WR3. Close to excellent schools and all amenities. Fully renovated over the last couple of years, bringing this hidden gem back to life. Versatile living space which is very light. Four double bedro..."
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire a spacious and flexible five bedroom detached Georgian family home, situated within the sought after area of St. John's offering excellent local amenities within easy reach of Worcester City and major transport links. Local schooling is available along with eas..."
An imposing Grade II listed country residence encompassed within 2 acres of gardens and grounds located just 3 miles away from Worcester City Centre. Whittington Grange is a stunning period residence which has been meticulously refurbished throughout whilst retaining all its charm and original f...
"Proudly presented by Move Estate Agents; A beautifully presented spacious bay front four-bedroom detached family home situated at the end of a private drive with enviable rural views to the front and side of the property. Boasting a host of traditional looking features, this 3 year old propert..."
"SHOW HOME NOW OPEN - 7 DAYS A WEEK - 10AM TO 5PM Part exchange available *subject to T&C's This exclusive development by Hayfield, 'What House, House Builder of the Year 2021' offers fantastic modern living, in a Zero Carbon ready home!"
"Vantage Point - A magnificent contemporary detached house offering ample accommodation benefiting from access to the River Severn and located within walking distance of Worcester City Centre. The car deck is private, with remote-controlled gates, and is situated under the main house and over the..."
Handsome Grade II listed period property situated in a prime location within walking distance of Worcester City Centre
"A beautiful example of Georgian architecture with a wealth of period features together with spacious and flexible reception rooms, situated within walking distance of Worcester City. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Porch, Drawing Room with open fireplace, Sitting Room with further Re..."
"A brand new detached Executive family home by CDC Bespoke Properties Ltd., offered with a 10 year build warranty by Advantage and offering spacious and well appointed internal accommodation. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, downstairs Cloakroom, Study, Dining Room, Living..."
"City living at its finest. Victorian splendour combined with contemporary architectural flair and design. A great family house in North Worcester with 3,530 sq ft of versatile accommodation and an abundance of period features plus a fantastic garden. Stroll across to Gheluvelt Park, to nearby ..."
"A brand new executive style property situated on the popular Malvern Road, offering good size accommodation with impressive living space, four bedrooms and two en-suite shower rooms. Call now to arrange a viewing."
"The exquisite Grade II Listed Gatehouse is a truly exceptional property, with the luxury of a lower ground floor wine cellar and cinema room. The ground floor kitchen opens onto a generous terrace and there is a separate formal dining room and lounge with feature fireplace. "
" ** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** FULLY LET HMO ** ANNUAL INCOME £77,530.04PA ** Proudly presented by Move Sales & Lettings: St Swithin’s house is a 17 bedroom HMO situated in the heart of Worcester City Centre close to the large range of shops, bars and restaurants and leisure facili..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a stylish Grade II listed town house within walking distance of Worcester City Centre.
"A spacious and well proportioned family home, offering easy access to local schooling and transport links and within walking distance to Battenhall Park and local supermarkets. The property offers flexible and well planned accommodation, together with ample off road parking and garaging. <..."
"Homes like this are exceedingly rare to market, with this property being the first to be sold down this exclusive private road in many years. Situated in an elevated position, overlooking Worcester towards the Malvern Hills, this extensive family home offers ample space for any growing family. "
A spacious THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM home of the HIGHEST STANDARD with FULL LENGTH LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA. Also boasts a large EN-SUITE to the master bedroom.
"The property has hall, sitting room, dining room, kitchen, utility and downstairs cloakroom. There are four bedrooms, en-suite and family bathroom. There are gardens to the front and rear, summer house, garage and off road parking. The property benefits from gas fired central heating."
"***£10k to personalise your purchase! Can be used towards stamp duty, legal fees, moving costs, carpets and light fittings!*** STUNNING SHOW HOME OPEN - 7 DAYS A WEEK - 10AM TO 5PM Part exchange available *subject to T&C's"
"Offered with no chain, the property briefly comprises; An enclosed entrance hall with fitted storage for boots, bags, coats, etc. a versatile reception space, currently used as a dining area with a front aspect window, a spacious lounge with dual aspect windows to the front and French doors to th..."
"**AN ABSOLUTE MUST VIEW** A stunning, high quality and beautifully designed ""Hi Tech Eco Friendly A rated Energy Efficient"" executive detached 5 double bedroom house (approx 2296 sq ft) situated on a quiet private lane within an exclusive development being one of 4 other similar properties built..."
"Detached family home in the popular village of Hallow. Entrance hall with fitted cloakroom off; impressive dining kitchen; laundry room; lounge; dining/sitting room; and study. Four bedrooms; two en-suite; and family bathroom. Detached double garage, drive and landscaped garden."
"***WOW - CHECK OUT THIS STUNNING FAMILY HOME IN CALLOW END*** Leaders are proud to present to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN this unique grade II listed five bedroom detached family home situated in the popular village location of Callow End, Worcester. Once part of the histor..."
"**INVESTMENT PROPERTY – TENANTS CURRENTLY IN SITU** Current income in the region of £76,000. Move Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this freehold FULLY LICENCED 10 BED HMO with a separate Commercial Unit facing onto the Tything, Worcester. The property is positioned in ..."
"Blending timeless Arts and Crafts touches with the finest of modern family living, The Richmond is a home that is as beautiful as it is practical. This four bedroom home, set over 2030 square feet, offers a fantastic quality of life that exceeds the very highest standards. The capaciou..."
"STUNNING SHOW HOME OPEN - 7 DAYS A WEEK - 10AM TO 5PM Part exchange available *subject to T&C's This exclusive development by Hayfield, 'What House, House Builder of the Year 2021' offers fantastic modern living, in a Zero Carbon ready home!"
"With its sleek lines and elegant design, but with space and functionality at the fore, the well-appointed Hampstead is a house any family would be proud to call home. The stunning frontage is what impresses first with the Hampstead, and the versatility continues inside, with a good-siz..."
"A much improved and extended four bedroom detached 17th Century period family home, located within the heart of the popular village of Powick. The property offers a sympathetic blend of period charm and modern convenience, with additional development potential via a detached Coach House. 'Pool ..."
Executive new build home in exclusive development of 6 homes in the heart of this popular location in circa 2000sq.ft
"***NEW RELEASE*** STUNNING SHOW HOME OPEN - 7 DAYS A WEEK - 10AM TO 5PM CALL US TODAY TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT! This exclusive development by Hayfield, 'What House, House Builder of the Year 2021' offers fantastic modern living, in a Zero Carbon ready home!"
"***INVESTMENT PROPERTY*** Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings; Wall House & Gate House are a pair of FIVE-bedroom, TWO-bathroom HMOs situated in the heart of Worcester City Centre. The properties are accessed from The Butts via a security pedestrian gate operated for the phon..."
"A highly impressive five bedroom semi-detached Victorian family home, featuring a wealth of character and situated within the highly desirable area of Barbourne. The property which is close to excellent schools and a range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Porch, Entrance Hall, Livin..."
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire a deceptively spacious three double bedroom detached Bungalow, situated in this sought after area, offering excellent local amenities and transport links, local schooling and easy access to RGS and Kings, within Worcester City. Accommodation briefly com..."
"Versatile 5 bedroom detached family home located in Bevere, a highly sought after location in WR3"
Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a wonderful traditional and extended family home situated in a desirable location South of the City centre convenient to all local amenities and within catchment to local reputable schooling. This substantial family home has been well maintained ...
"A well presented five bedroom detached family home built by a local builder, affectionately known as the 'Butterfly House' due to its design, situated within this sought after village of Hallow, offering local amenities, schooling and easy access into Worcester City and major transport links."
"Off Road Parking, Beautiful Garden, Five Double Bedrooms, Two Bathrooms, Two Seperate W.C's. Garden Room with Underfloor Heating, Two Reception Rooms and a Dry Lined Cellar"
Exceptional Four Bedroom Detached Dormer Bungalow boasting an impressive 1794 sq. ft. which must be seen to be fully appreciated. On entering the property you will be greeted with a spacious hallway with gallery landing. To the first floor there is a large and modern kitchen/diner whic...
One of the coolest (and warmest) ECO style homes the City has to offer with jaw dropping views toward the Cathedral previously enjoyed by the local Bishop. On the open market for the first time - Welcome to City Vista
A fabulous and very rare opportunity. A beautifully positioned detached barn with glorious views and large block of land. Prior approvals granted for change of use of one agricultural building to one dwelling house. Situated at the end of a no through lane in a highly favoured area. In all about ...
"Built by an independent developer, and completed in 2021, this stunning family home offers ample space in all the right places. The layout has been carefully considered, making it a stunning space with fantastic flow, that could be arranged in a variety of ways. The property still has that new bu..."
"Take the time to appreciate this fabulous & well presented detached family home. Situated in the popular village of Fernhill Heath & offering accommodation including 4 bedrooms, 2 en-suites, 2 reception rooms, study, utility and conservatory - further benefits include a detached double garage."
The excessive natural light was what drew our clients to this pleasant three bedroom home. Whilst the room sizes are generous and the amenities are convenient our clients are now ready to upsize and vacate this home in readiness for an exciting new buyer.
*The property benefits from a large annex* A stunning double fronted five bedroom detached family home situated within the highly desirable area of Northwick. The property boasts a wealth of period features throughout and has been finished to a high standard. The property briefly c...
"A beautifully extended and fully refurbished three double bedroom detached bungalow situated on a large plot within striking distance of Worcester city centre. Finished to a high standard throughout, this property must be viewed to appreciate all it has to offer. The spacious private plot t..."
A traditional family home situated within a convenient and desirable residential area. 3 Hallow Road is approached via a wrought iron pedestrian gate leading onto the front lawned garden. The fore garden is incredibly private and well-screened from the road by mature hedgerows to the front. The ...
"Ground Floor Shop With A 4 Bed Flat Above + 3 Individual One Bed flats . Total Rental Income £37,620 p.a."
DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING AREA and a SEPARATE LOUNGE. Also boasts a SEPARATE UTILITY and an EN-SUITE to the master bedroom.
"A completely renovated, detached 3 bedroom house with large gardens and private parking."
"Situated within the popular residential area of Great Meadow and nestled in a quiet idyllic spot at the end of a no through road. This detached five bedroom extended family home features a stunning open plan modern kitchen/dining/family room with skylights and a separate Utility & WC, gorg..."
"***STAMP DUTY PAID*** STUNNING SHOW HOME OPEN - 7 DAYS A WEEK - 10AM TO 5PM CALL US TODAY TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT! This exclusive development by Hayfield, 'What House, House Builder of the Year 2021' offers fantastic modern living, in a Zero Carbon ready home!"
"A fabulous opportunity to acquire a 2/3 bedroom detached period property, situated within easy reach of Worcester City in this sought after area, benefiting from a generous sized garden. Accommodation briefly comprises: Porch and Hallway, large Sitting Room, Dining Room/potential downst..."
"Situated in the leafy suburb of Battenhall, this spacious home has been much loved by the same family for many years, but is now ready for a new family to make it their own. The home has been extended over time, offering an ideal amount of space for families of all sizes, and features stunning vi..."
"Homes along the sought after Spetchley Road don't come to market often, and this home simply must be viewed to appreciate all that it has to offer. Situated on an incredibly generous plot, the home offers an abundence of off road parking to the front, and a stunning garden to the rear. The proper..."
"Detached family home set over three floors with a corner plot position on this popular estate. The home is positioned on the edge of this development built by Bellway Homes in 2017/2018. The property has NHBC guarantee remaining. In brief the property comprises; entrance hall, sitting ..."
"The property comprises of entrance hall, large lounge with feature bay window overlooking the front garden, double doors leading into the dining room from the lounge, open-plan kitchen / diner fitted with granite worktops, gas hob and double oven, utility room with door into the garage, separate ..."
"Built by the award winning Hayfield Homes, this beautiful home is located in the popular village of Hallow where a popular public house, church and highly reputable primary school lies along with a village shop and other amenities and clubs for the whole community."
Our iconic Garnet is a perfect 4 bedroom family home with an amazing statement floor-to-ceiling window drawing in the natural light giving a greater sense of overall wellbeing. Downstairs features a separate family room to the kitchen diner providing an idyllic place to unwind. A highlight
"Located on a quiet cul-de-sac in the highly desirable residential area of Battenhall, this generously sized four bedroom house is ready for you to move straight in and is offered with no onward chain."
"An incredibly rare opportunity to move to the prestigious Fountain Place! Fountain Place is a perfectly tucked away gem within the WR1 postcode. The property itself has been generously extended, and now is ready for a new family, as it is being sold with no onward chain. The property ..."
"Spacious and well presented property, situated along a quiet no through lane within the popular village of Fernhill Heath with excellent local amenities and transport links. Accommodation briefly comprises: Hall, Cloakroom, open-plan Living Room/Dining Room, Kitchen, Master Bedroom with..."
Bespoke development of 6 x Executive NEW BUILDS nr. completion by local developer Premier Building Ventures
Executive new build 3/4 Bedroom home in exclusive development of 6 homes in the heart of this popular location in circa 1700SQ.FT
"This unique two bedroom apartment features an impressive open plan kitchen/dining area, ideal for entertaining, and a separate lounge with views towards the refurbished Stables. "
"Immaculate and elegant first floor pre-owned apartment with lift access, boasting fabulous west-facing views over the Italianate landscaped gardens and offering easy access to the formal gardens and the facilities"
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire this newly extended and previously renovated detached property situated in the sought after area of Beaconhill. A short distance from the popular village of Hallow where you will find extensive amenities including a popular pub, village shop and tennis club. Wit..."
"A Chalet style home with flexible accommodation totalling approximately 2430 sq feet. Situated in the popular Fernhill Heath area with two Public Houses, Recreational Park, popular 1st School, Convenience Stores and Post Office. giving easy access to both Worcester, Droitwich and motorway links.<..."
Philip Laney and Jolly Worcester offer a three bedroom detached family home occupying a generous corner plot that has been extended to the side creating most useful living accommodation. The property has been well maintained by the current owner with the accommodation comprising a generous living...
"Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings; A beautifully presented four-bedroom detached family home situated in the popular Fernhill Heath area of Worcester. The accommodation comprises of an initial entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first-floor accommodation, downstairs cloa..."
"A well presented and deceptively spacious five bedroom semi detached period property, situated within the sought after area of Battenhall, offering excellent local schooling, amenities, easy access into Worcester City and major transport links. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, S..."
"Renovated to a truly immaculate standard throughout, this property is a hidden gem in the ever popular location of Barbourne, with superb views over Gheluvelt Park, and within walking distance to a range of amenities. On the ground floor the accommodation briefly comprises; spacious e..."
"Call now to arrange a viewing on this beautiful three bedroom penthouse apartment in Worcester City Centre, with canal & riverside walks on your doorstep, and a short walk to excellent shopping facilities, bars and restaurants. A must see."
"Situated in the ever popular Warndon Villages, this family home is truly stunning from top to bottom. The current owners have extended and lovingly created a spacious, well-proportioned home perfect for any family. The property offers a versatile arrangement, and comprises; lounge, di..."
"This charming cottage, is hidden away off Bransford Road having a boundary of trees keeping the plot private and secluded. The property is offered with no chain and provides parking for multiple vehicles whilst having ample possibility to create more with gardens surrounding it."
This four/five bedroom detached Prowting Home has been refurbished throughout by the current owners. The property is located in St Peters which is a short distance from both the City Centre and junction 7 of the M5. The accommodation consists of an entrance hall which gives access through to the...
This immaculate five bedroom detached family home exclusively comes to market with Connells located in the popular St. Peters area. Do not miss out on this fantastic opportunity!
OPEN DAY - SATURDAY 11TH & SUNDAY 12TH MARCH! CALL US TODAY TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT! READY TO MOVE IN AND INCLUDING CARPETS AND LIGHT FITTINGS
"A superb family home situated within an established residential area close to Worcester City centre. Gable End is approached by a sizable block paved hardstanding. There is dwarf brick walling to the edges of the driveway featuring raised beds of mature planting, trees and shrubbery providing a ..."
"RECENTLY REDUCED: VIEWING ESSENTIAL TO APPRECIATE THIS FABULOUS HOME.. Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings; A greatly improved and beautifully presented five bedroom detached family home situated in the much sought-after area of St Peters, Worcester. The well proportioned and ..."
"Boasting ample living and entertaining space, this home has been generously extended during the current families time here. Arranged over three spacious floors, with off road parking to the front and a well-sized south facing garden to the rear, homes don't get more family friendly than this. "
"This Kingham 4 bed detached home located on private drive is perfect for growing families. Let us help you move with up to £23,500 of incentives to use your way.*"
This Kingham 4 bed detached home designed with family in mind
"*UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET* Fantastic oppotunity to buy 4 bedroom detached bungalow with 2 bedroom annex and very large private garden with views of Malvern Hills. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 4 bedrooms with a further two in the annex al..."
"A well-presented four bedroom detached home with a one bedroom annexe offering both spacious and versatile living accommodation, generous sized rear garden and driveway offering ample off road parking situated within the popular residential area of Berkeley Heywood."
"The Property Centre are proud to present this five bedroom detached HMO in Warndon Villages with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Buyers will find entrance hall, kitchen, living room, one bedroom, utility room, conservatory and downstairs W.C. on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find a gal..."
(OPEN DAY - SATURDAY 28 JANUARY 2023) Please book a viewing to secure a time. This beautifully presented 4-bedroom detached home is situated in the sought-after location of Bevere. Upstairs boasts three spacious bedrooms and a fourth bedroom that can also be used as a study.  ...
CHAIN FREE - If you are looking for a large family home in a desirable location within walking distance to many local amenities then look no further...... 8 Brecknock Close is and has all of the above so come and take a look!
"WOW - CHECK OUT THE STUNNING KITCHEN / FAMILY ROOM ON THIS FANTASTIC PROPERTY *** A most impressive, well presented EXTENDED three bedroom traditional style DETACHED family home occupying an enviable cul-de-sac position. Situated in an incredibly sought after location this property briefly compri..."
"**AN ABSOLUTE MUST VIEW** A stunning 3 bedroom character property, being part of a former ""Victorian"" stable block , having been refurbished and beautifully appointed to a very high standard throughout.
There is so much to love about this property as the present vendors have created a wonderful l..."
"This beautifully appointed David Wilson home located on the fringes of a small development built in 2014 adjacent to the nature reserve, with good access to the M5 motorway and Worcestershire Royal Hospital. The house comprises of; entrance hall, living , kitchen/dining room, utility, study an..."
A delightful 1920’s four-bedroom semi-detached cottage that has been sympathetically renovated whilst keeping the traditional features. Located in the popular Worcestershire village of Hallow.
"A beautifully presented modern four bedroom detached family home, situated within easy reach of Worcester City centre and motorway links, as well as being ideally placed for the Worcestershire Parkway Railway Station. Accommodation briefly comprises: Open-plan Sitting Room/Kitchen/Dinin..."
"Finished to a high standard, with local schooling nearby in Whittington Primary School and Nunnery Wood High School, Romney Way is perfect for any growing family! The property briefly comprises; open-plan kitchen-dining-family room, downstairs cloakroom and internal access into a singl..."
"An immaculately presented, three bedroom detached bungalow situated within the highly desirable area of Bevere and nestled on a quiet cul-de-sac location. The property which is close to a range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Sitting/Dining Room, Kitchen, Conservatory, W/..."
"A 3/4 bedroom detached family home, situated in a quiet no through road within the popular Claines area of Worcester. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, downstairs Cloakroom, Living Room, Conservatory, open-plan Kitchen/Diner and Utility Room. On the first floor: Three Be..."
"Located within the charming Stables building with views towards the village entrance, this two double bedroom apartment features a flexible, open-plan kitchen/lounge/dining space that is ideal for entertaining. The master bedroom benefits from a bright private ensuite."
"The Corfe is a modern five-bedroom detached family home. There’s a stylish open-plan kitchen/family room, a well-proportioned living room, a separate dining room, a downstairs WC and a handy utility. Upstairs there are five bedrooms - bedroom one with an en suite - and a large family-sized bathroom."
"**AN ABSOLUTE MUST VIEW** A beautifully appointed and particularly spacious recently built 3 double bedroom detached family house with superb interiors and numerous upgrades, being located on a small and exclusive development on the edge of the sought after village of Fernhill Heath which has ex..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase this four bedroom detached family home situated at the end of a cul-de-sac in the popular location of Warndon Villages offering spacious and versatile living accommodation. Scope for modernisation and improvement. EPC - C. EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL. 
"A fantastic four bedroom detached property offering spacious accommodation within the Warndon Villages development, with easy access to M5, Worcestershire Parkway Station and the City. Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hall with French doors to Kitchen and understairs storage, W..."
"0.289 Acre Restaurant with Accommodation Above- Rental Income: £20,000 p.a till April 2028"
"This double fronted home has been taken care of by the current owners since the year it was built. During that time, they have kept the property in a truly immaculate condition, making it move in ready for any growing family looking to live in the sought after St Peters area. The home offers an i..."
"A beautifully presented and much improved four bedroom detached extended family home, situated in this quiet area of St. John's overlooking woodland. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, open-plan Kitchen/Dining Room with Garden Room off, Utility Room, Garage a..."
"Generously extended, and tucked away within a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after village of Fernhill Heath, this is a lovely family home. With off road parking, a garage, and a mature garden, this ticks every box for family living! Opening to the side into an entrance hall, the prop..."
"Situated set back from the Droitwich Road, this detached dormer bungalow with NO ONWARD CHAIN is a must view for anyone wanting to live in the ever popular village of Fernhill Heath. The property has been kept to a high standard throughout and is well proportioned, making it suitable for a range ..."
"A well-presented five bedroom executive detached home offering both spacious and versatile living accommodation, integral single garage, bloc paved driveway and generous sized rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Harley Warren."
"The Elmbridge is a stunning four-bedroom home with plenty of appeal. This home has a spacious living room with outside access as well as an open plan kitchen/breakfast room and a separate dining room with a large bay window. Upstairs are all four bedrooms, with bedroom one enjoying an en suite."
"Five bedroom detached property is available in Warndon Villages. The property offers buyers an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, dining room, utility room, five bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include downstairs W.C., en-suite, garage and garden. This ..."
"A detached building of three apartments being sold with the freehold located within walking distance of the restaurants and shops in Worcester City Centre whilst benefitting from easy access to J7 on the M5, this a property you need to view to appreciate all it has to offer. The proper..."
"This one off build has been in the same family since it was built, and is ideally nestled in the sought after location of Northwick, and is being offered with no onward chain. Offering a generous plot, with large front and rear gardens, and a detached double garage and ample off road parking, thi..."
"A fully renovated three/four bedroom period Townhouse tastefully blending traditional character features with contemporary fixtures and fittings and offering flexible City centre living within easy reach of local schooling, amenities and Worcester City centre. Accommodation briefly compr..."
"Shrubbery Avenue is a well-presented and deceptive period terrace property situated on a tree lined avenue within close proximity to the city centre, nearby train stations and local schooling. The property briefly comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, extended kitchen and d..."
Beautiful light and airy quirky former stables on the edge of Britannia square with secure off road parking and Grade II Listed
"An outstanding opportunity to purchase this detached property in a prime location. Compromising of 5 bedrooms, parking and a private garden. Occupying a corner plot in a cul de sac position."
"Book your appointment to find out how we can help you on your way into this double fronted 4 bed Trusdale home with up to £21,125 of incentives to use your way."
"This well presented and deceptively spacious one bedroom first floor apartment is located in Warndon and is an ideal First Time or investment purchase with an anticipated yield of circa 7%. The apartment consists of a hallway with under floor heating leading through to the kitchen, lounge, bedro..."
"No. 3 Bolton Avenue sits on a corner plot and comprises of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, spacious kitchen / diner, sunroom and W.C., on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find the master bedroom with en-suite and built-in wardrobes, second, third, fourth and fifth bedr..."
"This 4 bedroom Trusdale home with upgraded specification is suited to family life. Let us help you move with our Deposit Unlock scheme, with just a 5% deposit.*"
"An immaculately presented four bedroom modern detached family home situated within the highly desirable area of Norton and nestled on a quiet residential estate. The property which is well placed for access to the M5 and Worcester Parkway Station, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Downstairs W..."
"Please discuss Regional Variations with our sales consultants for more information  With overhanging eaves, traditional bay windows and a portico roofed entrance, the Stratford Lifestyle looks just like a normal three bedroom detached home, yet inside it couldn..."
"A three-storey, four-bedroom home, The Paris has everything you need. From a practical concealed laundry space in the kitchen-diner to fitted wardrobe in master bedroom – it’s a home for keeping you organised, driven, and ready for your day ahead.
 "
This deceptively spacious and well presented four bedroom detached home is set over three floors and has the added benefit of having a garage and two parking spaces. The accommodation consists of a dual aspect sitting room with French doors leading onto the rear garden. There is a dual aspect fi...
"Don't miss your chance to secure our ONLY Hillcott home at The Grove at Worcester, enjoying a corner position with GENEROUS PRIVATE DRIVEWAY parking!"
"Boasting a kitchen over 22ft in length, the Hillcott is an impressive new family home, built with energy efficiency in mind to help lower your energy bills!"
"The Bewdley is a four-bedroom, detached home with an open-plan kitchen/family room, separate living and dining rooms, a family room with French doors, a utility room and a downstairs WC. Upstairs, bedroom one is en-suite, three bedrooms share a family bathroom and there’s storage on the landing."
"Ready to move in this Spring, the Morris offers plentiful space, a luxurious master suite and impressive energy efficiency for lower energy bills."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a four bedroom detached bungalow in a sought after area, this is the first time the home has been brought to the market in over 20 years."
"The Huddington is a four-bedroom detached home with family-friendly living space. The living room and kitchen/breakfast room both have French doors leading out into the garden, and there’s a dining room and a utility room. There are four bedrooms and a family bathroom. Bedroom one has an en suite."
"A traditional extended semi detached family home offering superbly presented and spacious accommodation with a large private garden set back from the road in this popular and sought after residential area of Worcester. The location provides easy access to good local schooling, the city centre, na..."
"Brought from new, our current client choose this plot due to the non-restricted view over the greenery to the front, and the larger drive way accommodating parking for up to three cars along with the garage. The property has had numerous upgrades from downlighting to Smartlife Wifi Light Switches."
"A well presented family home which is situated close to Worcester Royal Hospital, local amenities and Worcester City Centre. The property has a hall, cloakroom, sitting room, dining kitchen, four bedrooms, en-suite and family bathroom. There are front and rear gardens, garage and carport."
"A modern detached family home offering immaculately presented, well proportioned accommodation situated in a quiet cul de sac location within this popular and sought after residential area. The location provides easy access to the city centre, national road and rail networks. The accommo..."
"A well proportioned four bedroom detached family home, situated in this quiet cul-de-sac location. Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hall, downstairs Cloakroom, Sitting Room, Kitchen, Dining Room and Conservatory. To the first floor: Master Bedroom with En-Suite, three furthe..."
"Situated on a sizable corner plot, this superb family home has been generously extended throughout the current owners time here, creating a versatile living arrangement suitable for a range of families. The property has the unique benefit of a TRIPLE garage, along with off road parking and well-s..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached bungalow situated on a fair sized plot within the popular village of Rushwick, further benefitting from no onward chain. Rushwick is a quiet describable village located West of Worcester offering easy access to the Worcester By..."
"***COMING SOON*** A four bedroom detached home offering open plan living accommodation, integral single garage and an enclosed rear garden situated within the desirable location of Lyppard Habington. Further details to follow..."
Chancellors Estate Agents are pleased to welcome this four bedroom detached property to the market. Along with a private garage and single detached garage with additional car parking space at the front of the property.
"This generous family home offers a versatile layout, perfect for growing families. Downstairs offers a great amount of space, that could lend itself to home workers well due to benefitting from a study. With a low maintenance garden, garage and off road parking, and close proximity to a range of ..."
"Apt 20 Astley is a stylish second floor, two-bedroom apartment boasting a balcony overlooking Battenhall House. Approached from a communal landing servicing just three other apartments, the front door opens into an L-shaped hallway."
"Located in a quiet cul-de-sac this three story home offers flexible living, whilst currently set up as four bedrooms, two bathrooms, a lounge, kitchen/diner and integrated garage, this property is definitely not short on space and can easily be adapted to suit the needs of the future buyer!"
"A contemporary two double bedroom apartment featuring an open plan kitchen/lounge/dining area, ideal for flexible modern living, with double doors opening onto the generous private balcony."
"**THE PERFECT FAMILY PROPERTY** A spacious and well presented 4 bedroom detached house with a HOME OFFICE , being situated in a quiet cul de sac within the highly sought after village of Rushwick which has an excellent CE primary school and is handily placed for the City of Worcester, Great Malv..."
"A modern detached family home built by Taylor Wimpey Homes - The Surrey design, offering immaculately presented well proportioned accommodation situated at the head of a quiet cul de sac location on the fringes of this popular and sought after development. The location provides easy access to the..."
"Take time to appreciate this fabulous 4 bedroom detached family home situated in the ever popular Warndon Villages region of Worcester. Enjoying excellent living and garden space the property is ideally situated for access to local supermarkets, the M5 and Worcester Royal Hospital."
"WOW EWEmove NO CHAIN , one owner since new! Immaculate 4 bedroom detached in a quiet cul de sac, located in the centre of St. Peter's. With additional hexagonal conservatory and a blocked paved driveway, the mature well maintained gardens presents a fabulous frame for this ideal family forever home."
"A very well presented and much improved four bedroom detached family home, situated offering flexible living accommodation within this popular Warndon Villages location. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, downstairs W.C., Home Office/Snug, modern open plan Kitchen into Dining Ro..."
This Kingdale 3 bedroom home located on corner plot with detached garage is built for family life. Let us help you move with a tailored incentive package.*
"*HMO INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * ATTRACTIVE RENTAL YIELD* Oakmans offer a fantastic HMO investment opportunity with this six bedroom property located on the popular Hawkwood Crescent, Worcester. The property is currently let to sharers at an attractive rental amount and is ideall..."
CASH BUYERS ONLY - Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a unique opportunity to acquire a five bedroom detached bungalow occupying a most generous plot situated in the ever popular village of Norton. The property is an exciting renovation opportunity with the property requiring exte...
"A great size six bedroom mid-terrace HMO, fully let to professionals at £31,680 PA . Fully licensed and within a prime rental location being moments from Worcester City Centre, boasting an HMO License for 7 Occupants, great sized bedrooms and scope to improve. EPC C"
"Possible gross income of over £33,500 per annum. Fantastic opportunity to purchase a six bedroom HMO property located within the popular area of WR5. The Property Centre are pleased to bring to the market this fantastic opportunity for investment over three floors. "
"Immaculately renovated, the current owner of this spacious home has reconfigured the layout, creating space in all the right places for families wanting to live in the sought after village of Fernhill Heath. The property is perfectly tucked away off Fir Tree Road, creating an incredibly generous ..."
"Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market an extended four bedroom detached family home that invites cosmetic improvements throughout whilst offering versatile and generous accommodation. Situated in a highly desirable location South of the City centre this property offers parking, garag..."
Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a traditional detached family home situated North of Worcester and occupying a most generous plot with a substantial garden to the rear. The extended accommodation invites cosmetic improvements throughout whilst providing versatile living space t...
"**CHAINFREE** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*** This four bedroom home with a separate two bedroom annex is conveniently placed and located centrally to the popular St Johns district of Worcester. The house offers accommodation over three floors including a spacious double aspect reception, fitted breakf..."
"Immaculate and well maintained four bedroom spacious family home located in the popular area of St Johns with private driveway for upto three vehicles and garage. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, downstairs WC, laundry room, dining room, lounge, open plan kitchen/living/di..."
"The current owner has refurbished this deceptive 4-bed-detached home on Hallow Road to provide a bespoke spacious kitchen area and living/dining space. Excellent catchment area for schools, easy access into town, river walks, and close to all local amenities. Viewing is highly recommended. We fee..."
"A well-presented four bedroom detached home offering spacious and versatile living accommodation, single garage, driveway and generous sized rear garden situated within the popular residential location of Berkeley Pendesham. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"This four bedroom detached Bryant Victoria home is located in a cul-de-sac position in the Berkeley Beverborne area of Warndon Villages. The property consists of an entrance hall which leads through to the WC, lounge, dining room and kitchen. The lounge has a bay window and feature fireplace. Th..."
"The Clayton Corner features an open-plan kitchen diner and impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden, a utility room, WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs you'll find three bedrooms, including a large en suite bedroom one, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
"***Offered with no chain*** Situated in the popular location of St Johns is this four bedroom semi-detached family home with a separate two bedroom apartment. The ground floor comprises, entrance hallway, fitted modern kitchen, lounge with French doors leading to a balcony overlooking..."
"This beautiful semi detached cottage needs to be seen to be appreciated, surrounded by nature this property offers buyers a study area, living room, dining room, kitchen, family bathroom and two great size bedrooms. Further benefits of the property include a downstairs toilet, conserva..."
"This deceptively spacious four bedroom detached family home is located in a cul-de-sac position in Battenhall and offered with no onward chain. The property is located within a mile of the City Centre, therefore offering easy access to the train station and shopping facilities. It is also only a..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautiful riverside period home located in the popular Barbourne area with spectacular views. It benefits from being next to Gheluvelt Park which leads on to Worcester Race Course and gorgeous scenic walks along the river into town. The property has t...
"** ONLY PLOTS 1,3,4 & 5 LEFT ** This unique and striking development is in the heart of the city surrounded by fantastic bars and restaurants, and on the same road as Worcester Foregate Street Station. Arden Estates are delighted to bring these exclusive and sop..."
"Join us for the Property Launch event on Saturday 4th March 2023 - call now to secure your viewing slot! Introducing a stunning 4 bedroom house located in the desirable area of north Worcester, perfect for a growing family."
"A highly impressive and spacious, three bedroom detached family home situated within the highly desirable area of Northwick. The property which is close to excellent schools and range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Open Plan Sitting/Dining Room, Kitchen/Breakfast Room &a..."
"A beautifully presented four bedroom detached home offering both spacious and versatile living accommodation, bloc paved driveway providing off road parking and enclosed rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Lyppard Woodgreen."
Recently renovated and spacious family home in the lovely Fernhill Heath with NO CHAIN!
"Tucked away down a private driveway, on the already quieter end of Grosmont Avenue, this detached family home is situated on one of the larger plots in the area, offering a fantastic home for any growing family. Opening into a spacious hallway, the property then briefly comprises; kit..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this Four bedroom spacious family home located in the popular area of St Johns with private driveway for up-to 4 vehicles and garage. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, downstairs WC, lounge, o..."
Period family home in popular Battenhall. Big bright and light rooms. Needs some love and updating. Sunny rear garden
A very spacious and well maintained four bedroom detached family home. This home is approx. 8 yrs old and was built by persimmon. Located just on the outskirts of St Johns being close to the Worcester Golf and Country Club as well as the outskirts of the countryside. The property ben...
"This property comprises of porch, entrance hall, office, kitchen, utility room, lounge / diner, fifth bedroom and W.C., on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find a galleried landing with doors leading off to the master bedroom with en-suite, three further bedrooms and the f..."
"A delightful three bedroom home with an integrated garage, designed to appeal to young families and couples. Let us help you move with Easymover scheme*"
"A delightful three bedroom home with an integrated garage, designed to appeal to young families and couples."
"This CHAIN FREE property comprises of entrance hall, lounge with feature bay window, dining room, kitchen, utility room and downstairs W.C. On the first floor you will find a galleried landing, master bedroom with large en-suite, second bedroom, third bedroom and fourth bedroom along w..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Situated in the heart of the popular semi-rural village of Callow End and with easy access to Malvern and Worcester and national road and rail links, is this three bedroom detached bungalow with off road parking for several vehicles."
"This month of love we are devoted… to discounts!
We’re feeling full of fondness this February, so we want to spread the love with huge discounts on our stunning new build homes.
You can now save up to £18,"
"The Edwena, three bedroom home is versatile and stylish, perfect for welcoming friends and family. The open-plan kitchen, dining, and living room provide a sociable space to entertain or unwind. Floor-to-ceiling windows flood the home with light, giving it a spacious and airy feel."
"Extended traditional semi detached family home in the popular location of St Johns, walking distance to Pitmaston Primary & Christopher Whitehead Language College and Sixth Form. Call now to arrange a viewing."
"The Lawrence boasts 3 double bedrooms, a well sized open plan kitchen and a desirable GARAGE with driveway parking. Simply get in touch to get moving this summer."
"Philip Laney and Jolly Worcester are delighted to offer a wonderfully presented and appointed GROUND FLOOR apartment with a superb outlook over to the river Severn, Malvern hills and the developments shared gardens with a spacious balcony providing outdoor space. This larger than average two..."
"This beautiful, detached property offers buyers a large entrance hall, living room with patio doors leading onto the garden, separate dining room, kitchen, downstairs w.c., four bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include off street parking, garage to the left of the prope..."
"A well proportioned detached character property situated in a convenient location within St Johns. Large rear gardens, garage and driveway. Scope for modernisation. NO ONWARD CHAIN> EPC - D. "
A luxury top floor duplex Penthouse Apartment in a central location with views over the canal reaching to the Cathedral. This home is coming to the market chain free and is in immaculate condition.
"A particularly well presented, modern style three bedroom detached family home situated within the highly desirable area of St Peters and nestled on an impressive corner plot in a quiet cul-de-sac location. The property which is close to good schools and a range of local amenities, briefly com..."
"Exquisite lifestyle village home in prime location with oodles of character, ample parking and a large well stocked garden"
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached house, situated within this sought after area, offering excellent local schooling, amenities, easy access to Worcester City and major transport links. Accommodation briefly comprising: large Sitting Room with open fire, Dining Area with doors..."
"A generous three bedroom semi detached which has been refurbished and benefits from a large home office in the South facing rear garden. Freshly painted and ready to move into, this lovely family home offers great potential for further extensions (subject to planning permission). Family k..."
"A superb three bedroom semi-detached period home boasting secure off-road parking, a delightful rear garden, bay fronted lounge, utility, downstairs WC, family bathroom and an additional shower room. EPC E"
A light and airy three bedroom detached family home situated in the heart of Warndon Villages. Close to the M5 Jct 6 as well as Worcester Royal Hospital and Supermarkets. There are several bus routes that go into the city as well as several walking routes. The current owners have looked a...
"This 3 bed new Byford home features over £4,000 worth of upgrades included and £12,000 mortgage contribution*. Book your appointment to discover more."
"Situated in the sought after area of Northwick offering excellent local schooling, easy access to Worcester City and major transport links. 2 The Drive offers superb space and potential, ideal as a family home within easy reach of local amenities and briefly comprising: Entrance Hall wi..."
"Benefiting from a stunning well maintained mature laid to lawn rear garden, this highly charming semi-detached three bedroom family home is situated within the highly desirable area of Northwick and nestled on a quiet residential estate. Close to Northwick playing fields, 'The Slip' ..."
"A highly charming four bedroom semi-detached family home situated within the highly desirable area of Kempsey. The property which is close to local amenities, briefly comprises; Porch, Entrance Hall, Sitting/Dining Room, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Utility & Downstairs W/C. On the First Floor;..."
"Nestled on a quiet idyllic cul-de-sac location, this gorgeous modern three bedroom detached family home is situated within the highly desirable area of St Peters, close to a range of local amenities. The property features a stunning modern fitted kitchen/dining room and boasts a flexible outsi..."
Take a look at this fantastic 3 double bedroom semi detached home situated within the popular Fernhill Heath area of Worcestershire. Benefitting from a great garden space and conservatory the property is beautifully presented throughout and offers driveway parking and garage.
"A four bedroom end-terraced home, in the popular St. Johns area. The property briefly comprises; Entrance hall, w/c, living room, kitchen and conservatory. On the first floor; four bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property further benefits from off road parking and a private rear garden."
"A stunning and refurbished family home which has been finished to a high standard. This traditional home has been lovingly looked after, and briefly comprises; lounge, kitchen/diner, w/c, three bedrooms and bathroom. Located in the popular Battenhall location, close to Waitrose, Clos..."
"A beautifully maintained modern home which must be viewed to appreciate the condition throughout. The accommodation comprises of; hallway, sitting room, WC, kitchen/diner and utility room. The first floor offers three double bedrooms with ensuite to bedroom one and family bathroom. Outside the..."
"Balanced inside and out, this three-bedroom home is the perfect combination of modern and practical living. The Kea features an open-plan kitchen-diner with French patio doors and soft closing cupboards as standard. A spacious reception hallway guides you upstairs where three spacious bedro"
"Book your appointment to find out how our Easymover scheme could help you with your move into this double fronted Easedale detached home, designed with growing families in mind."
"Boasting a desirable GARAGE, FLOORING fitted throughout, and a £7k CASHBACK OFFER, the Makenzie is ready to move in this Spring!"
"PHASE ONE IS RELEASED. Three luxury two bedroom penthouse apartments with panoramic views. This unique and striking development is in the heart of the city surrounded by fantastic bars and restaurants, and on the same road as Worcester Foregate Street Station. Arden Estates a..."
"This freehold property must be seen to appreciate the space on offer. From the entrance hallway you will find the kitchen, downstairs W.C., large lounge and enclosed courtyard garden that leads out onto the two allocated parking spaces within the gated communal car park. On the first ..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after area of Northwick. The bungalow is in need of modernisation which makes this perfect for putting your own stamp on. it has a great South facing garden which offers good privacy. The bungalow benefits the ...
"With an open-plan kitchen leading out to the garden, the Byford makes an ideal home for growing families. Let us help you move with £15,000 Key worker discount.*"
Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a most wonderful family home that has been updated throughout by the current owners to an exceptional standard. This superb Victorian home that is presented over three floors with the addition of a cellar provides such versatile and spacious acco...
"***COMING SOON*** A three bedroom detached home with two reception rooms, single garage, driveway and enclosed rear garden situated in Lyppard Hanford. FURTHER DETAILS TO FOLLOW..."
"A family home situated in the popular area of Warndon Villages, which gives access to local amenities, transport links, schools and Worcester City Centre."
"At 1 Grove Cottages, every corner contains character and charm. With ample storage, a multi car driveway, large garden, four bedrooms and a flexible downstairs layout!"
"A well-presented three bedroom detached home offering two reception rooms, driveway providing off road parking, single garage and enclosed rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Lyppard Kettleby."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire an extended three bedroom semi-detached home, with great potential. The home is situated down a quiet cul-de-sac, within a popular location and is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"This deceptively spacious well planned and finished family home b enefiting from off road parking and offers ample flexible space, which has been updated throughout to create a welcoming family home, within walking distance of Worcester City, all its amenities, schooling and further major transp..."
"A much improved and very well presented four bedroom Townhouse, situated within the popular Diglis development of Worcester. Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hallway, storage cupboard, downstairs W.C., large Kitchen Diner with refitted Kitchen, Bedroom 4/Study. To the first f..."
"An immaculately presented two bedroom modern style bungalow situated within the highly desirable area of Fernhill Heath and nestled on an impressive corner plot at the end of a quiet no through road. The property which is close to a range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, M..."
"**AN ABSOLUTE MUST VIEW** A beautifully presented and much improved 2 double bedroom detached bungalow with a Conservatory, Garage and a delightful private enclosed rear garden , being situated in a quiet and popular cul de sac within a sought after residential area close to excellent local ameni..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home offering both modern and contemporary living accommodation, converted garage, bloc paved driveway providing off road parking and enclosed low maintenance garden situated within a popular residential area within Worcester."
"With no onward chain, and tucked away down a quiet cul-de-sac, Wiberforce Place is a must see for anyone wanting to move to Warndon Villages. The home offers a new family the chance to put their own stamp on a well proportioned space, with private garden and detached garage. The home ..."
"This detached 3 bedroom home designed for modern living, includes a breakfast kitchen and spacious living/dining room with French doors to the rear garden. Let us help you move with 5% deposit contribution.*"
SHOWHOMES LAUNCHING 25th MARCH 2023! Become one of our first homeowners at Elgar Park with the energy efficient new Lyttelton home for sale.
Book your viewing today! The Makenzie is ready this Spring with upgrades including and our new CASHBACK OFFER!
"An apartment in Diglis with a rare river view. Upgraded finish and is in anexcellent condition. eautiful and spacious, two double bedroom, ground floor apartment with an undisturbed view looking out over to the river. Situated in Diglis Basin, close to the city centre, the cosmopolit..."
"A stunning three bedroom semi detached family home presented to an excellent standard, situated in the sought after Bevere area. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, open plan Kitchen/Diner with utility cupboard off and Sitting Room. On the first floor: Three Bedrooms and a Family..."
"A fantastic home in this semi rural location with stunning bi-folds onto its south facing garden, benefitting from its access to the M5 motorway and sitting on the outskirts of Worcester"
"A rare opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi detached family home, enjoying a generous plot and further benefiting from a building plot with Planning Permission granted for a further detached three bedroom dwelling (Planning No: 20/00512/FUL), as well as further outbuilding separated into ..."
"This detached Bryant built three bedroom property is conveniently located within the Wall Meadow development of Warndon Village's close to popular local schools also providing excellent access to the M5 motorway as well as good links to the city centre. The property comprises; hallway, sitting..."
"An immaculately presented and extended semi-detached family home, situated at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac within a desirable location."
"Bungalows in the sought after location of Warndon Villages are incredibly rare to market, so will always be popular, particularly when they are done to an immaculate standard like this. The current owners have made the most of the plot, with the addition of a front porch and sizeable conservatory..."
"A beautifully presented period end of terrace property which boasts an enviable position within the Barbourne area and provides generous accommodation throughout. The accommodation comprises, vestibule, hallway, open plan sitting room/diner and breakfast kitchen. The lower ground offers a two ..."
"SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION 28 MARCH, 2023 AT 7PM. Platinum Edged FREEHOLD investment opportunity let on a 20 year lease from 1 July 2020 with an initial passing rent of £30,000 per annum with 5 yearly reviews. A semi-detached convenience store plus self-contained flat. Shop Energy Rating:..."
"An opportunity to acquire this beautiful penthouse apartment situated in the sought after, water side location of Diglis, Worcester. The Apartment is within easy reach of Worcester City and all its amenities, together with local riverside walks and cafes, together with ease of access to major tra..."
"Spacious three bedroom semi detached family home with scope for further development, situated in a quiet and convenient location within the popular area of St Johns. The Property briefly comprises entrance hall, living room, kitchen/diner, utility room, downstairs WC, three bedrooms, r..."
"Meticulously presented link-detached home in popular location, tucked away yet close to all the cities amenities"
"Nestled on in a quiet idyllic spot with picturesque views of the River Severn, this two bedroom Victorian semi-detached family home is situated within the highly desirable area of Barbourne. The property is in immaculate condition throughout and the current vendors have finished it to a high s..."
This superb new home offers a spacious open plan layout with a stunning Symphony kitchen that you can personalise from our range when you reserve early.
"This four bedroom detached house poses an outstanding opportunity to convert into a family home. Situated in a popular part of Powick, this property consists of a driveway space for multiple vehicles, two receptions rooms and rear garden."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a recently improved three bedroom semi-detached family home in the very popular area of St Johns. The property is conveniently located within a minutes’ walk of a Tesco Express, Fish & Chip shop and other useful amenities. There is also a reg..."
"Discover our HOME OF THE WEEK, now offering FLOORING THROUGHOUT from our impressive range for a limited time only!"
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a four bedroom townhouse located in a very popular area which allows ease of access to St Johns and all of it's useful amenities. The property in brief is a modern three-storey townhouse; The Leicester is a four bedroom home ideal for families. It feat...
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the very popular village of Rushwick. The property in brief comprises entrance hall, large lounge, conservatory, kitchen, utility room and three bedrooms and family bathroom. There is ample park..."
"Situated on the first floor of the grand main building with its excellent communal facilities, this one bedroom apartment features an open plan kitchen/dining space leading to the lounge which forms a wonderfully fluid space with views towards the beautifully refurbished stables."
"This spacious property comprises of a porch, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen / diner, utility room, where the property has been extended it offers a playroom, downstairs bathroom and fourth bedroom on the ground floor. There are multiple ways you could use the space to suit your needs. "
"A modern and beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached family home built by the popular Bloor Homes, situated to the West of Worcester City. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Kitchen/Diner, Utility Area, Living Room and downstairs Cloakroom. On the first floor: M..."
"Take time to appreciate this fantastic 3 bedroom home situated in the ever popular Warndon Villages area of Worcester - Enjoying excellent access to local, shops, retails parks and the M5. The property also benefits from a generous garden, family room, conservatory and off road parking."
"The Property Centre are proud to present this modern three bedroom semi-detached property that comprises of entrance hall, spacious lounge, inner hallway, open-plan kitchen / diner, W.C., and under stairs storage cupboard on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find the master..."
Only four years old this home in move-in-ready and our clients are upsizing to a new build which will be end of chain. Our clients paid for multiple upgrades when purchasing to ensure the properties potential was maximised.
"Immaculate, luxurious, stylish and astonishing extended home in a leafy cul-de-sac North Worcester City setting. You may be intrigued by the exteriors but wait until you go inside. Fabulous! I can't wait to show you over!"
"A traditional style three bedroom semi detached family home, enjoying a generous plot and situated in a popular North Worcester location. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, Dining Room, Kitchen and downstairs Cloakroom. On the first floor: Three Bedrooms and..."
"Large Four Bedroom Family Home located in the popular area of St Johns, just a short walk from all of its useful amenities and within a 20 minute walk of Worcester City Centre. In brief the property comprises entrance hall with doors to both the lounge and kitchen with stairs leading t..."
"A small development, unlike any other, Charter Place has always been highly desirable due to its perfect tucked away location within Worcester City Centre. Situated down a private road, with resident only parking, the development is made up of exclusive townhouses, perfect for city centre living ..."
"This spacious semi detached property offers buyers a entrance hall, living room, dining room, kitchen, three great size bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include a generous corner plot, a large enclosed rear garden and a separate garage. The property is ideall..."
"Tudor Cottage in Fish Street Worcester is an historic Grade11 listed three double bedroom property, full of character and charm, in the heart of Worcester City Centre."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a Duplex Penthouse Apartment, situated in the heart of Worcester City with spectacular views of Worcester Cathedral. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall with useful storage cupboard, large refitted Kitchen/Dining Area and Master Bedroom with re-f..."
"A traditional and extended three bedroom family home. This home has a lovely feel throughout and although requires some modernisation its been well looked after. The property briefly comprises; lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and shower room. The property benefits from rear south ..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom property offers buyers a large entrance hall, dining room, kitchen including a integrated fridge dishwasher and washing machine and also a double oven, living room, two bathrooms and three bedrooms. Further benefits include off street parking, a..."
"***COMING SOON*** A three bedroom detached home offering both spacious and versatile living accommodation, single garage and enclosed rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Wall Meadow. Further details to follow..."
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this spacious detached family home to the North of Worcester.
"A viewing is highly recommended to appreciate this wonderful home which boasts well presented and generous accommodation throughout. This accommodation comprises; hallway, sitting room, dining room, refitted and extended breakfast kitchen & cellar. The first floor provides three ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to a acquire an attractive Victorian terraced character home across three floors, with a cellar conversion. The property is located within a convenient location within walking distance of the city centre, with great access to transport links."
"This immaculately presented two bedroom apartment is finished to a high specification and offers stunning views towards the Malvern Hills. The property is a perfect opportunity for first time buyers and investors alike,the property comes with a long lease and low service charges."
"Extended, and beautifully improved throughout, this cosy family home offers a homely feel, and is ready for the next family to enjoy it. Situated on a well sized plot, with ample off road parking to the front, and a generous garden to the rear, this home offers a fantastic amount of space for any..."
"A modern well presented three bedroom link detached family home, situated in the popular Norton area. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, downstairs Cloakroom, Living Room, Kitchen/Breakfast Room and Conservatory. On the first floor: Three Bedrooms and Family Bathroom. "
"A viewing is advised to appreciate the accommodation on offer having been recently refurbished with a new kitchen, bathroom, electrics, heating and floor coverings. The property comprises of; hallway, sitting room, dining room, extended kitchen and WC/utility. To the first floor there are thre..."
"Our client was drawn to the property in question due to the generous sized garden and modern facilities, whilst now it is time our clients move on, they have no doubt the next home owners will enjoy the property as much as they have."
"Bilford Road is a traditional semi detached bungalow offering well proportioned & well maintained accommodation, the property offers further scope for some updating/modernisation. Located in a popular and sought after residential area of Worcester, the location provides easy access to the city ce..."
"The Property Centre are proud to present this immaculate three bedroom semi-detached property in the desirable area of Whittington with an asking price of Offers Over £300,000. Buyers will find an entrance hall, spacious lounge, open-plan kitchen / diner, separate utility room, ..."
"A beautifully presented family home ideally located within Northwick. This extended and improved property has been updated throughout. The stylish accommodation within comprises generously sized rooms including two reception rooms, a kitchen, a conservatory and a guest cloakroom on the ground fl..."
Positioned in the popular Northwick neighborhood in the North of Worcester is this perfect three-bedroom semi-detached family home. This exquisite family home offers exceptional proportions and an elegant finish throughout. The property offers ample space to grow into and comes complete with a pr...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented, modern home, located in the highly sought after area of Woodland Edge and looks out onto the green"
"A spacious link detached family home, situated in a prime location within the ever popular WR3. Positioned to the north of the city, the property has a variety of superb schools to choose from, along with excellent transport links both in and out of the city. The property briefly comp..."
"A very well maintained four-bedroom semi-detached property that would make a fantastic family home, located in the very popular area of Lower Wick. In brief, the property comprises entrance hall, kitchen/breakfast room, extended living room, conservatory, garage, storage room, four bed..."
"Take the time to appreciate this fantastic 3 bedroom home situated in the highly sought after Fernhill Heath area - Further accommodation include a lounge/diner, extended kitchen area, bathroom and en suite. The property also benefits from driveway parking and an enclosed rear garden."
"A three bedroom semi detached property sitting within a generous corner plot along with an attached single Garage, situated in the popular St. Peter's area of Worcester. Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, open-plan Kitchen/Diner and Conservatory. To the firs..."
"This stunning property has been totally refurbished by the current sellers, as well as extended. The home has a loft conversion, as well as a spacious summer house which is currently being used as a home gym."
"A semi-detached property situated within the ever-popular Northwick district of Worcester. This lovely home has versatile accommodation within, including a living room, a kitchen dining room, a conservatory/utility room, a cloakroom and a double bedroom on the ground floor, which could easily be..."
"We are pleased to offer a three bedroom extended semi detached property with garage and parking. The property offers hallway, spacious lounge diner, extended kitchen, convservatory and W.C. To the first floor the property has three bedrooms and family bathroom. Furthe..."
"Motivated vendors, a new price and a beautiful feature on the doorstep. Take a look at all 7 Lavinia Close has to offer!"
"Take the time to appreciate this modern semi detached home. Offering fantastic open plan living the property also benefits from 3 bedrooms, a family bathroom and en suite to the master. Situated in this popular residential area the property enjoys allocated parking and pleasant rear garden space."
"An extended and improved three bedroom semi detached house, situated overlooking pleasant green space in the heart of St. Peter's. The property has excellent access to local schooling, amenities and major transport links, to include Junction 7 of the M5 motorway and Worcester Parkway Railway Sta..."
"Apt 23 Astley is a stylish second floor, one bedroom apartment boasting an enclosed glass fronted balcony benefitting from a south easterly aspect. Approached from a communal landing servicing just three other apartments, the front door opens into a spacious hallway."
"This stylish first floor, one bedroom apartment boasting an enclosed glass fronted balcony benefitting from a south easterly aspect. Approached from a communal landing servicing just three other apartments, the front door opens into a spacious hallway."
"Magnificent Retirement Home in this glorious setting: Apt 14 Astley is a stylish first floor, one bedroom apartment boasting an enclosed glass fronted balcony benefitting from a south easterly aspect. Elegant communal areas, including lounge, library, restaurant, gym, bar, salon and craft room"
" Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings; Wall House & Gate House are a pair of FIVE-bedroom, TWO-bathroom HMOs situated in the heart of Worcester City Centre. The properties are accessed from The Butts via a security pedestrian gate operated for the phone systems within the pro..."
"A three bedroom mews style property situated in the highly sought after Barbourne area, ideally placed for access back to Worcester City centre, to Gheluvelt Park and Worcester Racecourse. Accommodation comprises: Entrance Hall, W.C., Kitchen and Living Room. On the first floor: Two Bed..."
"*EXTRA SPECIAL* One of only two, new apartments located on the ground floor with two large double bedrooms, open plan living room, dining area, fully-fitted contemporary kitchen with quartz worktops, ..."
"'22 Woodbridge Close' is situated within easy reach of Worcester City, all its amenities, bus routes and major transport links, lying within this quiet and sought after area. There is also local schooling and pleasant walks close by with the property occupying a good size plot in an elevated pos..."
"Situated within the desirable area of Powick and nestled on quiet idyllic cul-de-sac location, this extended charming three bedroom semi-detached family home boasts a garage, gorgeous wrap around laid to lawn garden areas and two light & airy reception rooms. The property is close to a ran..."
"A three bedroom detached bungalow, within a quiet and convenient location. The property compromises entrance hall, living room, three bedrooms, bathroom and kitchen/diner. The property further benefits from off road parking and a garage, as well as a mature rear garden."
"A two bedroom semi detached Bungalow, situated along a quiet road within the sought after Bevere area of Worcester. Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hall (with hatch to loft with ladder), Kitchen, Living Room, Conservatory, two Bedrooms and Shower Room. Outside: Priv..."
"Investment Opportunity - Ground Floor Shop + 2 x One Bedroom Self Contained Flats above - Fully let - Generating Rental Income of  £20,400 p.a."
"Discover this 2 bedroom Ashenford home, offering open plan living perfect for individuals and couples alike. Let us help you move with a tailored incentive package."
"Book your appointment to discover this 2 bedroom Ashenford home, offering open plan living perfect for individuals and couples alike."
"Offering an abundence of potential, this large family home is perfectly situated in the sought after Battenhall area. The property is sat on a superb plot, with large frontage and private garden, so offers the scope to extend in a variety of ways too. With no onward chain, opportunities such as t..."
"The Property Centre are proud to present 7 Bomford Hill that comprises of entrance hall, large lounge, dining room, and kitchen on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find the main bedroom with en-suite, second bedroom, third bedroom and family bathroom as well as an airing c..."
"This traditional semi-detached property offers spacious and extended living accommodation with three bedrooms to the first floor and on the ground floor a sizeable kitchen/diner/family room, sitting room and WC. The house boasts enviable views from the front with enclosed front and rear garden..."
"Superbly presented, good as new home is perfect for First Time Buyers, Smaller Family's & Investors"
"Opportunity to acquire a property with development opportunity for an ANEX. Situated on a corner plot in a prime location. Main house has three bedrooms, bathroom, lounge, kitchen and conservatory."
"**A REAL MUST VIEW PROPERTY** Positioned within a cul de sac location and with a host of excellent amenities on the doorstep, as well as having good access to the city centre and the M5 motorway. This three bedroom link detached house is offered for sale with no onward chain. The accommodation..."
"A delightful three bedroom end of terrace home in the popular Warndon Villages. Easy access to the M5 motorway network, retail parks and industrial estates. EPC- D."
A spacious three bedroom semi detached house located in a convenient and popular location. Private and enclosed rear gardens. VIEWING ESSENTIAL. EPC - D
"A three bedroom semi detached family home, situated in the popular area of Claines, offering further potential to extended (if required). Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room and open-plan Kitchen/Diner with pantry. On the first floor: Three Bedrooms and Shower..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this fabulous semi-detached property that is situated to the North of the City of Worcester in the popular area of Claines. Located North of Worcester, the property provides easy access to Worcester City Centre, Droitwich Spa and is well placed for motorway links (ju..."
"A beautifully presented fully refurbished three bedroom end of terrace home offering both modern and contemporary living. Set within a corner plot the property offers ample off road parking, annexe/home office with shower room, generous sized side and rear gardens and detached double garage"
This property has been a much loved home for close to 60 years and has been clearly cared for with an up-to-date boiler and double glazing. It is now time for a new family to adopt this property and turn it into their own home!
"An opportunity to purchase a traditional Victorian semi detached family home which has been well looked after, situated on Victoria Avenue. Close to city centre, Waitrose, Countryside centre and good school catchments. The property in brief comprises; lounge, dining room, kitchen, conserv..."
"Done to a truly immaculate standard throughout, the current owners of this home have created an incredible space, perfect for a variety of buyers. The property is nestled within the 'village within the city', St Johns, and offers an abundance of space along with a charming landscaped garden. "
"Accommodation comprises; A reception area with ample built-in storage, leading to the downstairs bathroom and attached garage. Open plan lounge/dining room with patio-style doors leading to garden. Modern style kitchen with UPVC door to the rear, initially onto a paved patio area. Also benefittin..."
Our clients have transformed this home to create 3 DOUBLE bedrooms by converting the loft from what-was the 'box' room into a generous size room an en-suite.Our clients favourite bit of their home is the large garden which was unexpected due to the convenient location in close proximity to amenities
"Situated in the ever popular postcode of WR3, this stunning home offers a great space for a variety of buyers. This home benefits from a loft conversion, ideal as a third bedroom. Further benefitting from a spacious garden and off road parking, this home would be ideal for a family, or first time..."
"**NO CHAIN** The Property Centre are pleased to bring to the market this spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home located in a quiet residential road in the popular area of St Johns. The property briefly comprise living area, kitchen, three bedrooms, family bathroom..."
This well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated on a generous private plot and offers further potential to extend subject to the relevant permissions. The property has a rear outlook across too Laugherne Brook Nature Reserve. The accommodation consists of a entrance porch ...
"Immaculate three bedroom semi detached family home located in the very popular area of Lower Wick. We highly recommend an internal inspection in order to appreciate the position and condition of this lovely home. To the ground floor there are two spacious receptions rooms, a..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A spacious 4 bedroom detached family house on a popular residential development close to local schools and all amenities having an En Bloc Garage, Southerly Facing Rear Garden and Off Road Parking.
The accommodation comprises reception hall, study/office, large lounge/dining r..."
"An immaculately presented, refurbished two bedroom second floor Apartment, situated in the sought after Diglis area of Worcester, offering well planned and good size accommodation, with a balcony and views over Diglis Basin. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall with storage cupboard ..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom traditional style mid terraced family home, situated in a popular area to the west of Worcester City. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, Dining Room, Kitchen and Utility Room. On the first floor: Three Bedrooms and a Family Bat..."
"A well maintained and extended three bedroom semi detached family home, offering further scope to improve if required, situated in the sought after St. John's area of Worcester, benefiting from off road parking and within school catchment for Chantry High School. Accommodation briefly co..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a fully licensed HMO (House of Multiple Occupation) properties with five rooms in total. The property is being offered with no onward chain. The property is listed. Service Charge is £100 pcm. 999 Year Lease.  *Also ...
Fantastic opportunity for a centrally located and beautiful period property!
"This traditional semi-detached home in the sought after WR3 area really must be viewed. The property comprises; Living room, dining room, sseparatekitchen, utility and w/c, three bedrooms and a bathroom on the first floor.The property is situated on a quiet no through road, offering peaceful living."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A beautifully presented, South-facing, two-bedroom apartment on the first floor with new carpets and decoration throughout."
"Situated on the ever popular Victoria Street, just a stones throw away from the beautiful Gheluvelt Park and a range of useful amenities, this extended family home offers a great opportunity for families of all shapes and sizes. Opening into an entrance porch, the property then briefl..."
"Eastbank Court is a very desirable complex of assisted living apartments that benefits from having Lift access to all levels, lounge, Elgar's Restaurant and Bar, Garden room and Conservatory, Hairdressing salon, treatment room, Library and a Hobbies room."
"The Property Centre are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom mid-terrace family home, located in a quiet residential road in the popular area of St Johns. The property briefly comprises lounge, dinning room, kitchen, three bedrooms, family bathroom. Further bene..."
"Benefitting from no onward chain, this home is situated on a desirable Close in St Johns and sits on a well-sized plot with spacious garden and off road parking. The property offers heaps of potential and must viewed to appreciate it's deceptive size. The property opens up through a s..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home situated within the highly desirable and sought after location of Lower Wick tucked away on quiet residential cul-de-sac overlooking a well maintained open green space. The property offers good access to schools, local amenities and public ..."
"Save over £2,600 a year on your energy bills with a new home, just like the stylish Drake for sale at Elgar Park!"
"Welcome to this beautiful three-bedroom end of terrace house, situated in the sought-after area of Warndon Villages in Worcester. This well-presented property is sure to impress with its many attractive features and convenient location."
"Situated on London Road, lies this delightful three bedroom house with period features situated close to the City of Worcester which offers many retail, leisure and hospitality amenities Worcester has to offer, as well as local amenities and public transport. Set over three floors, th..."
Looking for your first home? Stop! You've found it! The Drake is a stylish new home ready for you to make your own by personalising options and upgrades from our range!
"An opportunity to acquire a recently refurbished property in the ever popular Diglis Area of Worcester. With spectacular views of the river and only a short walk into town, this property deserves view..."
"A stunning and upgraded Grade II Listed apartment in the popular Historic Norton Barracks development. This first floor apartment has been upgraded and enhanced by the current owners, to provide an impressive home. Conveniently located for easy access to M5 Jct 7 and City Centre alon..."
"A three bedroomed semi-detached property in a sought after and convenient location with driveway parking, private enclosed rear garden and garage. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EARLY VIEW ESSENTIAL. EPC - C"
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this stunning period terraced property being offered with no onward chain. Situated in the ever popular North of Worcester which allows for easy access into the city centre and motorway networks. Pinkett Street briefly comprises; lounge, kitchen-bre..."
"A great opportunity to purchase a three bedroom end of terrace property which is situated on a generous corner plot. This property is in need of modernisation, making it perfect for you to put your own stamp on it. The garden wraps around the property and has scope to extend or ..."
"Benefit from buying new with the Elyot with a £4,800 MORTGAGE SUBSIDY available for a limited time only!"
"Don't miss out, we're over 80% sold at The Grove at Worcester. Get in touch to make the stylish energy efficient Elyot home yours!"
CJ Hole are delighted to bring to market this exceptionally spacious four bedroom Victorian terrace family home set over 4 floors starting at the basement level through to the second floor. The property is approached via a paved frontage leading to the front door. The ground floor offers a ...
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * A semi-detached converted stable requiring modernisation, set in the lovely grounds of a stunning Grade II listed Hawford House. Entrance Hall, Kitchen, Lounge, Downstairs Cloakroom. 2 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, En-suite Shower Room to Master. In all about 1075 sq.ft Resident/..."
"*HMO INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * ATTRACTIVE RENTAL YIELD* Oakmans offer a fantastic HMO investment opportunity with this three bedroom property located on the popular Hawkwood Crescent, Worcester. The property is currently let to three sharers at an attractive rental amount and is..."
"A immaculately presented first floor apartment situated within this beautiful character building in the popular area of Battenhall. In brief comprises of entrance hall, utility, dining hall, living room, kitchen, two double bedrooms and good size shower room. Benefits from having a garage and par..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom, second floor apartment in the sought after location of Diglis, overlooking the Diglis Basin. The property also features high ceilings, sash windows and is spacious throughout."
"CJ Hole are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic 3 bedroom traditional family property in the popular area of St Johns. The property comprises of 2 double bedrooms and 1 single bedroom, exterior period features, large driveway, and large rear garden, gas central heating and ..."
"Our client was drawn to this property due to the beautiful character that is presented throughout. The property was in-need of renovation which has now been carried out adding in modern yet time-honoured facilities along with karndean flooring and complete redecoration, and a landscaped garden."
"A superb opportunity to acquire a two bedroom semi detached period Cottage with well planned and finished accommodation, within easy reach of schooling, Worcester City and major transport links, additional Conservatory, private rear garden and outbuilding offering further potential. Acco..."
"A larger style Five bedroom mid-terrace home boasting lounge, kitchen/diner, two shower rooms, has HOM status and no onward chain."
"Situated within the sought after area of St Johns, well placed for access to Malvern, Worcester City Centre and close to a wide range of local amenities. This charming three bedroom semi-detached home features; Good Sized Laid To Lawn Rear Garden, Driveway Parking & a Conservatory. The pro..."
" Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings: A beautifully presented two bedroom family home situated in an extremely popular residential area of Worcester. The property is situated close to the Barbourne shopping area, Worcester City centre with its range of shopping, recreation and e..."
"Great sized semi-detached HMO boasting kitchen with utility, conservatory, a large rear garden and has HMO status for 5 bedrooms, offered with no onward chain. ECP E"
"This beautifully presented top floor apartment is brought to the market with no chain, and is placed in such a prime location with underground parking."
"A superb three bedroom semi-detached home, nestled on the fringes of West Worcester boasting secure off-road parking, dining room, lounge, utility WC, no chain and a delightful private garden with garden room. EPC D"
"A very well presented two bedroom end of terrace house, situated within the sought after area of St. Peter's, offering local amenities, schooling, easy access to Worcester City and major transport links. Accommodation briefly comprises: Sitting Room/Dining Area with doors opening to the..."
"This spacious terraced property offers buyers an entrance hallway, living room, dining room, kitchen area, two great size bedrooms and a modern family bathroom. Further benefits include a downstairs toilet, large rear garden and great storage space throughout the property. T..."
"Swissville is a well presented two double bedroom Victorian mid terrace situated in this popular area of Worcester and within walking distance of local shops and Schools. The spacious accommodation includes Entrance hall, Sitting room, dining room, fitted kitchen and downstairs WC. On ..."
"Presented to an immaculate standard, and extended to both the front and rear, this cosy family home offers a great amount of space for a property in this location. Off road parking to the front, and a lovely low maintenance garden to the rear complete this family home. The property is..."
"NO-CHAIN: Located in sought after St Johns, 84a Henwick Road has potential, excellent off - road parking and generous garden which would be ideal to house a separate home office/bar/games room and it is chain free!"
"A well presented and spacious 2/3 Victorian style semi in convenient location offering good access the City of Worcester, local schools and public transport. The ground floor offers lounge, dining room, guest wc and kitchen. The kitchen is flitted with a range of wall, drawer an..."
"A fantastic and spacious two bedroom duplex Apartment forming part of the popular Albion Mill development, benefiting from lift access, off road parking space and located close to Worcester City centre. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Utility Room with store cupboard..."
"A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached home offering modern living accommodation, generous sized driveway offering off road parking for multiple vehicles and enclosed rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Worcester."
"Smart, luxurious, light and airy two-bedroom semi-detached with good multi-vehicle driveway to side and front and with garden in this highly favoured location. A really fabulous first-time buy!"
"A modern 3rd floor waterside Apartment, situated in the popular Diglis area of Worcester, boasting wonderful views over the River Severn and towards the Malvern Hills. The apartment is serviced via a lift. Accommodation briefly comprises: Large open-plan Sitting Room/Dining Area, Kitch..."
"Chain Free two bedroom bungalow in the popular area of 'Lower Wick', just a short walk from all of St John's useful amenities. This well proportioned bungalow briefly comprises entrance hall, kitchen, two bedrooms, living room/dining room, shower room, garage, conservatory, ample off r..."
"Overlooking open green space to the fore of the property, this two bedroom semi-detached home is perfect for anyone looking to get onto the property ladder! The property briefly comprises; lounge, kitchen-diner with patio doors to the rear garden and downstairs wc. Upstairs there are t..."
A three bedroom Victorian end of terrace home situated in a central location in Worcester. On the ground floor the lounge is of a good size that offers a bay fronted window. Once through the lounge you gain access to the kitchen diner which has a utility room to the back. The bathroom is al...
"***NO CHAIN*** DETACHED TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW situated in the popular area of ST JOHNS, the accommodation comprises entrance hall, L shaped lounge/dining room, fitted kitchen, there are two double bedrooms, the main bedroom has a fitted double wardrobe, modern shower room, the property benefits fr..."
"Superb period end terrace home in fantastic condition, bosting HMO status for 3 but would make a wonderful home to be lived in with a great size garden and usable cellar room. EPC D"
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this good size three bedroom semi detached home in the popular location of St Johns.
"This two bedroom semi detached property offers more than most similar properties. 6 Hydrangea Close boasts a conservatory, garage and nestled at the end of the rear garden a brick built office/gym/hobbies room. Upon entering the front door you walk straight into a very spacious open pl..."
Chancellors are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom semi detached property located in the popular location of St Peters. Great access points onto the M5.
"Immaculate two bedroom end of terrace with upgraded kitchen and shower room, located in the popular area of St Johns, just a short walk from all of its useful amenities and within a 20 minute walk of Worcester City Centre. In brief the property comprises entrance hall with doors to bot..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a fully licensed HMO (House of Multiple Occupation) properties with four rooms in total. The property is being offered with no onward chain. The property is listed. Service Charge is £100 pcm. 999 Year Lease.  *Also available ...
A good sized semi detached property benefitting from being situated in a good sized plot with ample space to the side which offers considerable potential. EPC - C. 
"A charming two bedroom Victorian end of terrace home situated within the highly desirable area of Barbourne. The property which is close to a range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Sitting Room, Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, Rear Hall & Downstairs Shower Room. On the First Floor; Two ..."
"Recently renovated to the highest standard throughout, this home is in perfect condition, offering a fantastic city centre home suitable for anyone wanting to have easy access to everything that Worcester has to offer. The current owners have created a clean, modern space, but have done a fantast..."
"An opportunity to purchase a rare two bedroom detached home in the heart of St Johns. This Victorian home is full of charm and character. The property benefits from gas central heating, attic room, cellar and rear garden. The property is being offered with no chain and must be viewed to a..."
"A superb five bedroom, semi-detached HMO nestled within an easy walk of the St Johns University Campus , boasting off-road parking, a great sized open lounge/kitchen/diner and is FULLY LET at £22,649PA. EPC - C"
"Super Smart Apartment in a tranquil setting. Overlooking Diglis Docks and with views towards the Malvern Hills and setting sun. Being Top Floor, the apartment has wonderful high ceilings. No Onwards Chain. Independant Rental Valuation £925-£950 PCM"
"A modern home built in the style of a traditional cottage ideally located in an enviable corner in Warndon Villages. 8 Trotshill Lane West is a stunning two bedroom property located in Warndon Villages, Worcester. The house benefits from a reception room and kitchen/dining room to the ground flo..."
"Situated within the popular residential area of WR5, close to Worcester Royal Hospital and good transport links. This modern style two bedroom end of terrace home is nestled on a quiet cul-de-sac location and features a lovely laid to lawn rear garden and one parking space to the front. The pr..."
"A great opportunity to acquire a move-in-ready semi-detached home. Situated on a generously sized plot, with spacious garden and large frontage with off road parking. The property also has the huge benefit of having no onward chain! The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, front ..."
"Traditional end of terrace property situated in the popular location of St Johns, perfect for all of the local amenities. Lounge, dining room, kitchen and a downstairs bathroom. Two double bedrooms, Garden to the rear. DO NOT MISS OUT ON THIS PROPERTY! CALL US NOW!"
"Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a wonderfully presented apartment that is situated in a prestigious converted Grade II listed building, set within the stunning Norton Barracks and conveniently located within close proximity to the Worcester Parkway Station which provides a dire..."
"***OPEN EVENT TUESDAY 14TH & SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, PLEASE CALL TO ARRANGE A VIEWING*** An immaculately presented 2 bedroom top floor appartment with views of the river in the desirable Harry Davis Court. The property comprises of an entrance hallway which has ample storage space and gives acce..."
"*Chain Free Property*. A superb and well presented modern style second floor two bedroom apartment situated within the highly popular area of Diglis. Nestled in a gorgeous position with stunning canal walks and easy access to Worcester City Centre, the apartment briefly comprises; ..."
"*Chain Free Property*. Set within the popular area of Diglis with easy access to Worcester City Centre, offering stunning canal walks and good transport links. This luxury modern two bedroom first floor apartment features an open plan kitchen/living room with a Juliet balcony, electric under f..."
"Fantastic opportunity for investors, as this well-presented house of multiple occupation has been consistently rented for many years at approximately £1,474 per calender month (a yield in the region of 8%). The ideal layout and lovely feel of the property has seemed to interest second and t..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated within the popular residential area of WR4 and nestled on a no through road. Close to a wide range of local amenities, Worcester City Centre and good transport links, the property features an en-bloc garage and briefly comprises;"
"This apartment is offered to the market with NO CHAIN and TENNANTS IN SITU. Located on the third floor this apartment can be accessed via a lift or stairs, it benefits from captivating views from the Balcony! kitchen is also fitted with integrated appliances."
"An extended three bedroom semi-detached offering two reception rooms, bloc paved driveway offering ample off road parking and generous sized rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Worcester."
"Situated in the highly desirable area of Warndon Villages and nestled on a quiet cul-de-sac location. This highly charming modern style two bedroom semi-detached home features a fitted kitchen/dining room, a gorgeous low maintenance rear garden and two parking spaces. The property briefly comp..."
"A highly charming and well presented two bedroom late Victorian mid-terrace home situated within the highly desirable area of Northwick. The property which is close to good schools and a range of local amenities, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Dining Room, Sitting Room with period cupboards..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN** GARAGE PARKING ** A well presented two bedroom mid-terraced home located in the ever popular Warndon Villages area of Worcester, giving great access to all local amenities, the M5 Motorway and Worcester Royal Infirmary. This well appointed property briefly comprises: entran..."
"Two bedroomed terraced property in the ever popular Warndon Villages which offers good access to the M5 motorway, Worcester Royal Hospital and the City Centre. Early internal viewing is advised but in short the property comprises; entrance lobby, spacious sitting room, contemporary fitt..."
***POPULAR LOCATION - THREE BEDROOMS - SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME*** Leaders are pleased to present to market this contemporary styled three bedroom semi-detached corner plot family home situated within very sought after location of Worcester. Being with close proximity to m...
"A period terraced property overlooking Diglis Park with two Bedrooms, offering easy access to the City centre. Accommodation briefly comprising: Sitting Room, Kitchen Diner. On the first floor: Two Bedrooms and a Bathroom. Outside: The property benefits from a low maintenanc..."
"*****************NO CHAIN******************* Leaders are pleased to present to market with no onward chain this contemporary styled two bedroom mid terrace home situated within a cul-de-sac position in the sought after location of St Peters, Worcester. Being close to many local ameniti..."
"A three bedroom end-terraced house, in a popular area within close proximity to the city centre. The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, living room, kitchen, shower room, three bedrooms and a cellar. The property further benefits from a rear garden and residents permit parking."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a two bedroom end-terraced home in the sought after Battenhall area, being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"This spacious, CHAIN FREE, terraced house offers buyers an entrance hallway, large living room, kitchen diner, three spacious bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include an enclosed rear garden with rear access, en-bloc garage and also great storage space throughout the pr..."
"This property comprises of entrance hall, large lounge / diner, kitchen and utility room on the ground floor. On the first floor we have the landing with airing cupboard, master bedroom, second and third bedroom as well as a W.C. and separate bathroom. The enclosed rear gard..."
"A spacious 36 x 20 two bedroom ""Stately Albion Chatsworth Gold Park Home"", situated in the popular Wheatfield Park development in the village of Callow End and benefiting and from allocated parking space and a generous plot. The Park Home is offered fully furnished. Accommodation briefl..."
"A stylish and recently renovated apartment in the centre of Worcester City. This wonderful apartment has been neutrally decorated and features vaulted ceilings throughout. The apartment includes an entrance hallway, a reception room, a modern fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms and a contemporar..."
"This CHAIN FREE property comprises of entrance hall, lounge with feature bay window and log burner, large dining room and kitchen on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find the main bedroom and second bedroom each with a feature fireplace, as well as the family bathroom. Ac..."
"A three bedroom end-terraced house, situated on the outskirts of Worcester City centre. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen, bathroom, conservatory and three bedrooms. The property further benefits from a courtyard rear garden."
A three bedroom semi-detached home in need of some modernisation with generous sized front and rear gardens situated within a popular residential area of Worcester.
"We are delighted to be able to offer this modern, newly-renovated 2 bedroom apartment located in the centre of Worcester. The property comes with off road parking and a new 999 year lease. "
"Offered with No Onward Chain, this well-extended three-bedroom home in the sought after location of St Johns has the unique selling point of having two sizable reception rooms, as well as a multi-functional side extension. The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, dining r..."
"Flat 1, Parian House is a stunning ground floor apartment, one of only sixteen in this converted building which was completed in 2018. Situated in a desirable waterside area of Diglis it overlooks the canal and is within a stones throw of the City centre. The property benefits from a service entr..."
A beautiful bright and spacious one bedroom retirement apartment on the ground floor of our prestigious Retirement Living development.
"IMMEDIATE MOVE AVAILABLE: Smart, light, comfortable and airy 2nd floor BALCONY-APARTMENT in this fine Diglis setting with private parking and easy guest parking spaces. No chain"
"A well-presented two bedroom apartment with en-suite and a spacious open plan living / dining / kitchen area in the sought after Diglis area, in close proximity to the city centre. This apartment has a balcony and is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"A contemporary styled two bedroom mid terrace home situated within the sought after location of St Peters, Worcester. The accommodation comprises: Reception hallway, fitted Kitchen and spacious lounge. On the first floor two bedrooms and a bathroom. Further benefits include gas centra..."
"PLEASE QUOTE REF: #SC0085 *** A Modern 2 Bedroom Terraced Property ***
"
A two bedroom mid terrace home with enclosed low maintenance rear garden and allocated parking for one vehicle situated within the popular residential area of Lyppard Bourne. NO ONWARD CHAIN!
This deceptively spacious three bedroom Victorian Semi-detached home is located to the East of Worcester and within a short distance of the City Centre and junction 6 of the M5. The property is offered with no onward chain and is an ideal First Time or investment purchase. The property comprise...
This beautifully presented and charming Victorian home with a great garden and parking permit to the front. The location is perfect for city living and close to both train stations. Two reception rooms and kitchen to ground floor. Cellar. Two bedrooms and shower room to first floor. The proper...
"This period property is conveniently located near to the city centre and comprises of sitting room, dining room, kitchen, utility and ground floor WC. To the first floor there are two bedrooms and a family bathroom. To the rear is a enclosed low maintenance rear garden. The property would idea..."
"***FREEHOLD INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** This centrally located mid terraced property currently offers two apartments over three floors and has the potential for mixed usage development and investment. The property briefly comprises frontage onto London Road, entrance hall, downsta..."
An extended period property that has recently been redecorated and re carpeted throughout making this an ideal first time purchase. Conveniently located within walking distance to the City centre and all of the local amenities this versatile property is a must view. The accommodation compri...
"An extended, two double bedroom mid terraced home benefitting from a fantastic garden leading to Laugherne Brook. With no onward chain, this home could be the perfect opportunity for first time buyers and investors alike. The property opens into an entrance hall and then briefly compr..."
A well presented one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor in the popular location of Barbourne. This property must be viewed to fully appreciate it. Call the office to book a viewing today!!
"This two bedroom home within the highly sought after WR3 area, is situated at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac off of Gregory Mills Street. The home is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"This spacious second floor apartment comprises of; open plan sitting room/kitchen, two double bedrooms with ensuite to bedroom one as well as a family bathroom. The property benefits from allocated parking, gas central heating, double glazing and is offered for sale with no onward chain. To be..."
"A great size four bedroom fully let, licensed HMO with a current annual rent of £ £19,921.00PA. Nestled in the the heart of St Johns and is only a moments walk to the Uni. EPC D"
"A spacious and stylish contemporary apartment within an historic Grade II listed building. This wonderful home is being offered with no upward chain and has spacious and immaculately presented accommodation, with a welcoming hallway, a generous-sized living room, a stylish fitted kitchen and two..."
"A well presented two bedroom mid terrace home with conservatory, allocated off road parking for two vehicles and enclosed low maintenance garden situated within the popular residential location in Berkeley Alford."
A two bedroom end of terrace home with en-bloc single garage and enclosed rear garden situated within the popular residential area of Lyppard Hanford.
Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester are delighted to offer a wonderfully appointed and presented two double bedroom apartment overlooking the communal gardens to the rear. Whiston Court is a prestigious development of purpose built retirement homes in White Ladies Close within easy access to the centr...
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A superb, beautifully presented and very well appointed 2 bedroom ground floor duplex apartment within the prominent K1 building and walking distance to the City Centre and Train Station.
The stylish , spacious light and airy accommodation comprises communal entrance hall, pr..."
"Seeing is believing with this fantastic duplex apartment - Offering 3 bedroom accommodation with lounge/diner, kitchen and bathroom there is off road parking and a fantastic private garden space. All situated in this popular residential area."
This two bedroom mid terrace property is located in a cul-de-sac position and is an ideal First Time or investment purchase. The property is offered with no onward chain. The accommodation consists of an entrance hall which leads through to the kitchen and lounge with dining area. The kitchen ha...
"A well-presented, two bedroom Victorian home, with two well sized reception rooms and private courtyard garden. This property offers plenty of scope to add your own personal touch and would be perfect for all first time buyers and investors. The ground floor briefly comprises; entrance..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire a two bedroom house with parking located on the outskirts of the town centre! This property is situated perfectly for access to the city centre.
Take a look at this unique top-floor apartment situated in the Battenhall area of Worcester. Beautifully presented throughout and conveniently located to access Worcester's vibrant city centre. Accommodation includes a stunning open plan living/dining/kitchen area.
"A superb and well presented modern style two bedroom ground floor apartment situated within the sought after area of St Johns. The property which is nestled on a quiet Bloor homes new build residential estate and is opposite a children's play area, briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Kitche..."
"The one bedroom Bayswater is an ideal home for those looking to step onto the property ladder or as a investment opportunity. The entrance opens up to the downstairs toilet, leading to the spacious living room and separate kitchen, featuring handy storage spaces throughout. Upstairs, y..."
"A convenient ground floor, two bedroom and two bathroom Apartment within the sought after Harry Davis Court development alongside the River Severn. Benefiting from 2 under croft parking spaces and offering easy access to the City, riverside walks and transport links. Accommodation brief..."
"***5 Ludstock Close, Worcester WR5 2NF. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £185,500 on the above property.*** This three bedroom mid terraced shared ownership leasehold property is being staircased to 100% on completion and will revert t..."
"A unique opportunity to acquire a retirement bungalow situated close to the city centre and finished and refurbished to a high standard throughout. The property which was refurbished extensively in 2018 and comprises double glazed windows and doors, electric night storage heating, refitted kit..."
Chancellors Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this three bedroom end terraced property in Worcester. Situated in a great position for commuting in and out of Worcester but also within a mile of local stores.
"A three bedroom home situated close to local amenities, shops, schools, transport links. The property has hall, sitting room, dining kitchen, cloakroom, family bathroom, gardens to the front and rear. Benefiting from gas fired central heating and uPVC double glazing and no onward chain."
"A two bedroom townhouse, situated in the desirable Diglis location which is a short walk from the city centre. The property comprises entrance hall, downstairs w/c, two bedrooms, bathroom and lounge/kitchen. There is an allocated parking space for one car."
"A modernised and extended Victorian terrace home situated within an extremely convenient location to the north-east of Worcester City centre. This is a fantastic example of an extended Victorian property, which has been much improved by the current owners. The versatile accommodation is arranged..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN ** A spacious 2 double bedroom ground floor apartment situated in a popular residential area close to local amenities and being within walking distance to the City Centre.
The accommodation comprises communal entrance hall, private reception hall, inner hallway , large lounge/di..."
"We are very pleased to offer this ground floor, spacious apartment, situated within a small development located in the pretty village of Hallow. The accommodation benefits from two double bedrooms, communal gardens, off road parking and a garage."
"Situated on the first floor in the popular Whiston Court, this immaculately presented two double bedroom apartment for the over 55's has been upgraded to include luxury carpets, upgraded quartz kitchen worktop and tiling, upgraded AEG induction hob and fitted blinds to all windows."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a particularly spacious two bedroom top floor Apartment, situated in a quiet North Worcester location, benefiting from two off road parking spaces. Accommodation comprising: Entrance Hall, Living Room, Kitchen, Master Bedroom with En-Suite Shower Room, ..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: This first floor, one-bedroom apartment is extremely well presented, having been completely re-decorated and boasting brand new carpets in a very up to date style."
***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Martin&Co are pleased to offer a beautifully presented corner plot apartment located in the heart of Worcester City Centre. Sited on the third floor with a wrap-around balcony the apartment offers uninterrupted and far reaching views over the River Severn. Conveniently l...
"***LANDLORDS OR FIRST TIME BUYERS*** Leaders are pleased to present to market with no onward chain this excellent opportunity to purchase this well presented one bedroom coach house situated within the popular residential area of Warndon Villages, Worcester. Being within cl..."
** RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR SALE ** Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester are delighted to offer a wonderfully appointed one bedroom first floor apartment situated in the unique Whiston Court complex. Whiston Court is a prestigious development of purpose built retirement homes in White Ladies Close with...
A unique opportunity to purchase this well-presented one bedroom end of terrace bungalow with private enclosed rear garden and en-bloc single garage situated within the popular residential area of Worcester. NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"A deceptively spacious two bedroom end terrace property situated on Astwood Road, just a short distance from the City Centre, which boasts a range of retail, leisure and hospitality outlets. The property is situated over two floors, the ground floor comprises, large entrance hallway, ..."
"A one bedroom retirement flat in the very sought after complex of Eastbank Court. With fantastic local amenities and a great community, this flat must be viewed to appreciate. Call the office today to book a viewing!!"
"A modern two bedroom ground floor Apartment, benefiting from private allocated parking space, situated in the popular Diglis area within easy reach of Worcester City centre. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall with spacious cupboard off, open-plan Living Room/Kitchen, Master ..."
"A mid terrace house situated within a popular residential area of Worcester close to local amenities, transport links and Worcester City Centre The property has two receptions rooms kitchen, three bedrooms, bathroom. It beneifits from gas fired central heating, uPVC double glazing and invites ..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A spacious, South-facing, first floor apartment which is very bright and sunny due to its position. Open to sensible offers and negotiations."
"A large one double bedroom retirement apartment for the over 55's, which benefits from a high specification finish and is being sold with no onward chain!! UTILITY BILLS & HOMEMADE DAILY MEAL INCLUDED WITHIN THE MONTHLY LIVING COSTS!"
** RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR SALE ** Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester are delighted to offer this very well presented one bedroom second floor apartment situated in the unique Whiston Court complex. Whiston Court is a highly prestigious development of purpose built retirement homes in White Ladies C...
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A West facing, one bedroom apartment situated on the top floor of the building over-looking the communal gardens."
"A very well presented two bedroom town house situated in the sought after location of Diglis which is a short stroll to the City of Worcester, which offers a range of retail, leisure and hospitality outlets including Worcester Cathedral. The property is set over three floors and brief..."
"A large one double bedroom retirement apartment for the over 55's, which benefits from a high specification finish and is being sold with no onward chain!!"
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 41 Bevington Court, Crossley Road, Worcester, WR5 3GF - We have received an offer of £168,525.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating B This two bedroom secon..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this well presented ground floor apartment, within walking distance to the City centre, with its own private entrance and one allocated parking space."
"A two bedroom townhouse, in the sought after location of Diglis. The property compromises entrance hall, downstairs w/c, two bedrooms, bathroom and lounge/kitchen. The property further benefits from an allocated parking space."
"An exceptionally well presented two double bedroom Penthouse apartment in located in the sought after location of Northwick which offers good access to the M5 motorway, City of Worcester and local amenities. In brief the apartment comprises open plan lounge, dining and kitchen areas. The kitchen ..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A spacious and bright one-bedroom apartment on the ground floor, close to the communal areas within the complex. The lounge/dining room has a feature fireplace, wall lights and French doors leading out on to a patio and the well-kept communal gardens. Double bedroom..."
"A most spacious and beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor retirement Apartment available for those over the age of 65, forming part of an exclusive development within the Northwick area of Worcester. NO ONWARD CHAIN Accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance Hall, spacious Lou..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A one-bedroom first floor apartment situated near the lift, library, and on-site salon."
"*** CASH BUYERS ONLY*** A well presented, light and airy two bedroom apartment set within the Grade II listed Norton Barracks, benefiting from allocated parking, situated in the popular location of Norton. Accommodation briefly comprising: Communal Entrance Lobby, Entrance Hall, Spacious..."
"Lansdowne Street is a period terraced home offering well proportioned accommodation requiring modernisation/updating. Situated in this popular and sought after residential area, the location provides easy access to the city centre, national road and rail networks. The accommodation in b..."
"FastMove are proud to present this deceptively spacious and well presented two bedroom property, positioned in a popular residential location."
Tucked just off Britannia Square this move-in-ready apartment is located in a secure and safe environment for the over 60's! Offering full independent living with an on-site manager should further assistance be required.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a brand-new three-bedroom home on the south side of Worcester bordering Kempsey village. Being sold on a part buy, part rent basis. The properties are being sold on a part-buy, part-rent basis with a 50% to 75% share available to purchase initially. There are ..."
"A traditional terraced home in a great location for access to the city centre and train stations! The property offers potential for refurbishment, making it a perfect purchase for First Time Buyers and Investors alike!"
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A bright one-bedroom apartment, situated on the first floor. The apartment is finished neutrally with new carpets being installed as well."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A well maintained, quiet, one-bedroom apartment situated on the first floor. The accommodation includes a lounge with a modern feature fireplace, French doors, and Juliet balcony. The fitted kitchen has integrated appliances including a washer/dryer..."
"A charming one bedroom top floor apartment situated in a converted Victorian home. This property benefits from garden and off road parking. Must be viewed to appreciate the location. 
"
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A modern 2 bedroom semi detached house in need of updating being situated close to all local amenities and within walking distance to the City Centre .
The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, open plan living area and kitchen, 2 bedrooms and bathroom. There is ga..."
"TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT IN POPULAR CENTRAL LOCATION FOR OFFERS OVER £150,000 This property comprises of a communal entrance hall leading to a private entrance hall with doors leading off to the bathroom, main bedroom, lounge / kitchen / diner, second bedroom and storage cupboard. <..."
"A well presented and spacious one double bedroom ground floor apartment within the popular Diglis location benefiting from allocated parking, large open plan living/dining/kitchen and fitted wardrobes in the bedroom. Ideal location for city access and river/canalside walks!"
"This property is located on the ground floor, offering buyers an entrance hall with two storage areas, open-plan lounge/kitchen, two bedrooms, and bathroom. Further benefits include an allocated parking space for 1 car, gas central heating and UPVC double glazed windows. Th..."
"This two bedroom second floor apartment is located within the boundaries of the City Centre and is offered with no onward chain. The property consists of an entrance hall which leads through to the lounge, two bedrooms and bathroom. The 14ft lounge has patio doors leading out onto a balcony and o..."
"A two bedroom 1st floor Apartment, benefiting from allocated undercover off road parking space and situated within Worcester City centre. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, open-plan Living Room/Kitchen, two Bedrooms and Bathroom. Outside: Undercover parking space..."
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN - POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE*** Leaders are proud to present to market this contemporary styled one bedroom apartment situated within a very sought after location of Worcester. Being within close proximity to many local amenities, great access ..."
"*** Investors or landlords only as tenant currently in situ *** A very well presented and deceptively spacious one bedroom top floor Apartment, situated in the heart of the City with views towards Worcester Cathedral. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, large open-plan Kitch..."
"A desirable apartment situated within a Grade II listed building within easy access of the M5 motorway. comprising, communal entrance, sitting room, kitchen, two bedrooms & bathroom with electric heating throughout. The property further benefits from off road parking as well as being withi..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A well-situated and well-presented one-bedroom, first floor retirement apartment, forming part of the exclusive Eastbank Court development in the popular Northwick area of Worcester."
Chancellors Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this ground floor apartment Presented as a great opportunity for investors and first time buyers. Along with an allocated parking space for one vehicle.
"Retirement Property: A bright and sunny ground floor, one bedroom apartment, close to amenities within the complex. The apartment consists of a large living area with a modern feature fireplace and French doors opening onto a patio area..."
"For sale by TRADITIONAL AUCTION on Thursday 30th March 2023 to cash buyers only. A buyers premium of 1% + VAT (1.2% inc VAT) of the purchase price with a minimum fee of £2,500 + VAT (£3,000 inc VAT) is applicable on this property. This 1930's three bedroom semi-detached home requir..."
"Two Studio apartments for sale.  A very rare opportunity to purchase both ground and first floor, fully self contained studio apartments. This is a freehold purchase of the whole building. Rental income potential of £450 per studio. Each studio is independently metered for elec..."
"When our client chose this beautiful apartment nearly 10 years ago, she was spoilt for choice due to it being a newly completed complex. She chose this one due to the outlook over the side of the building where she could people watch from her Juliet balcony."
"A well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment situated close to amenities including schools, library, doctors, supermarkets and bus routes. The property has gas fired central heating, uPVC double glazing and is offered with no onward chain."
"Built in 2006, this 2-bed property in All Saints House includes all the features you would expect in a quality apartment, including double-glazing, modern electric panel heaters, Juliet balcony and designer bathroom and kitchen. The building benefits from security access system, lift to all floor..."
"National Residential is proud to offer this highly sought-after 2-bedroom apartment, located in the heart of Worcester City Centre. Ideal for investors, the apartment is currently tenanted until 2024 and offers a fantastic investment opportunity."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY: A spacious first floor flat with a bright and sunny, South-facing aspect. The large living and dining area features French doors which open onto a Juliet balcony overlooking the well-kept communal gardens. The apartment also includes a fully fitted kitchen..."
"A brilliant opportunity for an INVESTOR to buy a 2 bedroom ground floor apartment with Sitting Tenants, situated in Blackpole. This apartment offers an open plan living room, kitchen and access to communal gardens, parking space for one car and easy access to all local amenities! Cash buyer only!"
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN - SOLD WITH A LONG LEASE** A smart, well appointed 1st floor City Centre apartment within a sought after and secure gated development within walking distance to the Train Station and the High Street where there are extensive shops, bars and restaurants readily available.
This is..."
City Centre living beckons with this fantastic 1 bedroom apartment - further accommodation includes a bathroom and spacious open plan living/kitchen/dining area. Further benefits include gated secure parking. Offered with no onward chain.
Located in Worcester's vibrant town centre this one bedroom apartment benefits from secondary glazing to ensure the noise level is low whilst being in the heart of the action!The property has a Balcony overlooking Cathedral Square with an open plan kitchen/dining/living area with modern facilities.
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Mid Terraced Property
"This pleasantly presented One Bedroom, First Floor apartment is on offer with NO ONWARD CHAIN and offer modern accommodation throughout. The property offers an entrance hallway, Open Plan Kitchen Living area, a Large double bedroom with fitted wardrobes and a modern Bathroom with 3 piece suite. <..."
"A fantastic apartment situated on the outskirts of Worcester City Centre within a period building and benefiting from having off road parking. Briefly comprising of living room, kitchen diner, double bedroom and bathroom. Ideal for first time buyer or investment opportunity."
*ATTENTION INVESTORS! TENANT SECURED @ £600PCM OFFERING 5.5% YIELD!* Leaders are pleased to present this ideal investment opportunity in the heart of the city centre. This one bedroom apartment offers spacious living accommodation and benefits from all of the amenities and transp...
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Martin&Co are pleased to offer this well presented and recently updated first floor apartment which is located within walking distance of the City Centre, railway stations and associated amenities. The property greatly benefits from not only allocated parking but a ..."
"For sale by TRADITIONAL AUCTION on Thursday 30th March 2023 to cash buyers only. A buyers premium of 1% + VAT (1.2% inc VAT) of the purchase price with a minimum fee of £2,500 + VAT (£3,000 inc VAT) is applicable on this property. An incredibly spacious property requiring modernisa..."
40% SHARED OWNERSHIP: Rare opportunity to purchase this Modern home in highly sought after village location on a super plot with leafy rear aspect
Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market an ideal first time or investment purchase that benefits from well maintained communal grounds and allocated parking. The ground floor apartment is situated in the ever popular area of St Peters offering good access to local amenities and the mot...
INVESTORS ONLY - TENANT IN SITU: Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market an ideal investment purchase with tenant already in situ that benefits from well maintained communal grounds and allocated parking. The top floor apartment is situated in the ever popular area of St Peters offerin...
Wonderful opportunity for City-Centre living: First time buyers ahoy! Or a brilliant buy-to-let? Maybe an Airbnb? In central Worcester the property is walkable to all the City has to offer with train and bus station within minutes walk if you need to travel!
"Stylish apartment in the heart of the city centre A great opportunity to purchase this one bedroom apartment in Worcester's city centre. From the entrance hall doors lead in to the open plan lounge/dining area, which has tall ceilings and a large sash window to the front which allows lots of na..."
"***LANDLORDS ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £470 PCM OFFERING AN ESTIMATED YIELD OF 5.1%*** Leaders are pleased to present to market with no onward chain this contemporary styled one bedroom first floor apartment situated in the popular residential area of St Peter's, Worcester. "
"This briefly comprises entrance hall, open plan kitchen/living area, bedroom and bathroom. The property is located within a short walk of useful amenities, including Sainsburys, the local libary and Worcester City Centre. Fantastic investment property with a potential renta..."
INVESTORS ONLY - TENANT IN SITU: Philip Laney & Jolly are pleased to present to the market an ideal investment purchase with tenant already in situ. This first floor apartment is situated conveniently and within walking distance to the City Centre and Worcester Shrub Hill train station. The ...
"Modern one bedroom house in pristine condition, recently had a new kitchen and breakfast bar fitted. Open-plan kitchen and living room, open stairs to first floor. Landing with bathroom and double bedroom, bedroom with views over front garden. Newly refitted bathroom. Sale includes all carpets, f..."
"COMING SOON - SHARED OWNERSHIP - KENSINGTON GATE, WORCESTERwhg are proud to present a selection of two and three bedroom homes in Worcester.Homes are expected to be built for move in during December 2023.Contact us to register your interest in these beautiful homes."
"National Residential are thrilled to present this stunning 1-bedroom apartment in the heart of Worcester City Centre. Available to both investors and first-time buyers, this property is an excellent opportunity to own a piece of this vibrant and bustling city."
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY**INVESTORS ONLY**TENANT IN SITU** Martin&Co are pleased to offer this modern first floor apartment situated within a converted building, in the heart of Worcester City Cente and just a short walk to Foregate Street Railway Station. The property briefly comprises: en..."
"A GREAT opportunity to aquire this perfect INVESTOR flat! With a 6% rental yield, or easy access with first time buyers, This property cannot be missed! There are all local amenities on the doorstep, the M5 is a short distance away. Book your viewing now on ! Cash buyers!"
"CASH BUYERS ONLY A very well presented one bedroom apartment situated in the Heart of Worcester City Centre within just a short stroll of the many retail, leisure and hospitality amenities Worcester has to offer, as well as the superb Cathedral. An internal viewing is highly recommended. In ..."
A one bedroom first floor maisonette with parking and enclosed garden situated within a popular residential of Blackpole.
"A first floor apartment situated close to amenities, Worcester City Centre and M5 motorway. The property has sitting/dining room, balcony, kitchen, bathroom. There is a communal garden and benefits from gas fired central heating and uPVC double glazing. CALL THE OFFICE ON !!"
"Our clients purchased this property as their first home a few years ago, when looking for shared ownership properties this one stood out due to both bedrooms being accommodating for double beds. As well as the size our clients loved the location as it is only 3 Miles away from Worcester City Centre."
"A one bedroom Park Home available to those over the age of 60, benefiting from generous driveway, private garden and enjoying views over open countryside to the rear, situated on the popular Sunnyside Park development. Accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Living Room, Kitchen..."
"1 bedroom first floor apartment nearby the city centre and Shrub Hill train station. The aparmtnet comprises of 1 double bedroom, main Bathroom and kitchen with Lounge/Diner. Ideal for first time buyers looking to get on the property ladder or investors as the rental yield is over 7.5% "
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** A well presented and first floor self contained apartment located in a well established and sought after residential area on the edge of Worcester City Centre. This well appointed apartment briefly comprises: entrance hall with storage, open plan living area to fitted..."
** RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR SALE ** Philip Laney & Jolly Worcester offer to the market a much improved RETIREMENT APARTMENT situated in a most sought after location close to local amenities designed for the active retired aged 60 years and over. Accessed via stairs or lift the exceptionally well...
This development was built in 2015 and makes up 57 apartments in the block. It is available for anyone over 55 years of age and is located on the second floor. The purchase price of this property is for a 60% share. Charges per month given February 2023: Rent £182.41 ...
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR - ALL REMAINING FURNITURE IS NEGOTIABLE Gheluvelt Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 52 properties arranged over 3 floors served by lift. In addition, there is a separate detached block comp..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this ground floor apartment situated within the popular area of Arboretum and within easy walking distance of Worcester city centre and Foregate Street Railway station. The apartment comprises : Communal entrance hall, front door to wntrance hall , ..."
"Two bedroom apartment conveniently located in WR1, just a short walk from Worcester City Centre, Shrub Hill Train Station and Foregate Train Station. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge/diner, kitchen, shower room and two bedrooms. The property benefits fro..."
A GROUND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH PATIO DOOR LEADING TO COMMUNAL GARDENS BENIFITTING FROM BEING RE-PAINTED AND NEW CARPETS THROUGHOUT. Gheluvelt Court is ideally situated opposite Gheluvelt Park with walks leading down to the River. Benefiting from a host of amenities nearby ...
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £85,000. Buy it now option available Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"***PUBLIC NOTICE - PUBLIC NOTICE - 19 St. Clements Court, Worcester, Worcestershire, WR2 5NW - We have received an offer of £ 90,000.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating (D) ***This ..."
"FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This one bedroom lower floor studio flat is available with tenants in situ. This property is perfect for an investment, and is located in the popular area of St Johns."
"A well presented one bedroom first floor retirement apartment situated within the highly desirable location of Barbourne. The apartment forms part of a McCarthy and Stone retirement complex and offers all the communal amenities you would expect to include; Communal Residents Lounge, Laundry Ro..."
"A quirky and characterful one bedroom top floor Apartment. The property benefits from a share of the Freehold and pleasant communal gardens. Accommodation briefly comprises: Kitchen, Bedroom, Shower Room, Living Area and Utility Cupboard. Outside: Charming communal gardens.<..."
"***For sale by the Modern Method of Auction*** A perfect opportunity to acquire this brilliant INVESTMENT!! The property has all local amenities on the doorstep, the M5 a short distance away so book your viewing now to avoid missing out! CALL US NOW!! Cash buyers only!!"
"An ideally located one bedroom retirement apartment with potential for refurbishment. The property is situated on the second floor, which can be accessed by lift. The development offers access to communal areas, including lounge, conservatory and mature gardens."
"A second floor Retirement Apartment in need of some modernisation situated in a prestigious and convenient location to the North of Worcester City Centre close to good transport links and local facilities. The accommodation briefly comprises; Entrance Hall, Sitting/Dining Room, Kitchen, Utilit..."
"A delightful, ground floor retirement apartment with access to the communal gardens , secure off-road parking and is sold with no chain. EPCtbc"
" 40% SHARED OWNERSHIP A very well presented two bedroom town house situated in the sought after location of Diglis which is a short stroll to the City of Worcester, which offers a range of retail, leisure and hospitality outlets including Worcester Cathedral. The property is..."
"SHARED OWNERSHIP 40% SHARE. A two bedroom townhouse, in the sought after location of Diglis. The property compromises entrance hall, downstairs w/c, two bedrooms, bathroom and lounge/kitchen. The property further benefits from an allocated parking space."
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. A one bedroom ground floor apartment ideally suited to an investor or first-time buyer situated close to Worcester City Centre with its range of shopping, leisure and entertainment amenities along with easy access to Wor..."
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £75,000 Proudly presented to you by Move Sales & Lettings: A one bedroom ground floor apartment ideally suited to an investor or first-time buyer situated close to Worcester City Centre with its range o..."
"A first floor retirement apartment for over 60's, enjoying a convenient sought after location within easy reach of the local amenities of Barbourne. Views to the rear overlooking the communal garden with path to St Georges Square giving access to the Church. NO ONWARD CHAIN EPC - B."
"Auction Sale - 28/03/2023 A two bedroom first floor flat, forming part of an attractive grade II listed building, presented in clean decorative order, well located for the amenities of Worcester city centre. Vacant. "
"Stunning retirement 1 and 2 bedroom apartments in this flagship residence nestled on the outskirts of Worcester boasting superb community facilities, an onsite restaurant and landscaped gardens."
"A well-proportioned one bedroom shared ownership retirement apartment situated in a modern complex on the south side of Worcester. Being offered to the market with no chain, this spacious apartment is being sold with a 25% share and resides in this new extra care site for over 55s with additional..."
We are excited to bring to market this fantastic one bedroom apartment in Crookbarrow View. This is a fantastic extra care site in Worcester exclusively for residents over the age of 55. This apartment being sold at a 25% share basis. Please call to arrange a time to visit the site wit...
3 Parking Spaces located to the North-West of Arlington Court on Droitwich Road
Strategic Land available - Kempsey - Call the auctioneer to discuss a pre-auction purchase.
An opportunity to acquire a small plot of land hidden away up Church Close in St Johns. Potential to erect a large shed/store (subject to obtaining necessary P.P.). 
A fabulous two bedroom modern apartment offering the huge advantages of a spacious open plan living area which opens onto a generous balcony.
"AN OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A FREEHOLD PORTFOLIO OF 4 BLOCKS OF APARTMENTS WITH 25 TWO BEDROOM AND 2 THREE BEDROOM PROPERTIES, The majority of properties are currently let with existing short hold tenancy agreements in place. Each apartment consists of living room, kitchen, 2 bedrooms and bathro..."
Fantastic investment opportunity
"**INVESTORS / DEVELOPERS** A stunning PERIOD PROPERTY converted into 18 FURNISHED STUDIO APARTMENTS, situated just outside York city walls within easy reach of the vibrant shops and restaurants along Micklegate, together with easy access to the city centre and railway station."
"On behalf of Joseph Rowntree Housing Trust, Savills are instructed to sell Lamel Beeches."
"Impressive double-fronted townhouse in a garden square, with off street parking"
"Outstanding city centre townhouse with walled garden, facing York Minster."
"Wonderful quiet residential street with the fantastic Knavesmire, one of a large number of green open spaces close by"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. 6 FULLY LET APARTMENTS A range of 6 stunning, recently refurbished 1 and 2 bedroomed apartments in this handsome bay fronted period townhouse, a short distance from the city centre."
"OFF STREET PARKING, GARDEN AND SELF CONTAINED BASEMENT APARTMENT ALL WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF YORK CITY CENTRE AND RAILWAY STATION"
A distinguished and elegantly proportioned end of terrace Grade II listed town house with a good sized garden and private parking in one of York's most desirable residential areas.
A handsome Grade II Listed townhouse providing versatile accommodation of impressive proportions with a large garden and ample parking.
"A stunning Georgian townhouse situated on a highly desirable road leading in to York city centre, with garden and parking"
A grand Victorian townhouse situated in a tree lined avenue less than a mile from York city walls
"Believed to date back to the late 1700's, we are pleased to present to the market this substantial detached family home offering spacious living accommodation in this highly sought after location with an adjoining annex and detached four bedroom converted coach house. In total there is over 5700 ..."
Additional Annex and Four Bedroom Detached House | Three Garages | Over 5700 sq ft of Living Accommodation | Excellent Catchment for Schools
"An elegant Grade II Listed townhouse just outside the city walls, providing versatile accommodation of impressive proportions and a landscaped garden."
LARGE VICTORIAN TOWN HOUSE & SHOP Situated in this bustling and most desirable location this unique property has been the subject of an extensive range of modernisation and refurbishment by the present owners to the highest of standards it offers the rare opportunity to acquire a large terrace pr...
A rare opportunity to purchase a 4/5 bedroom period terrace house in the sought after Bishopthorpe Road with a shop or the potential for an extra living space. Situated in this bustling and most desirable location this unique property has been the subject of an extensive range of moder...
BEAUTIFUL CHARACTER PROPERTY WITH VIEWS OF YORK MINSTER
"Operating as an independent four star guest house and located just outside York city walls and within a five minute walk to York Minster, we are offering the opportunity to acquire a C1 class commercial property. This eight bedroom period town house, comprises of six letting rooms, a re..."
"Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged over seven floors, with the advantage of secure undercroft residents parking and a grand entrance foyer with concierge service. Due to its stature and setting, Ryedale House offers unparalleled views across..."
"A recently refurbished period townhouse with large garden and separate garage, close to the city centre"
"An impressive, beautifully restored circa 1870's DOUBLE FRONTED TERRACED TOWNHOUSE with an abundance of original and period features, situated in an enviable location close to York city centre."
A charming 2 double bedroom semi detached bungalow with a fabulous south west facing rear garden leading down to the river Foss. The property offers an excellent opportunity for updating and potential extension (subject to all relevant consents) and is offered with the convenience of no forward c...
"A fantastic two bedroom apartment with parking, located in a prestigious development within the city walls with excellent access to YORK CITY CENTRE and the railway station "
"This wonderful detached home is nestled in a fabulous, mature plot occupying a prime position in this most sought after location. The Grove is a small, select development of substantial homes set just off Tadcaster Road and is well placed for access to the city centre and excellent commuter links..."
"An impressive, recently updated DETACHED HOUSE set within wrap around gardens, situated in an enviable and quiet cul-de-sac off Water End in the CLIFTON area of York. The property is complimented by the unique neighbouring properties which have been transformed, having acquired the necessary plan..."
"Handsome Georgian townhouse situated in a charming cobbled street within a conservation area, situated just off Blossom Street"
"Distinguished Georgian townhouse with private parking, situated in a cobbled lane in a Conservation area, close to the city centre and just south of Micklegate Bar."
A five bedroom detached house on the ever sought after Stockton Lane with an integral garage and an approximately 168 ft long rear garden. The house has recently been renovated by the current owner and is offered with no forward chain. The ground floor comprises of a formal front entran...
"Every now and again something very special comes onto the property market and this impressive, substantial period home is no exception. Offering the best in suburban living, with its stylish kitchen and wealth of elegant period features and a sense of grandeur, this property will be incredibly po..."
"An impressive five bedroom semi detached home located in the highly desirable area of Fulford, with a private and enclosed rear garden. Occupying an enviable position so close to York city centre, this home provides immaculate accommodation which spans over three floors. This property has undergo..."
"Splendid 4 bedroom period property, offering significant and exceptionally well-presented accommodation of near perfect proportions. With exquisite interiors and handsome original features the property truly offers the best of old and new and also enjoys delightful generous gardens, a large doubl..."
"A superb example of a Grade II Listed townhouse, providing tastefully appointed accommodation of exquisite proportions within walking distance of the city centre and railway station. Accommodation comprises:- Entrance hall, sitting room, kitchen/dining room, utility, drawing roo..."
"Situated in one of York's most sought after streets, this large four storey forecourted mid terrace home has been the subject to an extensive scheme of refurbishment, carried out to the highest of standards. A generous extension has enhanced the internal accommodation by creating a large and open..."
A striking contemporary mews development in a private courtyard setting adjacent to the city walls.
City centre living at its best in this iconic building situated within York’s cultural heart.
"A five bedroom detached house in Fulford, with a south facing rear garden, double garage and views over a green to the front. Located in Fulford on a quiet green behind Fulford secondary school which has an Ofsted rating of outstanding, this five bedroom home with upgraded fixtures and f..."
This is a rare and super opportunity to purchase an iconic building under two miles from York city centre.
"** AVAILABLE NOW- NO ONWARD CHAIN** An enviable opportunity to acquire this attractive three-bedroom Grade II listed townhouse with fabulous views of the River Ouse, private garden and a much sought after parking space."
"A recently completed NEWLY CONVERTED THREE STOREY TOWNHOUSE finished to a high specification, situated in an enviable location a little off BOOTHAM and within easy reach of the city centre."
"This large traditional detached family home has undergone a scheme of modernisation and extension over the years to provide a large and versatile family house of most generous proportions. The remodelling has taken the original traditional house and enhanced it with a modern design, opening up th..."
*** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED *** A large and smartly presented DETACHED FIVE BEDROOM CHALET STYLE HOUSE situated in a CONVENIENT LOCATION close to the A59 and York's outer ring road.
"A beautifully presented GEORGIAN TERRACE HOUSE, with south facing courtyard garden, perfectly positioned in a sought after location close to York City Centre and Railway Station."
An immaculately presented and deceptively spacious FIVE STOREY PERIOD TOWNHOUSE. Perfectly positioned on a quiet cobbled street in the BISHOPHILL area in the Heart of York's City Centre. Permit parking is available
"AN IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY to purchase the freehold of this block of 5 apartments set in a popular location within 10 minutes walk of York city centre. The properties are all currently let on shorthold tenancies and have potential for an income up to £50,000 per annum. The development has p..."
"An exceptional two bedroom duplex penthouse with large roof terrace in an iconic building, close to the city centre and with easy access to the train station."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! STUNNING, SPACIOUS 4 STOREY VICTORIAN TERRACED TOWNHOUSE WITH BASEMENT ON THE EVER POPULAR ""BISHY ROAD! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this fabulous, spacious property located in one of York`s most desirable locations, being a short ..."
*** Viewing Recommended *** A PERIOD END TOWNHOUSE with the benefit of PARKING situated in the HEART OF YORK is this beautifully presented and newly refurbished house.
"An extended detached house offering stylish accommodation, off street parking and a larger than average garden."
Extensive Grade II listed townhouse in a highly desirable area with private garden and garage
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this unique 1930's detached house boasting original fireplaces, lots of character and charm and is offered for sale with the additional benefit of no onward chain. Situated in a desirable location just off Stockton Lane with a generous rear garden. "
"A handsome Grade II listed town house overlooking York's only private gated garden square. St Paul's Square is within walking distance of the city centre, the railway station, and two prestigious local schools: St Peter's and The Mount. The property comprises of a charming entrance hallw..."
A superb development of townhouses situated close to the Museum Gardens and within easy reach of York city centre and The Minster.
"***ATTENTION INVESTORS PLANNING PERMISSION APPROVED *** A large period property in a popular area of York with planning permission granted for the conversion into five apartments. Currently a 12 bedroom extended semi detached, planning has been approved for the conversion into..."
"A contemporary, TWO BEDROOM Apartment with BALCONY over looking the AWARD WINNING gardens, situated in an ENVIABLE location within the city walls and in CLOSE PROXIMITY of YORK STATION."
"A spacious TERRACED PERIOD PROPERTY, built in 1829, situated in a prime location on Nunnery Lane overlooking the City Walls. Currently the property comprises a SHOP AND OFFICE to the ground floor, above which is SPACIOUS LIVING ACCOMMODATION over three floors together with an ATTRACTIVE SOUTH FA..."
STUNNING FAMILY HOME IN FULFORD SCHOOL CATCHMENT WITH BEAUTIFUL OPEN PLAN KITCHEN-LIVING-DINING AREA
Luxury penthouse with generous sized balcony adjacent to the River Ouse and within minutes of the train station and the city centre
"A six bedroom student let investment property located behind York St John University. Currently operating as a six bedroom licensed house of multiple occupancy, a most deceptive modern town house, situated in a central and convenient location less than half a mile from the city centre ..."
A fantastic four bedroom detached house with garden only four and half miles away from the city centre of York
"A beautifully furnished two bedroom apartment over looking the River Foss, this wonderful two bedroom fourth floor apartment is the ideal weekend getaway and holiday let. Located in the sought after Ryedale House an exclusive luxury apartment building within York's historic city walls...."
"Located in the popular residential area of Huntington, close to local amenities and with easy access to York city centre and further afield via the ring road, is this extended and tastefully presented four bedroom detached home. Perfect for a growing family, this home has been extended and renova..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a collection of three investment properties, located in the popular Fulford area of the city."
"A detached house with views over fields to the front and great potential located in Fulford school catchment (Ofsted rated outstanding) Located in Fulford on a quiet country lane with great links to country walks and the sought after primary and secondary schools, this three bedroom home..."
"A superb four bedroom period property situated just off Fulford Road, just a 10 minute walk from the city centre. This spacious home boasts stunning original features, a rear courtyard and a primary bedroom with an en suite to the second floor."
An impressive period property ideally located on Nunnery Lane in the centre of York with views over the famous city walls
"A substantial and extended semi detached home situated on one of York's most popular addresses, consisting of four double bedrooms and offered with no onward chain. Modernisation is needed throughout and offers the next buyer the exciting opportunity to make it their own. Bootham Crescen..."
"A fantastic opportunity to buy this unique property, located right in the heart of York’s bustling city centre. Situated just a stones throw from York Minster this fabulous townhouse is set over 5 floors and has been incorporated into the modern Stonegate Court development. The property h..."
"A wonderful opportunity to update and redesign this detached family home in a highly desirable area of York, with the university less than half a mile away"
AN EXTENDED 5 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH A 1 BEDROOM ANNEXE SET IN THIS HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL AREA CLOSE TO POPULAR LOCAL AMENITIES AND WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE RAILWAY STATION AND THE CITY CENTRE. With the benefits of a good sized garden and off street parking the spacious...
"A truly charming property located on one of York's most sought after addresses. Moorgate is a beautiful treelined avenue positioned within 1.5 miles of the city centre, railway station and local amenities. Nearby is the beautiful nature reserve of Hob Moor. Also the property sits with easy reach ..."
"A beautifully presented, two bedroom townhouse in the hugely popular Nether Poppleton, close to York’s outer ring road. Upon entering the property you have an entrance porch which leads through to the living room. The living room has a large window to the front elevation and a useful understa..."
"Enjoying a discreet location tucked away in the hears of this historic city with York Minster views, this delightful mews apartment offers luxurious accommodation with secure parking. It is a unique home and requires viewing in order to be fully appreciated. It would make an ideal second proper..."
"A stunning and substantial period house with a charming rear garden, in a sought after position on the edge of the city."
"****FULLY COMPLIANT HMO**** A fully compliant and let SIX BEDROOM HMO in an enviable location, set to bring in an annual return of £45,552 exclusive of bills for the 2023/2024 academic year."
70% NOW RESERVED. An impressive three bedroom penthouse apartment available in the new Cocoa Works development.
"NO FORWARD CHAIN - An outstanding four bedroom, period terrace with forecourt on this quiet residential street just off Bishopthorpe Road and moments away from Rowntree Park. The property has recently been extended and undergone a full programme of refurbishment to an exceptionally high standard ..."
This fantastic modern end-town house has spacious accommodation laid out over three floors including three double bedrooms and benefits from a garage with additional off street parking.
"Amazingly large townhouse with five double bedrooms, two bathrooms plus WC, breakfast kitchen and seperate dining area, single garage and off street parking, front and rear gardens and all just a short walk into the centre of York and close by to St Peter's School."
A stunning refurbished two bedroom duplex apartment with secure parking within an historic building in the heart of the city.
"An impressive, extended SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE with LARGE GARDEN and DOUBLE GARAGE, set in an enviable location close to the highly sought after STOCKTON LANE area of York"
IMMACULATE FAMILY HOME
"A truly stunning, four bedroom detached home in the sought after Huntington area of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. There is also a downstairs W.C and built in cupboard. To the rear of the property is the magnificent, e..."
"Two semi detached bungalows and a rear plot with potential located on the popular Beckfield Lane. Separated into two properties by the current owner, these two bedroom bungalows have been popular for let and provide the current owner with an income. The accommodation in brief - "
"A surprisingly spacious, immaculate and beautifully appointed 3 bedroomed garden fronted Town House, built to a high specification with contemporary fittings, and enjoying a delightful sunny position overlooking the feature Chocolate Orange Sculpture and greens, within this highly popular and awa..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. An impressive three bedroom, penthouse apartment available in the new Cocoa Works development."
"Charming townhouse situated in a highly desirable area, the property is well positioned for the city centre."
This stylish property offers versatile living accommodation over three floors and benefits the highest levels of energy efficiency including underfloor zoned heating throughout and heat and noise insulating glazing. The property is situated in this sought after location just over half a ...
"This hugely impressive semi-detached property has been extended to offer five bedrooms, three generous reception rooms and is set on a spacious plot with a delightful lawned rear garden."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! A beautifully presented four bedroom, three-storey townhouse that has undergone a course of renovations; including all bathrooms, kitchen and a new boiler, is located on a sought after street in the heart of York city centre. Upon entering the property you have an en..."
Large Open Plan Kitchen/Diner/Living Space | Generous Garden | Perfect Family Home | En-suite to Master
"This impressive four storey modern town-house offers five bedrooms, spacious living accommodation and the huge advantage of two secure allocated parking spaces."
"A luxury two bedroom second floor apartment with lift access and parking space, within the city walls with views towards Lendal bridge"
"*** VIEWINGS FROM 25 MARCH 2023 *** A fantastic forecourted, period three bedroom townhouse, retaining a wealth of original features, being situated within the very heart of the ever popular south bank area of York, only a few minutes walk from ‘Bishy Road’."
"Set to the east of York, within close proximity to city centre, local amenities of Monks Cross and Vangarde shopping centre, as well as the green spaces of Monkstray, is this substantial four bedroom semi detached home. Extended over the years, this property is the perfect family home, ..."
"**** ATTENTION INVESTORS **** A charming bay fronted Edwardian property with the versatility to become a family home or continue as an investment property with six bedrooms estimated to bring in a combined gross income of approx. £38,000 from July 2022 to July 2023. New contract has been sig..."
"A superb opportunity to acquire this 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow in the sought after location of Acomb, with many amenities close by."
"This substantial detached bungalow is set just off Tadcaster Road, to the south west of York in an ideal position for access to the city centre as well as excellent transport links. The Spinney is a small collection of properties occupying a cul de sac location which offers a real sense of peace ..."
NO FORWARD CHAIN - LARGE LIVING AREAS - SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ONTO PLAYING FIELDS - POTENTIAL FOR FURTHER EXTENSION! Churchills are delighted to offer for sale this fabulous four bedroom detached family home in this highly sought after residential area convenient for York City Centre and the o...
A beautifully presented and sympathetically updated VICTORIAN TERRACED HOUSE with CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN and SECOND FLOOR attic bedroom situated inside the city walls.
"An extended semi detached home located in the popular residential area of South Bank, just off Bishopthorpe Road, and set on a larger than average plot. Offering spacious living accommodation throughout, this property could make a wonderful family home as it is also situated close to a ..."
"Investment opportunity.  This licensed HMO currently producing gross rent of £34,800 (with opportunity to increase) has 5 double letting rooms, all fully occupied and presents a superb opportunity for an investor.  Located in Heworth it provides good access to both universities..."
"A fourth floor holiday let apartment with a distinctive and modern corner of glass, ideal for city central living or investment. Currently achieving approximately £3418.37 gross Income per month. Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged over s..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase this unique family home in a sought after residential location to the west of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance porch which leads through to a hallway with downstairs W.C and built in storage cupboard. The kitchen is located to the ...
"A large extended family home with an added WOW! If you are looking for a detached property with generous room sizes, wow factor kitchen and two bathrooms with additional cloakroom, utility room and garage....STOP you have found it here with Quantum! This property is sure to sell fast, please call..."
"An individually designed single storey detached property providing an exciting opportunity to refurbish and create a very special home. The property extends to some 1935sq ft and is built around a central courtyard garden with a mature tree in the middle and offers 4 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms, a 42ft..."
"Simon Says ""This extended home offers so much space and flexibility to its 1700 sqft of living accommodation including a conservatory offering lovely views down the garden, which with its west facing orientation enjoys sunshine throughout the day until the evening. This will appeal to many f..."
"A modern apartment converted from a beautiful period building within the heart of York city centre offering a range of period features with modern facilities. St Leonard’s Place is an iconic building situated within York’s cultural heart, being neighbours of the York Theatre Royal, York..."
"WELCOME TO KEITH AVENUE, this stunning completely modernised and extended double fronted house situated in the popular village of Huntington close to the schools and amenities. Four double bedrooms, two bathrooms and open plan living space make this a perfect family home ready to move into."
"Are you looking to be close to York, require five good sized double bedrooms and a number of reception rooms, then look no further as you will not be disappointed with what this wonderful property has to offer. The current vendors have beautifully maintained the property over the years, creati..."
"Charming end of terrace with excellent renovations, in highly sought after area within city walls."
"An exclusive development of just eight luxury apartments with private balconies and parking, overlooking the River Foss and Clifford's Tower."
"A beautiful semi detached home built in 1925 and set on a generous plot, boasting a vast rear garden with a west facing aspect. This property has been updated by the current owners yet still maintains a swell of original features, such as ceiling covings, fireplaces and picture rails. Located to..."
"Set on this enviable corner plot, just off Stockton Lane, is this extended three bedroom semi detached home. Located to the east of York and within close proximity to varied local amenities, such as Monks Cross & Vangarde shopping centres, schools, commuter links to the city centre and further af..."
"A stunning four story, five bedroom townhouse in a sought after residential development just off Tadcaster Road. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway which gives access to the integral garage as well as the downstairs W.C and boiler cupboard. There is a useful room to the r..."
We are pleased to offer to the market this wonderful Mid terraced property in the sought after location of Upper Price Street. Set a short distance from Bishopthorpe Road the property is close to all the local amenities and has a quiet feel while still being within a mile of York City Centre. T...
"Just a short walk from the acclaimed Bishopthorpe Road, historic city walls and York Knavesmire, is this period mid terrace home which retains many original features. Much loved for many years, this property has been a wonderful home and is ready to move in to by the next owners. Intern..."
"A substantial family home set in the popular residential area of Acomb, offered with no onward chain. Acomb is positioned to the west of York and benefits from a variety of local amenities, schools and commuter links to York city centre, whilst also being close to the ring road for quick access t..."
"Situated in the popular and sought after HEWORTH area of York is this extended and beautifully presented TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE offering SUPERB FAMILY ACCOMMODATION good sized garden, garage and off street parking."
City centre penthouse apartment with outstanding York Minster views.
"Located to the south of York just off Tadcaster Road, and a short stroll to the the Knavesmire is this immaculate three bedroom detached home. The property has been extended to create spacious living accommodation, and has been cosmetically updated to the highest of standards, including a new boi..."
"A three bedroom, semi detached home in a popular residential area with a wealth of local amenities. Upon entering the property you have a spacious entrance hall with stairs leading to the first floor and a useful built in pantry. The first reception room, currently used as a dining room, is l..."
"With features including FRENCH DOORS off the kitchen / diner / family room, a FEATURE BAY WINDOW in the lounge, a SEPARATE LAUNDRY ROOM, a DOWNSTAIRS WC, EN-SUITE TO TWO OF THE BEDROOMS, a DRESSING AREA in principal bedroom, an INTEGRAL GARAGE, a 10-YEAR NHBC WARRANTY included and the ability to ..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A sumptuous two bedroom penthouse apartment with both a bathroom and an en-suite, available in the new Cocoa Works development."
"This is a brand-new fourth floor apartment in the superb Icona Development - an exemplary collection of 32 Apartments offering sophisticated and stylish living. These apartments benefit from lift access, a private balcony per apartment and well-maintained communal areas. Icona is York's entry in..."
***STUNNING FAMILY HOME ***SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION ***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS ***SUPERB EXTENDED SCAMMEL KITCHEN/DINER ***UTILITY ROOM ***CLOAKROOM/W.C ***HOME OFFICE LODGE ***GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN ***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES ***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT ***VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED***
"Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged over seven floors, with the advantage of secure undercroft residents parking and a grand entrance foyer with concierge service. Due to its stature and setting, Ryedale House offers unparalleled views across York..."
"A two bedroom, two bathroom penthouse apartment with private parking and decked terrace. Currently run as a successful holiday let investment property, earning £40,000 in the first six months of this year."
"Located off Bootham, and on the desirable road of St Olaves Road, is this beautiful Victorian town house with impressive bays and a forecourt entrance. This property has been well maintained by the current owner and offers spacious living throughout whilst being within walking distance of the cit..."
"An Investment property to purchase with tenancy in place with a gross annual income of £25,200. This represents a 5.04% gross yield. A superb fourth floor apartment offered at this discounted price in this superb position this sought after and central development development. ..."
*** Ideal family home situated in popular residential location with no onward chain ***
A stunning three bedroom duplex apartment in an exclusive development in the heart of York city centre. The development is accessed via a communal entrance with intercom system. Upon entering the communal hall there is a lift and stairs leading to all floors. Upon entering the apartment i...
Modern two bedroomed apartment in a highly sought-after area of York
"*** Great investment opportunity achieving a 5.5% return with four individual rooms rented out for a total of £2,300pcm ***"
"Investment opportunity.  A stylish two double bedroom apartment in this modern, sought after and central York development.  With a wrap around balcony, a living area bathed in natural light from extensive windows it also benefits from 2 secure parking spaces, modern fitted kitchen, b..."
A superb four bedroom Victorian terraced house within an ideal location of York.
"A substantial city centre apartment in excess of 1100 square feet ideally positioned in the heart of YO1. This enviably quiet position could not be more convenient; just off Walmgate, York's premier area for sophisticated socialising and eating out. This significant 2 bedroom apartment commands ..."
"House/duplex apartment in a landmark Georgian building just outside York city walls, with parking."
"Situated in an enviable location just off Malton Road in the popular Stockton Lane area of York, this attractive extended, THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW offers SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION, a conservatory and low maintenance gardens."
"Ryedale House is an exclusive luxury apartment within the city walls. Situated on the sixth floor, this two double bedroom apartment with two bathrooms is ideal for either city central living or as a holiday home. Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged o..."
"With features including DETACHED GARAGE, FRENCH DOORS to lounge and dining room, FEATURE BAY WINDOW in SEPARATE DINING ROOM, EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, a 10-YEAR NHBC guarantee and the ability to PRE-RESERVE ONLINE, this fantastic 4 bedroom detached home on Langley Gate development could be y..."
"A spacious and smartly presented townhouse, with a garage and a garden, conveniently placed in the centre."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom period home located in a sought after location just off Haxby Road, boasting a short twelve minute walk to the city centre. This home has been tastefully designed throughout with a spacious primary bedroom on the second floor as well as a fantastic rear garden."
"A spacious 5 bedroom townhouse within the city walls in one of York s most prestigious modern developments. The accommodation comprises on the ground floor a spacious entrance hallway, study, cloakroom/w.c, utility room and a superb kitchen/dining room with french doors opening onto a pr..."
This property occupies a bold corner plot position within this very popular modern development situated under one mile from the Clifton Moor retail and leisure complex. The internal accommodation begins with a porch area before reaching the spacious lounge with large windows and open plan di...
"A rare opportunity to purchase a substantial five bedroom semi detached, located to the North of York, off Malton Road, near Vanguard and Huntington. The property is set with open fields to the front, and a generous private-feeling garden to the rear. The stand-out feature is the large ..."
"An IMPRESSIVE SECOND FLOOR, two bedroom apartment, located in the SOUGHT AFTER, AWARD WINNING, PRESTIGIOUS, HQ development within the city walls with excellent access to YORK CITY CENTRE and the railway station. **Fully Complete and Available to View**."
A beautifully presented semi-detached THREE STOREY TOWNHOUSE offering flexible living space throughout. Situated within a modern development lying just off Tadcaster Road and within easy reach of York city centre and the A64 serving the motorway network.
"A charming, double fronted Victorian TERRACED HOUSE, in need of MODERNISATION THROUGHOUT, set in a superb location tucked away below the CITY WALLS yet within easy reach of the city centre and the vibrant shopping and restaurant life available on Micklegate."
A wonderfully presented traditional four bed terraced property which has been thoughtfully renovated and lovingly maintained throughout with lovely walled gardens and views of York Minster.
"A beautifully presented, three bedroom detached bungalow that has undergone a significant course of renovation by the current owner in the highly sought after Heworth area of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway that gives access to all other ground floor rooms. T..."
"A beautifully presented 4 double bedroom, 2 bathroom detached family house with a stylish open plan kitchen/dining room and a private lawned rear garden. "
"A well presented, spacious three bedroom home with a fantastic sized garden and countryside views, located in the highly sought after village of Nether Poppleton."
"Welcome to this exceptionally spacious and welcoming four bedroom semi detached property located on the very popular road of Beckfield Lane in York. This home has an abundance of sort after features, including generous sized gardens, good sized bedrooms and a beautiful open plan kitchen family room."
A beautifully presented three bedroom period end terraced house situated in South Bank with stunning views of York Racecourse.
**NO ONWARD CHAIN **DESIRABLE LOCATION OF HOLGATE **VIEWING HIGHLY ADVISED **EASY ACCESS TO CITY CENTRE **TRADITIONAL THREE BED SEMI **THREE PIECE FAMILY MODERN BATHROOM **MODERN FITTED KITCHEN**ENCLOSED PRIVATE GARDENS **OFF STREET PARKING **SINGLE DETACHED GARAGE**VIEWING A MUST**
"Stephensons are pleased to offer for sale this stunning forecourted three bedroom period townhouse. Beautifully kept and maintained, retaining a wealth of its original features. Close to the ever popular Bishopthorpe Road high street, this house is sure to appeal to any discerning buyer."
"This wonderful home is set just off Carr Lane, to the west of York; well placed for access to the city centre and just a short walk from the wealth of amenities the local area has to offer. Much improved by the current owners and beautifully presented throughout, the accommodation is modern and f..."
"Set in the quiet residential area of Woodthorpe, ideally positioned for easy access to the city centre and the A64, is this stylish & modern four bedroom detached home. The property has been much improved by the current owners and is immaculately presented throughout. Internally the ho..."
"A charming three bedroom period terrace home in the sought after residential area of Heworth, approximately half a mile from York’s historic city walls. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. the living room is located to the front of t..."
"Set to the west of York, this substantial semi detached home has been thoughtfully extended and improved to offer spacious and flexible accommodation. Askham Lane is a leafy street set just a short walk from the heart of Acomb and its many varied amenities as well as being well placed for access ..."
Spacious First Floor Apartment | No Forward Chain | Balcony and Separate Communal Courtyard | Bathroom and En-Suite Wet Room
"Located to the east of York within the highly regarded Derwenthorpe development, this immaculately presented four bedroom home offers spacious and versatile living accommodation. This family home is ideally placed for easy access to the city centre, University of York, whilst within close proxim..."
"A lovely 4 double bedroom, 2 bathroom detached family house with a fabulous west facing rear garden."
"An Investment property to purchase with tenancy in place with an approximate gross annual income of £23,400. This represents a 4.98% gross yield. A superb third floor apartment offered at this discounted price in this superb position this sought after and central development development..."
Open House Saturday 18 March 10:30am -12noon An exciting opportunity to restore a townhouse on one of York's best streets
"70% NOW RESERVED. This brand new two bedroom, fifth floor apartment has over 1000 square ft. of living space."
"A well presented and substantially extended four bedroomed semi detached property located on a generous corner plot with attractive surrounding gardens, detached tandem garage and timber summer house. This family home is ideally positioned for easy access into York city centre, A64 with the Askha..."
***ENJOYING THIS FANTASTIC POSITION ***SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED FAMILY HOME ***FOUR GOOD SIZE BEDROOMS***THREE RECEPTION ROOMS ***CUL DE SAC POSITION ***BRIGHT AND AIRY ***WELL PRESENTED ***ENCLOSED GARDEN ***DESIRABLE LOCATION ***EASY ACCESS TO YORK RING ROAD***HIGHLY RECOMMEND A VIEWING
"A fantastic four bedroom family home is down a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular residential location of Rawcliffe. This wonderful property boasts spacious interiors & exteriors, surrounded by many amenities on Clifton Moor, local schools & great transport links to the city centre & outer ring road."
A newly built and superb four bedroom semi detached finished to a high specification and set within a popular residential location close to York city centre.
"This is a brand-new first floor apartment in the superb Icona Development - an exemplary collection of 32 Apartments offering sophisticated and stylish living. These apartments benefit from lift access, a private balcony per apartment and well-maintained communal areas. Icona is York's entry int..."
"**** NO ONWARD CHAIN **** A spacious detached house which offers significant potential for further expansion and improvement, situated in this most sought after location, and benefitting from single garage and lawned rear garden."
Welcome to this immaculately presented and spacious four bedroom semi detached family home in a fantastic location just off Boroughbridge road. With an amazing open plan kitchen diner with bifold doors overlooking the private and extensive rear garden.
"An immaculate two double bedroom duplex apartment on the second floor, which is accessed through a most impressive Art Deco entrance with an on-site concierge. The apartment was only completed in 2016 as part of this fantastic conversion to an incredibly high standard, retaining and enhancing ma..."
"A wonderful period home with stunning views over The Knavesmire, boasting three bedrooms and two reception rooms."
"We are excited to bring to market this outstanding property, in the sought after area of Nether Poppleton in York. This property is perfectly located near to the ring road of York making access to York and surrounding areas very easy. Nearby is also a train station and local amenities. The proper..."
A superb top floor 3 bedroom apartment in this popular residential development in the heart of the City.
"A terrific example of a 1930s semi-detached house, greatly improved and extended to create fabulous living areas within this popular and convenient White House Estate just of Tadcaster Road and moments away from Hob Moor and the Knavesmire. This beautiful property is also just a short walk into Y..."
** AVAILABLE TO VIEW ** A superb TWO BEDROOM penthouse floor apartment with BALCONY in an enviable location WITHIN the CITY WALLS close to the city centre and RAILWAY STATION. RARE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY.
"A wonderful family home set in the popular residential area of Rawcliffe. Set to the north of York, and within a popular residential area, is this spacious and extended three bedroom detached home. Much loved over the years by the current owners, this property is ready to move into. Hol..."
"A beautifully presented, four bedroom detached home in the sought after residential area of Osbaldwick. Upon entering the property there is a hallway housing the stairs to the first floor. The first reception room is a great living space with generous lounge area which in turn opens out to t..."
"An attractive Victorian townhouse in a popular residential area of York, benefiting from a lovely garden and off street parking."
A spacious and well proportioned four bedroom MODERN DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated in a prime location close to the York outer ring road and within easy reach of York City centre.
"The opportunity to purchase this project property, that has already been extended by the current owners to create an approximately 2183 sq ft, four bedroom, semi detached home on a significant plot. Located at the end of a quiet cul de sac, set to the east of York and is ideally place..."
"Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged over seven floors, with the advantage of secure undercroft residents parking and a grand entrance foyer with concierge service. The distinctive building is much larger than similar developments standing tal..."
"A beautifully presented period home positioned in the sought after area of Acomb, walking distance from the varied local amenities Front Street has to offer, commuter links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road. Beautifully presented throughout with generous living accomodation..."
"This wonderful town house is located in the heart of the city, in a quiet quarter yet just a short walk from vibrant hustle and bustle of the city's shops, bars, eateries and varied amenities. Set over three floors, the property offers spacious and flexible accommodation which briefly co..."
"A four bedroom detached student let investment property with a driveway, located behind York St John University. Currently operating as a four bedroom student let, situated in a central and convenient location less than half a mile from the city centre itself, with a range of local am..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. This brand new two bedroom, first floor apartment has fantastic open plan living space, high ceilings and large windows."
"A wonderful three bedroom detached property located in the renowned Stockton Lane area. A unique property for the road, this family home offers spacious living accommodation and a contemporary design throughout. Located to the east of York, access to Monks Cross shopping centre and Vang..."
"Simon Says ""A great family home which has four bedrooms and an open plan Kitchen leading to 18' Orangery with bi-folding doors. The garden hosts a Bar which creates the perfect space for entertaining guests!"""
"Located in the extremely popular residential area of Knapton Lane, occupying a plot of approximately 35 of an acre, is this beautifully presented and well-appointed 3 bedroomed semi-detached bungalow with separate self-contained one bedroomed annex. The bungalow has been sympathetically extended..."
"An immaculately presented two bed duplex with private terrace, situated in one of the most sought after areas of York."
"Located in one of York’s most sought-after streets is this charming, three bedroomed Edwardian period terrace property. The property is situated in a quiet location close to Bootham and with easy access to the city centre, York railway station and all its amenities as well as easy access to ..."
Beautifully decorated two bedroom apartment close to the race course with the benefit of two parking spaces.
70% NOW RESERVED. A sumptuous two bedroom penthouse apartment with a fantastic roof terrace and high specification throughout.
"70% NOW RESERVED. A superb two bedroom apartment with both a bathroom and an en-suite, available in the new Cocoa Works development."
"This is a brand-new third floor apartment in the superb Icona Development - an exemplary collection of 32 Apartments offering sophisticated and stylish living. These apartments benefit from lift access, a private balcony per apartment and well-maintained communal areas. Icona is York's entry int..."
"A modern and very well presented five bedroom detached family house with accommodation arranged over three floors. The accommodation briefly comprises; two spacious reception rooms, breakfast kitchen with integrated appliances, utility room, cloak room/WC, five bedrooms including two ..."
"This impressive four bedroom, three storey modern town-house is located in a sought after area just a stone’s throw from the heart of the city centre."
"A well presented MODERN DETACHED HOUSE situated within a HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION lying within easy access of York city centre, outer ring road and the village of POPPLETON."
"A superb two-bedroom detached bungalow, constructed in 2010, and choicely situated in a peaceful location off Tadcaster Road. Finished to a high standard, the property has underfloor heating installed throughout, with solar thermal panel and low-wattage lighting offering reduced running costs and..."
"A superb four bedroom detached family home, presented to a very high standard with integral garage and ample off-road parking. The property is situated in a sought-after location in Rawcliffe and is conveniently placed to access the wide-ranging local amenities. Offering generous and fl..."
"An immaculate two bedroom duplex apartment within a prestigious development with balcony and two parking spaces, ideally placed for the local amenities and the train station."
**** SKILFULLY EXTENDED **** A comprehensively improved and significantly extended semi detached dormer bungalow offering substantial and flexible family living accommodation and set within this much sought after development.
"Located on one of the most popular Avenues in Acomb, with a generous west facing rear garden, is this three bedroom semi detached home. Much loved over the years and well presented throughout, this property could make a wonderful family home. The internal accommodation comprises an entr..."
"A stunning three bedroom, traditional family home that has been fully renovated throughout to a very high specification, boasting a short walk to local amenities, under a 30 minute walk to the city centre and under a 20 minute walk to The University of York."
***SIX BEDROOMS ***THREE BATHROOMS ***SEMI DETACHED ***VIEWING HIGHLY RECCOMENDED ***EPC GRADE C ***COUNCIL TAX BAND C
"A well maintained, four bedroom, semi detached bungalow in the highly sought after Fulford area of York. Upon entering the property there is an entrance porch leading through to the lounge diner which runs the full length of the property. There is a bay window to the front elevation filling t..."
"A beautifully presented and EXTENDED, SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, situated in a cul-de-sac location in the popular RAWCLIFFE area of York."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A superb two bedroom first floor apartment with both a bathroom and an en-suite, available in the new Cocoa Works development."
Stunning open plan kitchen/diner/lounge | Excellent location | Beautiful family home
"A beautifully presented, three bedroom, semi detached home in a highly sought after residential location just off Tadcaster Road. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with understairs storage cupboard and downstairs W.C with plumbing for a washing machine. The living room i..."
"A modern and luxurious 2 bedroom apartment with parking and views over the river Foss, set within the city walls."
"OVERLOOKING WEST BANK PARK - An extended four bedroom semi-detached house in this highly sought after Holgate area, convenient for York city centre, Acomb Front Street and a short walk to schools, shops and the railway station. The property is also opposite to the popular West Bank Park and a 12..."
"A beautifully presented, two bedroom detached bungalow in a highly sought after development in the Fulford area of York. The development is adjacent to the local Fulford school. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hall that gives access to the majority of the other rooms. There is..."
"Simon Says ""One of the finest examples of a Scarcroft Road period terrace, complete with double bedrooms, original features, first floor bathroom and south/west facing yard at the top of the street!"""
"Situated in this picturesque and traditional Avenue just off the main street of Acomb, with its range of shops and local amenities, this attractive traditional semi detached house offers a perfect opportunity for the discerning family. The property has been extended to the rear to provi..."
A beautifully presented 3 bedroom period terrace house with a south facing garden situated just 0.2 miles south of York’s city walls.
"A lovely mid terrace period house, situated in the extremely sought after Scarcroft Road area of York just a stone's throw from the vibrant hustle and bustle of Bishopthorpe Road shops. The property has been well maintained by the current owners and briefly comprises; entrance lobby, ent..."
"Stunning 2 bedroom luxury apartment with split level accommodation located on the third floor of one of York's most exclusive developments, The Residence Bishopthorpe Road."
An Investment property to purchase with tenancy in place with a gross annual income of £21300. This represents a 5.01% gross yield. A superb second floor apartment offered at this discounted price in this superb position this sought after and central development development. T...
"A beautifully presented, updated and extended TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE situated in the popular location of New Earswick, with convenient access to the ring road, A64 and city centre."
"Stunning 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom duplex apartment with wonderous views form the balcony, in one of the most most iconic Grade II Listed buildings in York. ** CHAIN FREE **"
"Simon Says ""Built by Messrs Sawdon & Simpson is this immaculate four double bedroom family home which has recently been refurbished by the current vendors and finished to a very high standard"""
"NO FORWARD CHAIN- THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE SET WITHIN THIS SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH OFF-STREET PARKING! Positioned in the heart of York's desirable South Bank, moments away from the ever-popular Bishopthorpe Road and Rowntree Park, and within walking distance of York city centre and th..."
"A beautifully presented genuinely spacious second floor duplex apartment, in the prestigious Square development, built by Nixon Homes. Situated in the sought after York suburb of Dringhouses, with easy access to the A64, and the historic city centre of York. The attractive and well maintained apa..."
"A modern three bedroom townhouse with walled garden and garage, ideally located within the city walls and accessible to the train station"
This extended four bedroom semi-detached family home in the popular area of Rawcliffe is definitely one not to be missed! Offered for sale with no onward chain.
"This substantial detached bungalow is set to the North of York in this most sought after residential area. Connaught Way is well placed for access to the city centre, good transport links and the many local amenities the area has to offer including Huntington village and Vangarde retail park yet ..."
"This is a brand-new first floor apartment in the superb Icona Development - an exemplary collection of 32 Apartments offering sophisticated and stylish living. These apartments benefit from lift access, a private balcony per apartment, well-maintained communal areas and parking available. Icona ..."
"EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN. Located on this quiet cul-de-sac this impressive family sized home is served by many local amenities, schools as well as the outer ring road. The bright and spacious living accommodation comprises entrance hallway, lounge wi..."
TRADITIONAL FAMILY HOME - THREE SPACIOUS BEDROOMS - SOUGHT - AFTER LOCATION - OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN - ATTRACTIVE LAWNED GARDENS - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS - IN NEED OF UPDATING - SMART VIEWINGS ALSO AVAILABLE.
"Bishops Personal Agents bring to the market this fabulous three bedroom Penthouse apartment situated within this distinctive development of Hungate, which is centrally located with the historic city walls. Offering the best in top floor living, boasting some excellent views across the York skylin..."
"A traditional semi detached house situated in this sought after cul de sac location, handy for a range of amenities including the University of York and some of the most sought after schooling in the area. Offered with no forward chain the property briefly comprises; entrance lobby, loun..."
"An impressive two bedroom end-terrace property offering spacious accommodation including two reception rooms, a large fitted kitchen and a first floor bathroom."
"*** Viewing Recommended *** A TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE lying within the sought after Fulford Area of York with good sized front and rear gardens and detached garage. Situated in a quiet location off Fulford Road with easy access to the city centre, an abundance of local amenities, A64 oute..."
"A well presented three bedroom end of terrace situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in a popular location just off Shipton Road boasting three double bedrooms, a ground floor cloakroom, a conservatory, ample parking and storage outbuildings."
A stunning apartment located in the heart of York city centre offering approximately 900 sqft of living space. The development is accessed via a communal entrance with electronic keypad entry. From the communal entrance hall there is a lift and stairs leading to all floors. Upon entering...
"An impeccable 3 bedroom period townhouse with a delightful walled courtyard garden, ideally located close to York city centre."
"An Investment property to purchase with tenancy in place with a gross annual income of £20,100. This represents a 5.03% gross yield. A superb ground floor apartment offered at this discounted price on the ground floor of this sought after development. The properties are fitted..."
"Beautifully modernised and offered with no onward chain is this modern, well presented extended family home. "
A well-proportioned maisonette on an award-winning development in a prime location just off the popular Bishopthorpe Road
"An extended three bedroom semi detached house, with a two bedroom annex ideal for an extra income or for a family member. Located in the pleasant area of Clifton Moor at the end of a private cul de sac. The area benefits from a range local amenities including, restaurants, supermarkets a..."
"Set within the sought after residential area off Scarcroft Road and near the local amenities of the renowned Bishopthorpe Road, is this wonderful period town house which retains many original features. A much loved home, this property has been sympathetically updated by the current owner and is r..."
"Simon Says ""Situated in one of York's most sought after locations is this fabulous period terrace which also boasts some original features but blended in with a modern and contemporary theme. Along with the two bedrooms and a first floor bathroom is an additional loft room accessed via a..."
A deceptively spacious three bedroom detached bungalow situated on this generous plot with gardens to all sides and the benefit of a conservatory to the rear. The property has great potential for extension subject to acquiring the necessary permissions. The accommodation amounts to appr...
"A mid terrace house on a sought after development of ""environmentally friendly and energy efficient homes."" They have been expertly designed to be as innovative as they are practical. Located to the east of York within the highly regarded Derwenthorpe development, benefitting from acces..."
"A traditional semi-detached property, offering potential to extend (STPP), situated in a highly sought-after location. The accommodation, that benefits from gas central heating and double glazing comprises of an entrance porch, entrance hall, living/dining room and a kitchen. To the first floo..."
"This superb York terrace sits on a residential street, within walking distance of the city walls and York Minster. Closer to hand are Glen Gardens with children’s play area, local shops and a primary school. Upon entering the property there are original tiles in the hallway and a..."
"An immaculately presented 3 bedroom semi-detached house enjoying open views, situated in the popular Fulford area of York."
"Redmove are proud to offer for sale this recently refurbished four bedroom detached home in a desirable location just off Stockton Lane. Completed to a high standard and briefly comprising; four / five bedrooms, two bathrooms, modern kitchen, lounge and a private rear garden! "
"Bishops Personal Agents bring to the market a fabulous mid terraced house, located in the very popular location of Heslington Road with a wealth of elegant and charming period features including cast iron fireplaces with marble surrounds and ornate ceiling coving. Set back from the road side, thi..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A wonderful two bedroom, fourth floor apartment placed in the new Cocoa Works development."
"Lying within a small development in the attractive village of Osbaldwick, this much loved 1970's LINK DETACHED HOUSE offers good sized accommodation, a delightful garden and garage."
"70% NOW RESERVED. An exceptional two bedroom, third floor west facing apartment placed in the new Cocoa Works development."
"Westgate Apartments is a sought-after development adjacent to the River Ouse, just outside the historic walls of York."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after area of Acomb. Close to the varied local amenities that Acomb has to offer and situated on a peaceful cul-de-sac, this home is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers. Much loved over the years, thi..."
"A two Bedroom 1st Floor apartment overlooking the river Foss, ideal for city centre living or investment. Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments arranged over seven floors, with the advantage of secure undercroft residents parking and a grand entrance f..."
"An Investment property to purchase with tenancy in place with a gross annual income of £20,100. This represents a 5.09% gross yield. A superb first floor apartment offered at this discounted price in this superb position this sought after and central development development. T..."
"Set to the north of York, this traditional semi detached home has been thoughtfully extended and offers spacious, flexible living space. Florence Grove is a small cul-de-sac of homes in a popular residential area which is ideal for access to the city centre as well as good commuter links and loc..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached home located within the popular residential development of Derwenthorpe. Derwenthorpe is known for its energy efficient homes that have been designed with eco-friendly features including communal biomass heating. Local parks, a central..."
"Situated on this popular residential avenue, close to York city centre, railway station and the local amenities of Acomb, is this three bedroom semi detached home set on a generous plot. This property has been lovingly maintained over the years and offers the next owners the exciting opportunity ..."
"**Attention Investors!!Perfect for Buy to Serviced Accommodation With up to 15% yield. Unique opportunity in this current market, Get in touch to Learn more**"
"Simon Says ""Set on the sunny side of a sought after and tree lined street, is this excellent three bedroom home which also has a conservatory, offering more flexibility to the living accommodation. A great family home with a garden that represents it well!"""
"Beautifully presented throughout is this three bedroom end terrace situated to the west of York in the popular residential area of Holgate. Conveniently positioned for easy access to York city centre, the local amenities Acomb has to offer and further afield via the ring road, this property is su..."
"Ryedale House is an exclusive luxury apartment within the city walls. Situated on the first floor, this two double bedroom apartment with two bathrooms is ideal for either city central living or as a holiday home. Ryedale House is a newly converted development of residential apartments ..."
An exceptional three bedroom apartment situated in the very heart of York City Centre. 
"Bishops Personal Agents offer for sale a fantastic and particularly immaculately presented stylish semi-detached townhouse, situated in the heart of this very popular Sovereign Park development, just off Boroughbridge Road. Offering the best in city suburb living in a quiet cul-de-sac, also perfe..."
"A beautifully presented, two bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW set in a generous corner plot in a quiet cul-de sac location within the highly desirable Heworth area of York"
"NO FORWARD CHAIN. SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING IN THE CHOCOLATE WORKS DEVELOPMENT WITH ALLOCATED CAR PARKING SPACE. We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market a stylish two bedroomed, two bathroom ground floor apartment nestled in this exclusive and highly regarded d..."
Representing an excellent investment opportunity. The mid-terrace property is currently let to four students and has been continuously since pre. 2012. The four double bedroomed property is well presented and has been well maintained by the current owner and the accommodation extends over three f...
"A STUNNING LARGE 2 BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT SET WITHIN THIS MODERN DEVELOPMENT WHICH BOASTS A FABULOUS LARGE COMMUNAL ROOFTOP TERRACE. Access is through a secure communal hallway with lifts to all floors, the apartment is currently used as a holiday let but would also suit professional buyer..."
"*** LAST DETACHED PROPERTY AVAILABLE *** A substantial detached home, The Sundew offers truly flexible living space. Designed with family life and socialising in mind, there is a wonderful open plan dining kitchen and additional reception space to the ground floor, with a cloakroom and stora..."
"A superbly appointed two bedroom first floor apartment, recently constructed and situated on the much sought after Chocolate Works site. "
A well-presented and spacious first floor apartment situated off Bootham within walking distance of York city centre.The apartment forms part of a small development and is offered in immaculate walk in condition.
"This is a well presented four bedroom family home situated down a quiet cul-de-sac in Rawcliffe, boasting a short two minute walk to a good local school as well as great access to the city centre and outer ring road."
"This traditional semi detached home is set to the north of York in a most sought after and convenient location. Saville Grove is a small cul-de-sac nestled in a great residential area yet is within easy reach of York city centre and varied commuter links. A much loved family home, the ..."
This apartment was one of the first to be snapped up within this sought after development when the first release of properties were offered and is now available.
"This is a traditional three bedroomed bay fronted, semi-detached property located in the very popular area just off Hull Road with excellent access to the university and the surrounding road network via the A64. The well-proportioned property has many additional benefits including, planning permi..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment located on a tree-lined road in a most desirable location just off Bootham. Conveniently located close to the city centre. Situation
The Garth is a perfect example of a tastefully converted period property which was built in 1886 for Mr. ..."
"Redmove are proud to offer for sale this larger than average, skilfully extended four bedroom semi detached home in the popular residential area of Appletree Village just off Stockton Lane. Boasting bright reception rooms, ground floor w/c and an ensuite PLUS a larger than average rear garden!"
"A 2 bedroom apartment offering fantastic river views and parking, within this iconic building situated in York city centre."
A charming 3 bedroom semi detached house with a lovely west facing rear garden.
"A fantastic and generous sized three bedroom detached home is situated in the highly sought after, eco community of Derwenthorpe, east of York city centre."
"Located just off Grantham Drive within a quiet cu-de-sac, is this beautifully presented semi detached home offers excellent family accommodation and generous sized rear garden. Segrave Walk is walking distance to York railway station, the city centre, and the amenities Acomb has to offer. "
"An attractive period terrace town house with a grade ll listed facade, centrally located in Monkgate with the rare benefit of allocated and visitors' off street parking within a gated courtyard, offering very well-appointed accommodation boasting fabulous natural light levels and versatile living..."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom 1950's semi detached home in the popular area of Holgate. Whilst walking distance to York city centre and Railway Station, this property also benefits from the local amenities of Acomb's Front Street. Much loved over the years, this ..."
"Set in the most sought after village of Heworth, a short walk from York city centre, is this exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom semi detached home. A much loved family home this property is in need of modernisation. Internally the property comprises a spacious e..."
"A beautifully presented, three bedroom semi-detached home in a highly regarded, modern development to the north of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with understairs storage cupboard and downstairs W.C. The living room is located to the front of the property an..."
"The Clover is a wonderful semi detached home of generous proportions suited to those whose preference is for separate reception space. Totalling 93.9Sqm, the accommodation includes a contemporary dining kitchen giving access to the rear garden through large glazed doors. In addition the..."
"The clover is a wonderful semi-detached home of generous proportions suited to those whose preference is for separate reception space. Totalling 93.9Sqm, the accommodation includes a contemporary dining kitchen giving access to the rear garden through large glazed doors. In addition the..."
IMPRESSIVE DETACHED HOME - THREE BEDROOMS - STYLISH KITCHEN AND BATHROOM - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATIONS - DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE - SMART VIEWINGS ALSO AVAILABLE - CONSERVATORY AND GARDENS.
"- Investment Opportunity - This attractive period property is for sale with an existing tenancy in place which runs the current rental to end June 2023 is equivalent to £23,504 p.a., the signed rental agreement for 2023/2024, inclusive of bills will be approximately £33,250 per annum Eas..."
A beautifully presented and recently renovated three bedroom dorma bungalow situated in the highly desirable location of Fulford offering a short walk to local amenities and being in the catchment area to excellent schools.
"A modern and individual four bedroom detached family house with accomodation arranged over three floors situated towards the end of a cul de sac and offered to the market with no onward chain, consisting of: hallway, downstairs W.C, living room, modern refitted kitchen breakfast room with space f..."
"This is a fantastic three bedroom semi detached home in the highly sought after location of Fulford, south of the city centre. The property is tucked down a quiet cul-de-sac just a 2 minute walk from the sought after Fulford School and a 30 minute walk or a 5 minute drive to the city centre."
"AN EXEMPLARY CITY CENTRE TWO BEDROOM FORECOURT TERRACED PROPERTY. We as agents are delighted to offer for sale this superb period mid terrace house located just off Scarcroft Road, convenient for Bishopthorpe Road shopping parade, York City Centre & Rowntree Park as well as a short walk to the ra..."
First floor apartment in a converted period property.
SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - CLOSE TO WELL REGARDED SCHOOLS - FOUR BEDROOMS - LAWNED REAR GARDEN - DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE/STORAGE - SMART VIEWINGS ALSO AVAILABLE.
"** CHAIN FREE ** Period mid terraced 2 double bedroom property, with modern bathroom on the first floor and a lovely sunny rear courtyard with planting."
"A charming and traditional semi detached property situated in this sought after tree lined avenue just off the main street of Acomb. Close to a variety of amenities and local transport links to York city centre, this property is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers. Immaculately presented throug..."
"A fantastic semi detached home situated in the popular area of Burnholme! With a bright lounge, dining kitchen with central island, four bedrooms and a modern bathroom! Large corner plot, lots of off street parking, a garage and potential to extend further (STPP). "
"WITHIN THE CITY WALLS! THREE BED EXTENDED TERRACED HOME! We as Agents are delighted to offer to the market this delightful period home nestled in a quiet street within the City walls just a stones throw from ""Bishy Road"" approximately 10 minute walk to York's Railway station and all its local ame..."
"The Betony is a wonderful semi detached home, the centre of the home is a modern open plan living space which boasts a fitted kitchen and ample space for dining and seating areas; ideal for family life or entertaining. To the ground floor this home offers an open plan layout with large k..."
A recently upgraded and thoughtfully extended semi-detached home offering spacious open plan living accommodation finished to the highest of standards in this popular location.
"SUPERB EXTENDED THREE BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE ON A CORNER PLOT! Churchills Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family-sized home in this sought after residential area just off Cornlands Road and convenient for York city centre, Acomb Front Street and the outer ring r..."
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, SPACIOUS GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT forming part of the historic Aldersyde House built in the 1800's. Enjoying mature communal gardens, orangery and allocated parking. Situated in an enviable location, off Tadcaster Road providing easy access to the city centre and outer ring..."
"A beautiful three bedroom semi detached home in the popular area of Rawcliffe, a short walk to local amenities and within close proximity to York city centre and further afield via the ring road. Tastefully decorated throughout, this home is ready to move into by the next owners. Intern..."
"This fantastic three bedroom, modern town-house offers generous accommodation laid out over three floors and the huge advantages of a rear garden and an allocated parking space."
"Offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain is this four bedroom end town house situated in a desirable location just off Stockton Lane. With two reception rooms, conservatory, wet room and a south facing rear garden this is ready to move in and add your own stamp!"
"70% NOW RESERVED. A superb two bedroom ground floor apartment with both a bathroom and an en-suite, available in the new Cocoa Works development."
"With features including FRENCH DOORS TO KITCHEN/DINER, a DOWNSTAIRS WC, PARKING FOR TWO CARS, an EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, a 10-YEAR NHBC WARRANTY included and the ability to PRE-RESERVE ONLINE, this fantastic 3 bedroom detached home on Langley Gate development is perfect for first-time buye..."
Spacious 4 Bedroom Townhouse on the outskirts of York City Centre with a 16% Yield
"This hugely impressive, unique detached property offers spacious living accommodation inside including two double bedrooms and a delightful garden with off street parking outside the home."
"A beautifully presented, two bedroom apartment in the popular Hungate development in the heart of York city centre. The development itself is accessed via an intercom system to the communal hallway where there are stairs and a lift leading to all floors. The property itself has an entranc..."
"This fabulous, spacious Town House is sure to appeal to a range of buyers. Occupying an excellent position in this most sought after, award winning development, ""The Chocolate Works"" boasts a real sense of peace and tranquillity yet is just a short walk from the much celebrated Bishopthorpe Road..."
***NEW BUILD END TERRACE ***NO CHAIN ***THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS ***FINISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD THROUGHOUT ***DOUBLE DRIVEWAY PARKING ***STYLISH & MODERN ***DESIRABLE LOCATION ***VIEWING ADVISED
If you are looking for a detached bungalow in the popular area of Acomb Wood then look no further! This three bedroom home is ready for you to put your own stamp on. Sat on a very generous plot and offered with no onward chain!
DELIGHTFUL FAMILY HOME NESTLED IN A VERY HIGHLY REGARDED QUIET DEVELOPMENT 5 MINUTES FROM POPPLETON VILLAGE! DETACHED GARAGE CONVERTED INTO A LIVING SPACE! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this fabulous modern home located right in the top corner of a pe...
AN ATTRACTIVE SEMI DETACHED HOUSE ON A QUIET NO THROUGH ROAD
"Located to the north of York, ideally positioned for access to Clifton Moor retail park, the outer ring road and York city centre is this well proportioned semi detached bungalow. Well presented throughout the internal accommodation briefly comprises; double glazed entrance door leading ..."
"Simon Says ""Tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac in Acomb, is this well proportioned detached home with a larger than expected plot just waiting for someone to put on their own stamp. Offered with no forward chain, an internal viewing is highly recommended!"""
"THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - GOOD SIZED PLOT - SOUGHT AFTER AREA - Churchills Estate Agent are delighted to offer for sale this impressive 3 bed semi detached house in one of York's must popular areas convenient for the City Centre, the outer ring road and served by local shops, schools and amenities...."
"*Investment opportunity* 2 bedroom terraced house just off Bishopthorpe Road with two double bedrooms and a private courtyard to the rear, sold with tenant in situ."
"Positioned on one of York's most sought after avenues, a short stroll from the city centre and the scenic views of the River Ouse, is this impressive two bedroom ground floor apartment. Offered with no onward chain, properties of this grandeur seldom come to market. Accessed through a s..."
"A beautifully presented and substantial family home set over three floors. Offering three double bedrooms and two bathrooms along with a downstairs w.c., this property makes the perfect family home. Tedder Road is a popular residential area within Acomb, close to a variety of amenities, commuter ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom detached home standing in a cul de sac in the popular residential area of Woodthorpe offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain. Large lounge / dining room, modern bathroom, a generous sized rear garden and a garage! "
"An extended four bedroom house in a sought after cul de sac location. Robin Grove lies approximately one mile from the City centre and offers easy access to the City itself, York Railway Station and the outer ring road. The accommodation consists of the following, an entrance hall with l..."
"A three bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after area of Rawcliffe, a short stroll from the picturesque Rawcliffe Lake. Set on a generous plot, with a double garage, this property is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers. The property comprises an entrance hall which, at the end, le..."
"Located in the popular residential area of Huntington, close to a variety of local amenities, commuter links to the city centre and surrounding picturesque green spaces, is this modern three bedroom semi detached home. Much loved of the years, this property is immaculately presented throughout an..."
"A TASTEFULLY PRESENTED 2 BEDROOM FORECOURTED TERRACE HOUSE SET IN ONE OF YORK'S MOST SOUGHT AFTER LOCATIONS CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE AND THE RAILWAY STATION. The property has the benefit of gas central heating and double glazing and comprises entrance hall, lounge with bay window, seperate dining..."
"Bishops Personal Agents present to the market an immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached dormer bungalow, set in a quiet cul-de-sac position right in the heart of Huntington, just to the North of the York and well situated with easy access to the outer ring road and into the York City ..."
"This large period end terrace family house has spacious living accommodation arranged over 3 floors and is presented in excellent condition, consisting: entrance hallway with period style features and tiling, open plan double aspect lounge and dining room and modern kitchen with built-in oven and..."
"Bishops Personal Agents present to the market a fabulous two bedroom apartment with stunning balcony views over Rowntree Park, set in the heart of one of York's most sought after locations, just a short stroll from the ""Bishy Road"" high street and The York Racecourse. This apartmen..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A superb two bedroom fourth floor apartment with both a bathroom and an en-suite, available in the new Cocoa Works development."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a large semi detached home in the popular residential area of Acomb, close to a variety of local amenities, commuter links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road, this property offers potential for further development by way of extensions (subj..."
A stylish 2 bedroom duplex apartment with a private courtyard garden and secure underground parking conveniently situated inside the city walls. 
"A superb two bedroom apartment located right in the heart of the city offering stunning views over the River Ouse, from a generous living space."
The Fern is an impressive semi-detached property offering large proportions. The centre of the home is a modern open plan living space which boasts a fitted kitchen and ample space for dining and seating areas; ideal for family life or entertaining. To the ground floor this home offers a...
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached home in the popular residential area of Acomb, close to a variety of local amenities, transport links into the city centre and further afield via the ring road. With a newly fitted kitchen and bathroom, this property would make a wonderful family home...."
STUNNING COMPLETELY PRIVATE LARGER THAN AVERAGE GARDEN! HIGHLY REGARDED QUIET RESIDENTIAL LOCATION! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this fabulous 3-4 bedroomed semi-detached home nestled in a quiet street to the West of York being close to an array of l...
"An immaculate THREE STOREY END TOWNHOUSE offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS , SOUTH FACING garden and separate GARAGE. Situated in a convenient location within easy reach of the A59 and York city centre."
"A wonderful detached three bedroomed family home within the highly sought after area of Huntington, benefitting from entitlement to the well regarded Huntington Secondary School."
"Located to the north of York is this attractive three bedroom end town house, well positioned for easy access to York city centre via local commuter links, local amenities and schools. Offered with NO CHAIN, this property is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers and could make a wonderful family ..."
"Situated in the popular Woodthorpe area of York is this smartly presented, EXTENDED MODERN SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE lying within easy reach of both the city centre and outer ring road."
The Thyme is a semi-detached home of contemporary design. This property offers flexible accommodation with a lovely light and airy kitchen fitted with a range of units and boasting ample dining space as well as access on to the private garden to the rear. There is a separate reception ro...
"Are you looking for a fabulous extended two/three bedroom end of terraced property with a little twist of imagination and charm in the very popular Acomb location in York? Then come and view this marvellous exceptional home! Just a short stroll from the ""Acomb"" high street, West Bank Pa..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY WITH LARGE PLOT An exciting opportunity to acquire a large semi detached home in the popular residential area of Acomb, close to a variety of local amenities, commuter links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road. Set on a plot of approximately 65..."
"A unique, two double bedroom, Mews Style Bungalow, situated on a private road and benefitting from a separate garage. Perfectly positioned for easy access to the City Centre and ring road."
"An attractive and spacious 3 bedroom semi-detached house that forms part of the award winning Derwenthorpe, an eco and community centric development. David Wilson Homes in conjunction with the Joseph Rowntree Housing Trust, have created a landmark community of energy-efficient homes with a third ..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! An excellent opportunity to purchase this 3/4 bedroom extended semi detached family home set in this thriving and highly popular residential area convenient for York city centre and the outer ring road as well as nearby shops, good local schools and amenities. The property itsel..."
"*** DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY *** Located in the picturesque village of Knapton is this exciting opportunity to purchase a substantial three bedroom semi detached bungalow offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, in need of some modernisation. Sure to appeal to a variety of buyers, this property has the b..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY.....
Wishart Estate Agents are delighted to offer this characterful three-bedroom, railway cottage, situated just off Tadcaster Road. Built around 1875 and oozing charm and character, it has been a much-loved home for more than three decades. "
"***No onward chain*** New to the market is this attractive three bedroom semi detached family home nestled in a quiet residential location in the sought-after area of Osbaldwick, York. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary scho..."
"Large and modern three bedroom apartment, just a short distance from York town centre."
"A three bedroom, semi detached home in a sought after residential location to the West of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. The kitchen is located to the rear of the property and features a range of base and wall units a..."
"A three bedroom, period terrace property located in the popular Fulford area of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway, the first reception room, which is currently used as a fourth bedroom is located to the front of the property and has a feature fireplace creating a f..."
"Situated on the second floor of this sought after development this large two bedroom property enjoys a fantastic location, situated just outside the city walls on Bootham less than 500 metre from York Minster. The property is currently being run as a successful holiday let and given the..."
"A wonderful city centre apartment located in a popular modern development, offering an open plan living space which has direct access onto a generous balcony, overlooking the River Foss."
"A MODERN MID-TERRACED HOUSE, situated just off Skeldergate within the BISHOPSHILL CONSERVATION AREA, lying a short distance from York city centre and an excellent range of shops and restaurants in the vibrant Micklegate area of the city."
Semi Detached House | Conservatory | Garage | Dining Room
"Are you looking for a three bedroom semi-detached house located in the sought-after area of Osbaldwick? Hambleton Avenue is within easy reach of a wide range of local amenities, schools, the University of York and transport links. With Two reception rooms, Three bedrooms, garden and detached ..."
A well presented three bedroom detached home situated just a 15 minute walk from the city centre on Huntington Road. The property is modern and spacious throughout and boasts a sunny patio garden looking over The River Foss.
Extended and refurbished | Attractive gardens | Recently fitted kitchen | Modern bathroom
"This two bedroom mid terrace home is located in the fantastic residential area of Bishophill, a short stroll from the scenic views of the River Ouse and Rowntree's Park, whilst within walking distance of the city centre and York Railway Station. Due to it's position, this property is sure to appe..."
"*** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** Ashtons Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic investment opportunity to purchase two, one bedroom flats in a converted property in the desirable area of Holgate in York, with easy access to the railway station and York city centre. ..."
"A well presented three bedroom SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, located in the sought after area of ACOMB. Positioned on a generous plot with the added benefit of planning permission for a double storey extension."
"A stunning three bedroom detached property in the sought after location of Huntington with its wealth of local amenities. Upon entering the property, you are greeted by an open hallway with understairs W.C and utility space. From the hallway, you enter a beautifully presented living room with..."
***TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME ***NO FORWARD CHAIN ***TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ***THREE GOOD SIZE BEDROOMS ***FISRT FLOOR BATHROOM ***GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM ***UTILITY/OFFICE ***DELIGHTFUL GARDEN ***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES ***DRIVEWAY ***VIEWING A MUST***
"This wonderful semi detached home is positioned to the north of York, well placed for access to the City centre as well as good transport links and varied local amenities. The accommodation is spacious and well proportioned throughout. An entrance hall leads to two good sized reception rooms and..."
"Situated in this leafy side street off Bootham, this attractive 2 bedroom apartment with a garage, in a development of only 8 properties has the benefit of jointly owning the freehold of the 8 properties and garages. This particular property is situated on the third floor and offers spac..."
"This wonderful home is positioned within a most sought after development set just off Tadcaster Road to the south west of York. An ideal location for access to the city centre, varied local amenities and great transport links for those travelling by rail or road. This property is also convenient..."
"Located in the ever popular area of Holgate, within walking distance of York city centre, Acomb's local amenities and a short drive from the ring road is this two bedroom semi detached home. This property is also within the catchment for St Pauls C of E Primary school. Much loved as a family home..."
"A three bedroom semi detached period house with great potential for extension/improvement subject to the necessary planning permissions. Located in the popular village of Osbaldwick, with easy access to the Ofsted rated outstanding, Archbishop Holgate’s School, a Church of England Acade..."
"A delightful semi detached bungalow positioned on a quiet and sought after cul-de-sac within the residential area of Woodthorpe. Having undergone a scheme of modernisation over recent years, this property is immaculately presented and ready to move into. Entering through the front door,..."
"A beautifully presented, three bedroom, three storey Semi-Detached townhouse in a popular residential development just off Boroughbridge Road. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hall with downstairs W.C and stairs leading to the first floor. The hallway leads to the kitchen diner..."
"Set in the popular residential area of Huntington, close to a variety of local amenities including convenience stores, Vangarde shopping centre and commuter links to York city centre, is this three bedroom semi detached home. Much loved over the years, this property is ready to move into and cou..."
"Fabulous two bedroom apartment with Minster views and secure parking. Currently a successful holiday let set within this sought after modern development, only a few minutes walk from York’s historic walls and bustling city centre. This first floor property provides immaculate bright and spacious..."
"A modern DETACHED THREE STOREY TOWNHOUSE situated on a private road lying to the northwest of York within easy reach of local amenities, schools and York City Centre"
"A well-presented, three bedroom terrace house, located less than half a mile from York’s historic city walls. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. the first reception room you come to is currently used as a dining room with an attract..."
"This most attractive, substantial semi detached home is set to the West of York; well placed for access in and out of the City centre, excellent commuter links and the range of local amenities the area has to offer. Much improved by the current owners, the property is ready to move in t..."
"A substantial three bedroom semi detached home located in the popular village of Acomb, a short walk from the local amenities Beckfield Lane has to offer, along with transport links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road. Set on a generous plot, this property offers the next own..."
"A Holiday Let Apartment A distinctive first floor one bedroom apartment in the sought after Ryedale House development. The property can be used as either a wonderful home, long term term or short term rental property. Situated on Piccadilly, York within York city walls a short walk to..."
"A spacious mid-1900's SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE with large garden and garage, conveniently situated close to The University of York, the city centre and A64 serving the motorway network."
"A stunning two bedroom apartment featuring a generous open plan living space with a contemporary fitted kitchen and access to two balconies, overlooking the River Foss."
"Welcome to Stratford Way, this two bedroom detached bungalow must be seen to be appreciated, situated in this highly desirable street."
"A well-presented, three bedroom, semi-detached Dorma bungalow in the highly sought after Huntington area of York. The property is accessed via a side door leading to an entrance porch and then into the kitchen diner. There is a range of base and wall units, space for a table and chairs as wel..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN - 100FT REAR GARDEN! Churchills Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this impressive three bedroom semi detached house with a gorgeous rear garden located in a highly sought after residential location, close to Acomb front street & York outer ring road as well as conveni..."
"A beautifully presented and well-designed two bedroomed ground floor apartment situated in this prestigious and sought after development on the fringe of York just off Tadcaster Road. The property has the benefit of outside space in the form of a private patio accessed from the lounge, a pri..."
"A modern three bedroom, two bath end terraced freehold family house with a larger rear garden occupying a quiet cul de sac location. Consisting: Hallway with built-in storage cupboard, ground floor W,C. modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, good size living room with patio doors openi..."
NO FORWARD CHAIN! TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS! SECURE UNDERGROUND PARKING! MINSTER VIEWS! For sale is this superb first floor apartment located within York's historic walls and walking distance to many city centre amenities and restaurants. Upgraded to a high standard throughout and accessed via a secure...
"Bishops Personal Agents present to the market a very well presented three bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow located in Woodthorpe, just to the South of the York, within easy walking distance of local schools, the local Quaker wood shops and public house, Nature reserve and local amenities. Th..."
A fantastic two bedroom detached home offering spacious living accommodation with enclosed gardens and off street parking upon a gated driveway.
"Simon Says ""Tucked away in a quiet street in Fulford is this fabulous and deceptive period end terrace home with three bedrooms and a first floor bathroom set over three floors. The property also benefits from an attractive courtyard with walled boundary, separate utility room and a second t..."
"Located to the south of York in the sought after area of Fulford is this well presented three bedroom mid town house. Ideally positioned for quick access to the University of York, York city centre, railway station and Bishopthorpe Road via Millennium Bridge, this property is sure to be popular a..."
"A three bedroom, terrace home in a popular residential location approximately a mile to the north of York city centre. Upon entering the property there is an entrance hall with tiled floor leading to the stairs up to the first floor. The hallway gives access to the first reception room,..."
**** CORNER PLOT POSITION **** A most spacious and skilfully extended semi detached bungalow occupying a choice corner position with generous gardens and off street parking.
"A lovely three bedroom semi-detached house offering the benefits of gardens to the front and rear, a garage and additional off street parking space."
"A very well presented three bedroom semi-detached family house occupying a cul-de-sac location in sought after Fulford, with a detached office/studio, ideal for home working and boasting fantastic commuter links to York City centre, A19 and easy access to the A64. The accommodation con..."
Situated on the western side of York in the popular HOLGATE area is this well presented THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED HOUSE that lies within easy reach of the city centre and railway station.
***NO ONWARD CHAIN ***DETACHED HOME ***THREE BEDROOMS ***RECENTLY FITTED KITCHEN ***ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN ***WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT ***DESIRABLE LOCATION ***WITHIN CLOSE PROXIMITY OF LOCAL AMENITIES ***GOOD ACCESS TO OUTER RING ROAD ***WE STRONGLY ADVISE A VIEWING***
"Are you looking for a change of lifestyle, enjoy your independence but require support on occasion, then look no further as Lavender Fields could be the development that you have been waiting for. The site has been developed to provide individuals or couples with a place to make new friends, k..."
Sold with no onward chain is this spacious four double bedroomed mid-terrace property with internal living space extending to over 1000 sq. ft. The property has undergone a skilful and comprehensive modernisation program and an internal inspection is needed to fully appreciate the results. Locate...
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! A 2/3 bed detached bungalow on a generous plot in this popular location convenient for York city centre, Monks Cross shopping park, Huntington village and the outer ring road. The property has an open aspect to the rear and is in need of some updating however offers versatile li..."
"Situated just off this attractive tree lined Avenue, less than a mile from the historic heart of the city we offer this superb second floor apartment forming one of only 8 apartments in this unique development, the freehold of which is also owned by the apartment owners. The property be..."
"A detached bungalow with large south-west facing garden, offered with the advantage of vacant possession and no onward chain in the highly desirable Stockton Lane / Heworth area."
"A lovely, well presented four bedroom home on a spacious corner plot situated in the popular residential area of Acomb, with many local amenities within close walking distance. This fantastic property boasts modern and generous sized interiors throughout."
"Located on the popular Joseph Terry Grove development and a short walk from York Racecourse and Hob Moor, is this modern and well presented two bedroom apartment. Located on the first floor and boasting a balcony off the main reception room, this property could make a perfect home or investment p..."
"Simon Says ""An extended family home with approximately 1,000 sqft living accommodation within catchment of Huntington School with off street parking and an enclosed garden... Offered with No Forward Chain"""
This wonderful semi detached bungalow is set to the north of York in a most popular residential area. Manor Park Road is a collection of homes and is well placed for access to the city centre and good transport links as well as a range of local amenities. Extended and much improved by ...
"A two double bedroom period terrace located on a popular side street close to city, with the advantage of a good-sized rear garden, and convenience of vacant possession and no forward chain."
"A river fronting holiday let also known as the ""Foss View Studio"" is a popular city centre apartment. Nestled in a quiet corner of York city centre standing tall within Yorks historic city walls is the iconic Rowntree Wharf. The development is five stories high, includes a nine storey w..."
Planning for a Single Storey Side & Rear Extension approx 500 sqft | Close to York City Centre | Great Bus Links | Stylish Kitchen
"Superb city centre living, Holiday let opportunity or buy to let... This ground-floor apartment is just stunning. Two large bedrooms, luxurious bathroom, gorgeous modern kitchen with integrated appliances plus allocated parking and a private courtyard."
"A 3 bedroom detached family house with a south facing rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
"A well-presented, three bedroom, end townhouse in a popular residential location less than a miles walk from York station. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway that also houses the downstairs W.C. From the hall you come to the spacious lounge diner with a window to the fron..."
"Located to the west of York is this modern three bedroom semi detached home with well proportioned accommodation set over three floors. The internal accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, a spacious living room/dining area with french doors to the rear, the fitted kitchen benef..."
A fabulous opportunity to purchase a spacious three bedroomed semi-detached bungalow with no onward. The property which is in the favourable Stockton Lane area of York has internal living space extending to over 800 sq. ft. and has potential to be extended to the rear and up into the loft (Subjec...
"This is a superb, two bedroom second floor apartment, perfectly located in the centre of York. With its own underground, secure and private parking space, balcony and spacious rooms throughout, this property has so much to offer!"
A 3 BEDROOM PERIOD MID TERRACE HOUSE SET IN THIS SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. The perfect home for anyone wanting to enjoy the amenities of the Bishopthorpe Road on their doorstep and an easy picturesque walk into the city centre. The property provides well presented living accommodation with gas cen...
"A spacious 2 double bedroom detached property with an extended lounge and extended kitchen/dining room, and two conservatories. The property is situated in a pleasant cul de sac, close to Huntington Secondary school and offers excellent potential for further improvement. Offered with the convenie..."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial bay fronted mid terrace home in the popular residential area of Holgate. Positioned on one of the most sought after addresses in this area, this three bedroom home is in need of modernisation throughout and is sure to be popular amongst a variety o..."
"*** VIEWING ADVISED *** A TRADITIONAL, SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE situated in the popular Rawcliffe area of York with easy access to the outer ring road and A19 Shipton Road."
"We are very excited about bringing this property to the market. Located close to Clifton Moor, it’s very accessible for shopping and entertainment. The property is a beautifully decorated family home ready for the next chapter.  On entering the property through the entrance hall, where there is s..."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom semi detached home set on a generous plot. With options to extend to the rear, side and in to the loft (subject to the relevant planning permissions), this property could become a fantastic family home. Much loved over the years, this..."
This traditional semi detached home is set to the north of York in a most popular residential area which is well placed for access to the city centre and great commuter links as well as a range of local amenities including those that Clifton Moor retail park has to offer. The property h...
"Located to the north of York, is this traditional three bedroom semi detached home in a sought after location close to various commuter links, local amenities and excellent school catchment areas. The property has been a much loved family home, which has been well maintained over the years and no..."
"Fishergate is within walking distance to York city centre along the tree lined route next to the River Ouse. An area that is flourishing with independent cafes, restaurants and shops, this area is popular often amongst a variety of buyers. Offered with no onward chain is this immaculately present..."
***OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN ***QUIET CUL DE SAC POSITION ***POPULAR RESIDENTAIL AREA ***WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT ***NEWLY FITTED MODERN KITCHEN ***THREE BEDROOMS ***GARDENS TO FRONT AND REAR ***GARAGE ***EASY ACCESS TO LOCAL AMENITIES AND YORK OUTER RING ROAD ***EPC RATING D***WE HIGHLY REC...
A 3 bedroom traditional semi detached house offered for sale with the convenience of no forward
NO FORWARD CHAIN - ADDITIONAL LOFT ROOM WITH EN SUITE - SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN - A two/three bedroomed bay fronted mid town house situated in this central residential location convenient for York city centre as well as the Railway station and the outer ring road. Upgraded by the current vendor...
"Located to the west of York, is this immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached home boasting a kitchen/diner and good sized bedrooms. The property has recently undergone a scheme of modernisation and renovation throughout to the highest of standards, sure to appeal to a range of purchase..."
"An immaculate apartment located in the central and popular Hungate development complete with an allocated underground parking space, offered with NO CHAIN. Positioned on the second floor with views looking out to the south and west, this property has been well looked after over the years and is ..."
3 STOREY PERIOD PROPERTY NESTLED WITHIN THE CITY WALLS! NO FORWARD CHAIN! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to offer to the market this substantial Victorian home which is in need of some renovating and updating works so offers the discerning buyer an opportunity to put their own...
"Simon Says ""The most attractive house on the street! From first glimpse this home really catches the eye and then doesn't fail to keep your attention as you take in the generous room sizes, original features and the south facing yard! A fabulous period terrace at it's best!"""
"Located to the west of York, with easy access to the outer ring road and A64 is this immaculate three bedroom semi detached home. The property has been updated and upgraded by its current owner and must be seen to truly appreciated. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall,..."
"We are delighted to offer this spacious and immaculately presented two bedroom apartment located within the Olympian Court Development, which just a short walk from York City Centre. The accommodation briefly comprises an entrance hall, open plan living area with kitchen benefitting inte..."
"OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN, is this spacious three bedroom detached home in the popular residential area of Acomb. A short walk away from local amenities, transport links to the city centre and green open spaces, this property would make an ideal family home. The property comprises an..."
"The Wistow has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors to the garden, a spacious living room, a cloakroom and a built-in storage cupboard. The two bedrooms share the bathroom and there's further storage on the landing. This home comes with the advantage of off-road parking too."
"A three bedroom semi detached house, much loved and well maintained by the current and original owners but now in need of some modernisation throughout. Purchased by the current owners in the 1950's from the well respected Shepherd Homes, this three bedroom semi detached house could off..."
"A spacious END TERRACED PERIOD HOUSE in the popular Groves residential area that lies between Haxby Road and Huntington Road, with easy access to York city centre."
"A well positioned three bedroom end town house, located within the popular residential area of Fulford, offered with no onward chain. Fulford is a well established and popular residential area located to the south of York, and offers quick access to York city centre, ring road and Unive..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom semi-detached home with extensive rear garden and ample off street parking. The property is situated in a sought-after location of Acomb, to the west of York. Acomb is located approximately 2 miles from the city centre, and is well known for its great amenities..."
Spacious two bedroom flat overlooking central York.
3 bedroom semi detached bungalow in a desirable area of York. A specious property with a large garden and off road parking for 2 cars.
"A 3rd floor one bedroom apartment currently operating as a successful holiday apartment in close proximity to York Railway station. Located in The King's building of the highly regarded Hudson Quarter this modern apartment offers easy access to the the city, as well as commuter links via..."
"A beautifully presented bright and airy end terrace home, with sitting room, kitchen diner, two double bedrooms, two ensuites, larger than average garden and off-street parking for two vehicles."
A beautifully presented 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow with the benefit of a loft hobbies space and low maintenance gardens.
Railway Cottage is located on the outskirts of Murton village; one of only two properties. With two first floor floor bedrooms and a large 14' first floor bathroom. There is an office downstairs plus dining kitchen and good sized lounge. There is a sweet rear and side garden but the added and une...
"HIGHLY REGARDED CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION! 100FT SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN! We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this bright and spacious traditional semi-detached family home nestled in a quiet and desirable location off Boroughbridge road, being close to an array..."
"A 3 bedroom semi detached house in need of modernisation with a south facing rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! Delightful fore-courted period terraced home in need of updating work, so gives the discerning buyer chance to put their own stamp on it! With two double bedrooms! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this bright and spacious Victorian terr..."
"With features including a stylish OPEN-PLAN LOUNGE / KITCHEN, EN SUITE to principal bedroom, a 10-YEAR NHBC WARRANTY included and the ability to PRE-RESERVE ONLINE, this fantastic 2 bedroom apartment on Langey Gate develoment is perfect for first-time buyers. Speak to our Development Sales Manage..."
"An attractive four bedroom end of terrace property with accommodation laid out over three floors. For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £280,000 plus Reservation Fee."
"Sold with no onward chain. A very nicely presented and traditional three bedroomed semi-detached property situated in the very popular residential area of Rawcliffe. The property has been extended to the rear, however, it has much more potential to be extended to the side (Subject to necessary pl..."
"Welcome to New Lane, this larger than average semi detached bungalow is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers, with two bedrooms, master en-suite, lounge and dining kitchen."
Two bedroomed semi detached home- offered with NO FORWARD CHAIN. With only two sets of semi detached houses on the street this offers a possible opportunity for a new owner to add to or simply enjoy as is but add their own stamp to. The lounge offers a smart modern fireplace and double glazing. ...
"A deceptively spacious two double bedroom semi detached property situated on a generous plot with off street parking for multiple cars and secure garden, this property is sure to appeal. Located within the popular residential area of Foxwood close to the varied amenities Acomb has to offer, local..."
"Welcome to Linden Close, in the ever popular popular village of Huntington close to the village centre with a post office, range of shops and cafes and in the catchments area for Huntington School."
Convenient location | Extended to the rear | Gas central heating
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this bright and spacious two double bedroom end terraced house with a rear courtyard and store. Partially refurbished with two reception rooms and a modern kitchen, this property is ready for your finishing touches!"
"A Fully compliant and operating C4 HMO property, located on Eldon Terrace in the Groves, Close to the city centre and York St John University"
"A charming 3 bedroom semi detached house with a south facing rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
"Located within a short walk of York City centre and the Railway Station is this spacious duplex apartment, boasting a wealth of features and an allocated parking space. The property has been meticulously well maintained, and is sure to appeal to a range of discerning purchasers. The in..."
"A wonderful two bedroom semi-detached house featuring gardens to the front and rear, ample off street parking and a garage."
"Bishops Personal agents bring to the market a fantastic opportunity to put your own stamp and style on a period mid terraced house currently split into two flats, set in the heart of one of York's most sought after locations off Scarcroft Road in York, just a short stroll from the splendour o..."
Churchills are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house set in this popular residential area convenient for local amenities yet with easy access into York City Centre. The tastefully presented living accommodation has the benefit of gas central heating and UPVC double g...
"A period terraced property in this highly regarded area with the benefit of 3 bedrooms including a converted loft.  With period features, 2 reception rooms and a larger than typical garden/yard its sure to attract much interest.  Early inspection essential to appreciate potential,&nb..."
"A lovely three bedroom semi-detached house offering a garage with additional off street parking and located in a cul-de-sac, in the popular area of Osbaldwick."
- Fantastic income-generating 4 bedroom HMO investment opportunity. - Fully let on new ASTs to long standing tenants. - Excellent location with York City Centre being easily accessible.
"A modern two bedroom mid town house forming part of this sought after development, conveniently placed within walking distance of the city centre and station. The property will make the perfect investment or first time buy. The accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, kitchen and..."
Join us for the PROPERTY LAUNCH on Saturday 18th March - Call now to book your viewing!
"This well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached house is set on a generous plot with gardens to the front, side and the rear."
"This stunning ground floor apartment is nestled within a most sought after development to the south of York. Just a short stroll from The Knavesmire and the wealth of local amenities the much celebrated ""Bishy Road"" has to offer, this immaculate apartment has spacious accommodation whic..."
"Simon Says ""One of the best sized forecourted terrace properties with two reception areas and a first floor bathroom within walking distance of the city centre and the hospital. This home is offered with Vacant Possession and needs to be viewed to be fully appreciated!"""
"This traditional bay fronted three bedroomed semi-detached property, is sold with no onward chain and brought to the market for the first time in fifty years. Located in the very popular Huntington area and benefits from good local amenities and the well-regarded Huntington school, as well as hav..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN - Churchills are delighted to offer for sale this rare opportunity to purchase this two bedroom end terrace house within the award winning residential estate of Ouse Lea, a popular and sought after cluster of modernist housing located a short walk from York City Centre and the ra..."
A beautifully presented 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow with a fabulous landscaped rear garden.
"A THREEE STOREY 3 BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE WITH INTEGRAL GARAGE SET IN THIS POPULAR DEVELOPMENT JUST OFF TADCASTER ROAD WITH EASY ACCESS INTO THE CITY CENTRE AND TO THE A64. The property has the benefit of gas central heating and double glazing and comprises entrance hall, utility room and separate cl..."
"This lovely semi detached home has been updated by the current owners and offers ample off street parking, a private low maintenance rear garden and potential for extension subject to necessary planning permission. Located in the popular village of Huntington, within the school catchmen..."
"OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. An opportunity to purchase a spacious two double bedroom, two reception room, semi-detached Dorma style bungalow with ample off-road parking, detached garage and enclosed rear garden. The property is situated in a sought-after location just off Boroughbrid..."
"A fantastic west facing one bedroom, fifth floor apartment with an allocated parking space. This very attractive unit was one of the first plots to be reserved and is now available again as a contract reassignment."
"A fabulous west facing one bedroom, fourth floor apartment with a private parking space. This hugely attractive unit was one of the first plots to be reserved and is now available again as a contract reassignment."
"A well presented two bedroom end terrace house ideal for first time buyers and investors. The well presented spacious accommodation comprises modern kitchen diner, living room, downstairs WC, two good sized bedrooms, family bathroom, private enclosed rear garden, driveway providing off ..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! NO PETS! DELIGHTFUL APARTMENT IN AWARD WINNING DEVEOPMENT A STONES THROW FROM THE CITY CENTRE AND ""BISHY ROAD"" SHOPPING PARADE! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market a spacious 2 bed second floor apartment nestled in this ever popular loca..."
"A beautifully presented and recently refurbished two bedroom bungalow situated down a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Rawcliffe, a short two minute drive to Clifton Moor Shopping Park which offers a large choice of amenities and shops."
"This wonderful period house offers spacious, flexible living accommodation whilst still retaining the benefits and charm of a property of this age. Situated in the popular and convenient location of Acomb, this area benefits from being a short walk to local amenities and offers easy access to th..."
"Just south of York city centre, our Germany Beck development in Fulford is in an enviable location. The historic village of Fulford is a sought-after location and has fantastic commuter links to York city centre. Situated just off the A19 you'll be able to enjoy easy access to all local major ..."
A superb opportunity to purchase this three bedroom terraced home located in the popular area of Acomb within close proximity to local amenities and the Hob Moor Nature Reserve.
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. LOVELY 2 BEDROOM END TERRACE PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG COUPLES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENT..."
IMPRESSIVE HOME SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION CLOSE TO WELL REGARDED SCHOOLS -STYLISH KITCHEN AND BATHROOM - ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN - OFF STREET PARKING - IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY
"A two bedroom, semi detached home in a popular residential location to the west of York. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hallway with stairs leading to the first floor and a useful understairs storage cupboard. The property has two reception rooms, the first is a lounge lo..."
"**INCREDIBLY PRICED** PRIVATE GARDEN & ENTRANCE** STRONG YIELDS OVER 10%** PERFECT FOR OWNER OCCUPIERS AND INVESTORS** PARKING INCLUDED IN PRICE**STUNNING NEW BUILD DEVELOPMENT** 5 MINUTES FROM CITY CENTRE**
"
"A well presented 3 bedroom end terrace house with a lawned rear garden and a garage, situated 1.8 miles north west of York’s city w"
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK*** FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY *** LOVELY 3 BEDROOM END TERRACE PROPERTY, IDEAL FOR YOUNG / GROWING FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating, double glazing,..."
"A TWO BEDROOM VICTORIAN TERRACED house situated in the popular GROVES area of York, close to the city centre and York District Hospital."
"Set in this small residential development is this very well appointed three bedroom end town house. The property features; engineered oak flooring to the living room with fireplace, modern fitted two tone kitchen cabinets with built-in oven and hob, white bathroom with shower over bath, gardens ..."
"Bishops Personal Agents bring to the market an immaculately presented and charming two bedroom period terrace house, set on the fringes of one of York's most sought after locations in Holgate. This property has been well maintained and updated by the current owner, offering a fabulous balance of..."
A spacious two bedroom second floor apartment part of a popular development located close to the railway station and ideal for accessing the city centre.
An attractive and beautifully presented 2 double bedroom semi detached bungalow which has been recently refurbished and is offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain. 
"We are delighted to bring to the market, this large 2 bedroom period terrace house in a sought after location just off Bootham within a short walk of the city centre. The property provides tastefully presented living accommodation with the benefit of gas central heating and double glazing and co..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! NON-OVERLOOKED TO REAR! We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to offer to the market this substantial semi detached family home, originally a three bed but currently converted into two. Located in a popular spot, close to an array of local amenities as well as only ..."
"We are pleased to offer to the market this wonderful 2 bedroom riverside apartment with southwest facing balcony overlooking the river and with views of the Minster beyond.
Ideally located just outside the city centre the property has great links into the city and the road and rail networks for t..."
Located in a popular suburb of York is this stunning three bedroom family home. Boasting a generous plot and a beautiful kitchen diner the property is a must see!
This beautiful characterful Grade 2 listed home is within easy reach of York City centre and many commuter links via the outer ring road yet is set in a position which offers a sense of peace and tranquillity in this most sought after residential area. Located in the historic village of New Earsw...
A spacious two bedroom second floor apartment located in a popular development close to both the city centre and the railway station.
"OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. An opportunity to purchase a modern, spacious three-bedroom semi-detached bungalow, in need of some updating works. The property is situated in a sought-after location just off New Lane and is conveniently placed to access a range of local amenities to inc..."
"A wonderful two bedroom mid-terrace house featuring two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen and a three piece bathroom."
"This spacious semi detached bungalow is set to the north of York in a most popular residential area. Southdown Road is a small collection of homes in a peaceful location yet is well placed for access to the city centre, good transport links and the many local amenities Huntington village has to o..."
"*** VIEWING ADVISED *** A SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW that would benefit from some cosmetic updating and modernisation, situated in a popular residential area close to Stockton Lane with good access to the A64 and motorway network."
BRIGHT AND SPACIOUS APARTMENT! A STONE'S THROW FROM THE CITY CENTRE! CURRENTLY RUN AS A HOLIDAY LET. IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS ALIKE. We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this substantial apartment set in a converted warehouse just off Lawrenc...
"Situated in the popular Rawcliffe area of York is this lovely semi detached bungalow which has been modernised and maintained to a high standard and is offered with no forward chain. This well presented property briefly comprises; entrance lobby, lounge, modern breakfast kitchen and inne..."
"•	Freehold Ground Rent Investment
•	43 Apartments & “Gazebo” •	Currently Producing £14,300 pa
•	10 yearly Rent Reviews
•	Next Review December 2028
•	999 year lease "
"A well-presented two bedroom townhouse located in a sought after location just outside York’s historic city walls. Upon entering the property you have the living room which offers enough space for sofas and a dining table and chairs, there is also the staircase to the first floor which featur..."
"Looking for your first home? Then you may have just found 'the one'! With three bedrooms, rear and side gardens, driveway parking for two cars and in move-in ready condition, this deceptively spacious end of terrace home is a must see. Located in a popular area of Acomb to th..."
"A beautifully presented END TERRACED HOUSE with garage and parking, set in a MODERN DEVELOPMENT in the ever sought after location of Nether Poppleton."
"A lovely two bedroom bungalow in the sought after area of Badger Hill, east of York City Centre. The home boasts spacious interiors, a well presented patio garden, a 12 minute walk to the University of York and a 30 minute walk to the city centre."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in a desirable location just off Stockton Lane. Boasting a larger than average kitchen, lounge / dining room with feature fireplace, two good sized bedrooms, bathroom and low maintenance gardens!"
"A traditional three bedroomed semi detached home, in need of a course of modernisation throughout, benefiting from a substantial plot with potential to extend subject to necessary planning permission and which is available for sale with vacant possession and no forward chain."
"This beautifully presented period two bedroom terrace home is offered to the market for the first time in nearly 40 years. Having been lovingly owned and modernised throughout by the current owner the accommodation consists of: entrance hallway, dining room, living room, modern refitted kitchen w..."
"An attractive 2 double bedroom, 2 bathroom modern terraced house with a south facing garden situated on a sought after development."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN **IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS **GENEROUS DELIGHTFUL GARDEN **TWO BEDROOMS **POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA **DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS CENTRAL HEATING **CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES **VIEWING ADVISED
***SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME ***END OF TERRACE ***CORNER PLOT ***THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS ***TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ***UTILITY ROOM ***EASY ACCESS TO YORK OUTER RING ROAD ***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES AND SCHOOLS ***VIEWING A MUST***
"If you are looking for a beautifully presented, two-bedroom semi-detached house with quick access to the A64, A1237 and York City Centre, then this property will surely tick all the boxes. The property has been beautifully maintained by the current vendors which is both modern and naturally li..."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A fantastic one bedroom third floor apartment, part of the Rowntree chocolate factory conversion."
"A pretty end terrace house in a great location and modernised to a good standard. Located on a quiet cul de sac off the popular Huntington Road, less that a mile from the city walls, this property offers period features and a range of local amenities. In brief the property con..."
***NO ONWARD CHAIN ***IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS ***THREE BEDROOMS ***OFF STREET PARKING ***SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ***NEW ROOF IN NOVEMBER 2020 ***EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL ***EPC GRADE D***
"70% NOW RESERVED. A fantastic one bedroom second floor apartment, part of the Rowntree chocolate factory conversion."
"70% NOW RESERVED. A fantastic one bedroom first floor apartment, part of the Rowntree chocolate factory conversion."
A spacious three-bedroom mid terrace home which has recently had a new kitchen and bathroom installed in this popular location offering quick and easy access on to the outer ring road and into York City Centre.
"A two bedroom end terrace house with parking to the front and positioned in a quiet cul de sac. Located to the north of York in this ever sought after area, ideal for access to the city centre, varied commuter links and local amenities. Well presented and modernised by the curr..."
"A well presented 3 bedroom mid terrace with a well established rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain. "
This 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow in the popular location of Huntington is ready for you to put your own stamp on! Offered for sale with no onward chain!
A spacious GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT situated in a prestigious modern purpose built block in the sought after BISHOPTHORPE ROAD area of York.
"Churchills Estate Agents are offering for sale this three bedroom mid terrace period house located within this convenient and popular residential area, only a short stroll into the city centre, the railway station and within easy access to the outer ring road. The bright and airy living accommoda..."
Modern bathroom and kitchen | Fantastic location | Detached garage | Excellent schools
***No Onward Chain*** New to the market is this beautifully presented two bedroom property situated in the heart of York close to plenty of local amenities including York City Centre and York Train Station - ideal for commuters. The property boasts fantastic public transport and road links bot...
A luxury one bedroom apartment within the former Terry's Chocolate Factory with the benefit of a parking space.
A 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow occupying a delightful corner plot with a wide frontage incorporating a secluded lawned garden and driveway with space for a garage or extended off street parking. The property offers an excellent opportunity for updating and potential extension (subject to all ...
"A well presented 3 double bedroom mid terrace with a south facing rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
We are proud to offer this one bedroom apartment with MINSTER VIEWS in this stunning development. This generous sized well presented apartment is located on the THIRD floor and is accessed through a most impressive Art Deco entrance with an on-site concierge. The apartment was only comp...
"Choicely located on a quiet side street, just off the highly sought-after Stockton Lane, is this impressive and spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment with garden."
"A lovely and well presented two bedroom home situated in a popular residential area, surrounded by a range of local amenities and conveniences."
"A well-presented, two bedroom, semi-detached home in the highly sought after Huntington. Upon entering the property you have an entrance hall with stairs leading to the first floor. The kitchen is located to the rear of the property and has a range of base and wall units, integrated double ov..."
"Three bedroom mid terraced property in a popular area of York with front and rear garden and off road parking. A great space for families and also with a strong rental history, close to local amenities."
"Located in the popular residential area of Huntington, just off North Lane, is this two bedroom semi detached bungalow offered with no onward chain. Walking distance to the local amenities at Huntington, commuter links to York city centre and a short drive to Monks Cross and Vangarde shopping cen..."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN **TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW **SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION **QUIET CUL DE SAC **VIEWING ADVISED **EPC GRADE D
***NO FORWARD CHAIN***THREE BEDROOM***END TOWN HOUSE***BRIGHT AND AIRY***IN THE HEART OF ACOMB VILLAGE***EASY ACCESS TO YORK OUTER RING ROAD***LANDSCAPED LOW MAINTENACE GARDENS***SINGLE GARAGE***VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED***
Impressive two bedroom apartment located in an affluent area within York.
"Nestled in a quiet corner of York City Centre standing tall within Yorks historic city walls is the iconic Rowntree Wharf. The development is five stories high, includes a nine-storey water tower and is believed to have previously been one of the largest flour mills in Europe when founded by Henr..."
City centre apartment with parking in a discreet corner of York.
A beautifully presented 3 bedroom mid terrace house with a conservatory and a garage en bloc.
"We are really pleased to bring this property to market which is perfect for a first-time buyer, small family or investor. Located in the sought after area of Rawcliffe on the outskirts of the city and close to the ring road and with lots of amenities including, supermarkets, DIY stores, restauran..."
"A forecourted, period terrace house in a sought after location, within walking distance of York Teaching Hospital and York City Centre. The property has been modernised and is currently used as holiday/ service accommodation. The ground floor entrance opens onto the front modern lounge ..."
"This two bedroom end-terrace property offers generous living space downstairs including two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen and a three piece bathroom."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! IDEAL FAMILY HOME OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this substantial, extended, three double bedroomed semi detached family home with a larger than average garden located close to Acomb's bustling shopping para..."
"A smart one bedroom apartment with parking which boasts close proximity to beautiful river walks, historic walls and walking distance to the ever popular Bishy Road. Postern Close is a perfect blend of City living in a quieter location. The apartment is spacious yet cosy with the added bonus of a..."
"Bishops Personal Agents bring to the market a rare opportunity to purchase a unique two bedroom detached house, tucked away at the end of a terraced cul-de-sac off Huntington Road in York, just a short stroll to the York's City Centre, The Hospital and St Johns College. Spread over two floors..."
"Bishops Personal Agents offer for sale just a short distance out of the city of York, a fantastic opportunity to put your own stamp and style on a semi-detached family home, situated in a quiet cul-de-sac. Offering the best in city suburb living, located just to the south/west of York off Borough..."
A spacious two bedroom apartment in York City Centre.
NO FORWARD CHAIN! A highly impressive two bed semi detached bungalow in this popular residential area convenient for both Acomb High-street and York City Centre as well as within walking distance of West bank park allotments and frequent bus services. The property is fully UPVC double glazed and ...
"Located in the ever popular area of South Bank, a short stroll from the acclaimed Bishopthorpe Road, York Knavesmire, racecourse and Rowntree's Park, is this stylish two bedroom mid terrace home. Offering versatility for residential living, long term letting or holiday letting, this property is s..."
"A delightful two bedroom mid-terrace property located just a short distance from the city centre and offering a well-proportioned lounge, a fitted kitchen and a three piece shower room."
Excellent location | Period Terrace | Open plan lounge/dining room
A spacious two bedroom second floor apartment located just a short stroll from the heart of the city centre and placed within an impressive period building.
"Simon Says ""With two double bedrooms and tucked away in a cul-de-sac within Rawcliffe, this home is great for first time buyers and is very well placed for access to the city as well as York Hospital!"""
"Located to the north of York in this ever sought after area, ideal for access to the city centre, varied commuter links and local amenities, this well presented home is sure to appeal to a range of purchasers. Much loved over the years this property is ready to move in to and offered chain free.<..."
AN OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE JUST 1.5 MILES FROM THE CENTRE OF YORK.
**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION **QUIET STREET **SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW **TWO BEDROOMS **GOOD ROAD LINKS **PRIVATE REAR GARDENS **EPC RATING C
"This is a lovely two bedroom semi detached bungalow located in the popular residential area of Woodthorpe. Close to local amenities and a short trip away from York city centre, this property is ideal for any first time buyer or those who are looking to downsize. Offered with no fo..."
"A third floor apartment currently operating as a successful holiday apartment in close proximity to York Railway Station. Located in The King's building of the highly regarded Hudson Quarter this modern apartment offers easy access to the the city, as well as commuter links via the Railw..."
"This well proportioned THREE bedroom mid town house benefits from off street parking, an enclosed rear garden and is conveniently located within walking distance of shops and local amenities and has access to a regular bus route serving the city centre, the district hospital & York's St John's Un..."
"Close to commuter links to York city centre and a variety of local amenities, is this spacious end town house located in the popular residential area of Clifton. The property offers two double bedrooms and is well maintained throughout, this property is ready to move into by the next owners. "
"Extended mid terraced period property ** CHAIN FREE ** in the sought after South Bank area of York, close to locally known ' Bishy Road'."
IMPRESSIVE TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT - WELL PRESENTED THOUGHOUT - ROOF TOP BALCONY - STYLISH FITTED KITCHEN AND SHOWER ROOM - OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN - VIEWS OVER THE RIVER FOSS - SMART VIEWINGS ALSO AVAILABLE
**NO CHAIN **IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYER **LARGE PRIVATE REAR GARDEN **THREE BEDROOMS **DRIVEWAY PARKING **VIEWING ADVISED **EASY ACCESS TO YORK OUTER RING ROAD
"Three bedroom mid terraced property in a popular area with gardens and off road parking, beautifully presented. Space for families or with strong rental potential. No chain."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN **IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS or INVESTORS**HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION **PRIVATE DRIVEWAY PARKING **GENEROUS SIZE LOUNGE **EASY ACCESS TO YORK OUTER RING ROAD **EPC AWAITING***
NO FORWARD CHAIN! We as Agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this delightful 2 bedroomed semi detached bungalow nestled in a quiet residential location to the West of York close to local amenities as well as being on a good bus route and easy access to the ring ro...
"Part of the modern Hungate development, this impressive one bedroom apartment offers a stunning open plan living space which opens onto a fantastic balcony."
"A SEMI-DETACHED, TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW, requiring some refurbishment, situated in a convenient location to the west of York city centre, close to Hob Moor and local facilities in Acomb."
A superb first floor 2 bedroom apartment within this lovely city centre location - lovely modern interior and a Juliette balcony.
"Simon Says ""A fabulous two double bedroom home with a light and airy open plan living kitchen in a quiet cul-de-sac location in Rawcliffe with a garage"""
"A well presented, two bedroom terrace home located in the highly popular Holgate area of York. Upon entering the property you have the lounge with window to the front elevation. Beyond the lounge is an inner hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. Beyond the hallway you have the ..."
"A well-presented, two bedroom terraced home on a popular residential street located approximately one mile from York’s historic city walls. You enter the property in to the lounge with functioning fireplace and window to the front elevation. The lounge leads through to the dining room wi..."
"A two bedroom, semi detached home close to Acomb Front Street and its wealth of amenities. Upon entering the property you have an entrance porch leading through to an inner hallway with stairs leading to the first floor. The living room runs front to back of the property and has an ..."
This superb one bedroom apartment offers modern city living with a fabulous open plan lounge/diner and fitted kitchen.
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! FABULOUS LARGER THAN AVERAGE LAWNED REAR GARDEN! CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION! We as Agents are delighted to offer to the market this spacious 2 bed traditional style semi detached family home nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac to the North of York, close to an array of local amenities as wel..."
Spacious two bedroom flat in central York.
THREE BEDROOM TERRACE HOME - OPEN PLAN DINING KITCHEN - CONSERVATORY - STYLISH FITTED BATHROOM - DRIVEWAY - ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN - VIEWING IS RECOMMENDED
A fantastic two bedroom terrace within striking distance of the city centre.
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** An exciting opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom home in the popular area of Acomb, close to a variety of local amenities and transport links to York city centre. A much loved home for many years, this property could make a wonderful family home and is i..."
"A traditional VICTORIAN TERRACE HOUSE, situated in a highly sought after area of CLIFTON, close to York District Hospital and York City Centre"
"Located to the west of York, conveniently placed for access to York city centre, various commuter links and the many local amenities Acomb has to offer is this two double bedroom period home. Sure to appeal to a wide range of buyers; first time buyers looking to get on the property ladder or an i..."
"A 3 double bedroom semi detached dormer bungalow with a driveway and garage, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this two bedroom, semi-detached bungalow in the highly sought after Huntington. Upon entering the property there is an entrance hallway providing access to the other main rooms of the bungalow. There is a generous reception room with window to the front..."
"With features including STYLISH LIVING / DINING AREA, SEPARATE KITCHEN, DEDICATED PARKING, EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, a 10-YEAR NHBC guarantee and the ability to PRE-RESERVE ONLINE, this two bedroom apartment on Langley Gate development could be your perfect first home. Speak to our Developme..."
"A superb two bedroom, ground floor flat boasting a six minute walk to the city centre, spacious interiors, a lovely private patio area, access to great communal gardens which boarders The River Foss and a allocated parking space in a secure underground car park."
A beautifully presented 2 double bedroom period house with a stylish kitchen and bathroom. 
A 3 bedroom end terrace with a south west facing lawned rear garden and off street parking. The property is situated just 1.3 miles north of York city walls and is offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain.
"Situated in this sought after and convenient location, approximately a mile from the city centre this superb mid terrace property has undergone a scheme of modernisation and improvement including a restyling of the accommodation to incorporate a first floor bathroom as well as a utility room on t..."
This is a fantastic two-bedroom apartment in close proximity to York City Centre. The property is so spacious with a generous open-plan living area and two good-sized double bedrooms. Off Street parking is include for one car plus visitor parking
"A 2 double bedroom semi detached house in need of modernisation with a south east facing rear garden, offered for sale with the convenience of no forward chain."
"A hugely impressive one bedroom executive upper ground floor apartment placed in a sought after development, right in the heart of the city centre."
"This attractive period terraced property is set just off Haxby Road; a short walk from the heart of the city centre, and the District Hospital. Diamond Street is a no-through road and as such boasts a real sense of peace not ordinarily expected of such a location. The property i..."
"A lovely 2 double bedroom first floor apartment with the benefit of a parking space and a garage set in attractive communal gardens, situated just 2.5 miles south of York city centre."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a spacious three bedroom home in the popular area of Acomb, close to the local amenities of Gale Lane and Front Street with easy access to York city centre via varied commuter links. A much loved home for many years, this property is in need of some updating. "
"A spacious four bedroom mid terrace home on Foxwood Lane offering easy access to York city centre via the local commuter links whilst being very close to the local amenities on offer. Offered with no onward chain, this property is sure to be popular amongst first time buyers and investo..."
"Part of the hugely popular Hungate development, this one bedroom first floor apartment offers contemporary open plan living with access to a balcony and a fitted kitchen."
A wonderful first floor apartment offering open plan living with a modern fitted kitchen and located just a short stroll from the heart of the city centre.
"This wonderful two bedroom apartment features a spacious lounge which has a large French door opening onto a balcony, offering views across the city and down towards the River Foss."
IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY - VERY POPULAR LOCATION - CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS - TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS - SITTING ROOM AND LIVING ROOM - ENCLOSED REAR COURTYARD.
"An exciting opportunity to acquire a two bedroom semi detached home in the popular area of Burnholme. Close to a variety of local amenities, commuter links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road, this home offers the next buyers the opportunity to make it their very own as mode..."
"AN OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE WITH LOFT ROOM, LOCATED IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LEEMAN ROAD AREA."
"This bright and spacious apartment boasts a wonderful position within a most sought after riverside development. Rowntree Wharf, a former mill, has been tastefully modernised and improved to offer contemporary accommodation whilst retaining much of the property's original character. The Cocoa S..."
"We are pleased to present this three-bedroom, semi-detached property located in York, located on a good size plot the next owner will be able to to make this house their own. The property consists of – Lounge, Kitchen, Three bedrooms, a Bathroom and a WC. This property offers sp..."
"Located in the popular area of Acomb, a short walk from the local amenities Front Street has to offer, is this three bedroom end terrace home. Set on a good size plot, this property offers the next owner the exciting opportunity to make it their own as it is in need of full modernisation. "
"**** 80% DISCOUNT FOR SALE **** Located just off Water Lane is this three bedroomed, end terraced property with off street parking and a private walled garden."
WELL PRESENTED GOUND FLOOR APARTMENT - TWO BEDROOMS - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - FINISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD - STYLISH FITTED KITCHEN - PRIVATE COMMUNAL GARDENS - PARKING
"This beautifully kept and modernised home is situated close to the vibrant and eclectic mix of Acomb shops and is just a short walk away from Energise Leisure Centre. Briefly comprising; entrance lobby leading on to a dining room, lounge and kitchen. To the first floor there are two DOUB..."
"A smartly presented 2 bedroom apartment with private terrace and parking, enjoying a peaceful location within the sought-after area of Fulford."
"GOOD SIZE SOUTH FACING LAWNED REAR GARDEN! NO FORWARD CHAIN! We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this bright and spacious 3 bed home located to the West of York, close to an array of local amenities as well as being on a good bus route and easy access into ..."
Well-built one bedroom apartment in an ideal location to attract tenants.
DECEPTIVELY LARGE GARDEN FLAT IN CONVERTED VICTORIAN TERRACED HOME! POTENTIAL TO SPLIT INTO TWO APARTMENTS! WALKING DISTANCE FROM THE TRAIN STATION AND THE CITY CENTRE! We as agents are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this unique apartment boasting gardens to front and ...
Very smart apartment which has undergone an extensive refurbishment from the current owners which has improved the layout and opened the space up to cater for modern living. The front offers allocated parking plus visitors and a rear pleasant communal garden. Perfect for a whole host of buyers.
"A fabulous modern apartment located right in the heart of the city centre, finished to a high standard throughout."
"Located to the east of York, within the popular residential area of Huntington, is this three bedroom dormer bungalow. With a 68% share available to purchase, properties of this size under the shared ownership scheme seldom come to the market. Huntington is located a short drive from Yo..."
"Located a short walk from the historic walls of York city centre and close to the scenic walks of the River Foss, is this unique two bedroom ground floor apartment with its own private courtyard. Situated off Huntington Road, this apartment also benefits from regular commuter services to the city..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN - IDEAL FIRST TIME OR INVESTMENT PURCHASE - Churchills Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this two bed mid terrace property converted from a former South Bank warehouse. Conveniently located for York City centre, railway station and Knavesmire racecourse as well as a s..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM UPPER FLOOR FLAT OFF THE HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER NUNNERY LANE, JUST ONE MINUTE WALK FROM THE VERY POPULAR BISHOPTHORPE ROAD."
"A well-proportioned two bedroom end-terrace property located in the popular Leeman Road area of the city, just a short distance from the railway station."
"A two bedroom, ground floor apartment in a popular development approximately half a mile from York’s historic city walls. The building is entered via a communal entrance hall with electronic intercom system. Upon entering the apartment, itself there is an entrance hallway with storage cupboar..."
"Apartment 4 is the former show apartment of this exclusive City centre development of only 25 apartments. The apartment is situated on the upper ground floor of the development with views along St Saviourgate towards the bell tower. The finish of these apartments is second to none, as is the lo..."
"A well presented TWO BEDROOM TERRACE HOUSE, situated in the sought after LEEMAN ROAD area of York providing easy access to York City Centre and York Railway Station"
"DELIGHTFUL APARTMENT OFF FULFORD ROAD! IDEAL INVESTMENT OF FIRST TIME BUYER OPPORTUNITY! We as Agents are pleased to offer to the market this bright and spacious 2 bed ground floor apartment with allocated parking nestled in a quiet and exclusive development off the ever popular Fulford Road, bei..."
"This spacious semi detached home is offered with no onward chain, and is set to the west of York; conveniently positioned for access to the City centre, commuter links and many local amenities Acomb village has to offer. The property has been well maintained although does offer scope fo..."
Offered with No Onward | Immaculate Throughout | Within Walking Distance to York City Centre
"A well-presented, two bedroom home in the popular Leeman Road area of York. Upon entering the property you have a lounge with window to the front elevation that fills the room with plenty of light. Beyond the lounge you come to the dining room with stairs leading to the first floor. The k..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* CURRENTLY LET UNTIL 1ST APRIL 2024, ACHIEVING £1050,00 PER MONTH. A well presented ONE BEDROOM MAISONETTE, currently run as a successful corporate let, situated in a tucked away location just off Market Street and High Ousegate, in the heart of York's vibrant histori..."
"Forming part of this exclusive development set within attractive mature gardens less than a mile from the city centre, this spacious 2 bedroom apartment is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and offers an ideal opportunity for the first time buyer to acquire an exclusive apartment with the benefit of a..."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY, This modern apartment is in the exclusive development of Fulford Place and is offered to the market with no onward chain, comprising: a large lounge/diner with open plan modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, two bedrooms with en-suite shower room to the master, ..."
"Simon Says ""Located between Coney St & Parliament St is this unique duplex apartment set over two floors. This property is great for first time buyers wanting to experience living in the heart of the city centre whilst it makes perfect sense for a number of different investors as it appe..."
"An immaculately presented PARK HOME CHALET BUNGALOW for over 45's, situated within a private gated communal entrance in a superb location on St Oswald's Road lying close to Fulford Road."
"A unique detached property placed just off Lawrence Street and offering an open plan living space, one double bedroom, a study/potential second bedroom and a three piece bathroom."
"***FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION : STARTING BID PRICE £200,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE ***NO FORWARD CHAIN***POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA***THREE BEDROOMS***FANTASTIC PLOT****IN NEED OF SOME UPDATING***LOTS OF POTENTIAL***VIEWING A MUST***"
"A modern and spacious first floor flat situated in a newly renovated building in Clifton Moor, a short distance to many shops, amenities and leisure facilities."
"A well presented, modern ground floor flat situated in a newly renovated building in Clifton Moor, a short distance to many shops, amenities and leisure facilities."
BEAUTIFULLY REFURBISHED PERIOD TERRACE - PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTMENT BUYERS ALIKE!
A fantastic flat at a reasonable entry price for any avid investor.
"Situated in Chapelfields this extended two bedroom semi detached house benefits from gas central heating, uPVC double glazing and no onward chain. The property comprises: an entrance hall, a spacious double aspect living room with French doors opening to a uPVC double glazed conservatory, kitchen..."
"1 bedroom basement apartment close to the city centre. With a rear patio garden, this light bright and spacious apartment is perfect for first-time buyers or investors. No onward chain."
"Smart property which has lived a life as a popular holiday let for the current owners but can now offer the new buyer options being located so close the hospital. The one double bedroom offers a shower room next door, then a loft area with additional shower room....everyone can get ready at the s..."
"This wonderful, spacious apartment is set to the west of York in a small, modern development tucked away off Beckfield Lane. Occupying a great position on the ground floor, the property feels light and airy yet offers a real sense of privacy. Beautifully presented by the current owner, ..."
"A rear storage building with planning permission to become a two storey cottage, located on the sought after Portland Street. Located on the corner of Gillygate and Portland Street this building plot has planning in place for a two storey property with an open plan living area. "
A first floor two bedroom apartment within a modern development and includes a private parking space all within half a mile of York city walls. Heworth Mews is located close to York city centre with the popular East Parade just a stones throw away offering a range of amenities including...
"Located close to York city centre and within a short walk from the historic city walls is this two bedroom apartment. Positioned on the first floor, this property is currently tenanted until April 2023. Internally the apartment comprises an entrance hallway leading into the open plan li..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY Sold with a tenant in situ and a strong rental yield, this spacious contemporary apartment in York city centre boasts one of the best positions in this prestigious development."
A wonderful two bedroom top floor apartment offering allocated parking and a generous open plan living space.
"Ideal investment opportunity. Located just a short walk to York city centre via both Bootham or along the river Ouse, is this quaint one bedroom mews property with huge potential to be let on the Holiday Let market. This freehold property offers a private and enclosed courtyard with bi..."
"**** NO ONWARD CHAIN **** A traditional 2 bedroom mid terrace property requiring some modernisation, with spacious 2 bedroom living accommodation, ideal for investors and DIY enthusiasts."
This well-proportioned two bedroom top floor apartment features living accommodation including a generous lounge and a separate fitted dining kitchen.
"**5 MINUTES FROM CITY CENTRE** INCREDIBLY PRICED** PRIVATE GARDEN & ENTRANCE** STRONG YIELDS OVER 10%** PERFECT FOR OWNER OCCUPIERS AND INVESTORS**STUNNING NEW BUILD DEVELOPMENT**
"
"Located in the popular suburb of Acomb, walking distance from a wide range of local amenities & York city centre and with great access to the outer ring road, this immaculate apartment will prove popular. Situated on the first floor in this recently converted Victorian town house, the accommodati..."
"A two bedroom end terrace house in this convenient residential area, walking distance to local amenities, shops and schools and with easy access into the city centre and outer ring road. Updated and maintained by the current owners, with modern gas central heating and UPVC double glazing througho..."
"***FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION : STARTING BID £190,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE ***THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME***POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA OF DRINGHOUSES***TWO RECEPTION ROOMS***SHOWER ROOM***GARDENS***EXCELLENT ROAD LINKS***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES***VIEWING A MUST***EPC D***COUNC..."
Stunning one-bedroom flat in a prime central location with York.
"SPACIOUS APARTMENT - TWO BEDROOMS - OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN - COMMNUAL GARDENS - OPEN PLAN SITTING ROOM/KITCHEN - PARKING SAPCE - VEWINGS ESSENTAIL. We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in the sum of £197,500 . Any persons wishing to increase on this..."
2 bedroom duplex apartment with a balcony within walking distance of York St Johns University.
"***FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION : STARTING BID PRICE £190,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE ***NO FORWARD CHAIN ***THREE BEDROOMS ***END TOWN HOUSE ***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES ***CUL DE SAC POSITION ***ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN ***IDEAL FIRST TIME BUYER/INVESTOR PROPERTY ***VIEWING RECOMMENDED **..."
"If a turnkey apartment, with two bedrooms, open plan living and allocated parking is what you're looking for, then this property in a modern development just off Tadcaster Road is the one for you. With fast links to the A64, a short bus journey into ..."
"This is a wonderful modern first-floor one bedroom apartment with parking, located just a stones throw away from the city walls, with a view of York Minster. This property is perfect for first time buyers or those looking for a fantastic investment!"
A beautifully presented and well-designed two bedroomed ground floor apartment. The property which is situated in this modern and popular development just off Tadcaster road and conveniently placed for access to Tesco’s supermarket and the A64. The property also benefits from good public transpor...
"*Only A Few Units Remaining* A brand new development featuring one and two bedrooms in a highly sought after neighbourhood only 5 minutes away from the town centre. Comprises a luxury specification throughout, within a close proximity to the University and other amenities. LOCAT..."
"WHAT A FANTASTIC LOCATION! A perfect opportunity for any first time buyer or investor to acquire a one bedroom ground floor apartment, a short walk from the varied amenities of Blossom Street and Micklegate, whilst within close proximity of York railway station and various commuter l..."
"Situated in an elevated position in the extremely sought after Bootham area of York and just a stones throw from the vibrant hustle and bustle of city centre shops, river walks and railway station is this top floor apartment. The beautifully presented accommodation briefly comprises; imp..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this one bedroom ground floor apartment located within the popular development of Ouse Lea. Within walking distance of Homestead Park, the picturesque views along the river Ouse and commuter links to York city centre, this property is sure to appeal to a variety of..."
"A modern first floor apartment with a parking space, located a short walk from York Railway Station. These apartments are ideal for city centre living or buy to let investment. Developed in 2016 the private development known as The Walk, is in easy reach of Micklegate and the amenities..."
An ideal opportunity to acquire this modern ground floor apartment ideal for a first time buyer/ investment or a holiday let!
"Well presented one bedroom top/third floor apartment in this sought after development with allocated parking, close to the railway station and city centre. Sold with tenant in situ."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN Located to the west of York, is this bright and spacious ground floor apartment, situated within walking distance to the Railway station, city centre and local amenities. The property has been a successful rental for many years, and would make an ideal investment or first tim..."
"This spacious two bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment has STUNNING VIEWS over Haxby Road Bowls Park and is set within this ever sought after over 60's development ideally placed for access to York city centre, the District Hospital and local amenities. Within the development there is a commu..."
"A very spacious second floor apartment in this sought after area, within the city walls. One double bedroom. Perfect for first time buyers or investors."
"A lovely one bedroom first floor apartment offering the benefits of a well-proportioned lounge/diner, a separate fitted kitchen, a three piece bathroom and is located close to the city centre."
"Ideal for any first-time buyer or investor, this purpose built, one bedroom ground floor apartment is located only a mile from the City Centre. The property not only provides easy access to York City Centre but all of the major road links including the A64 and A19. Hardisty Cloisters is tucked..."
A generous one bedroom ground floor apartment located right in the heart of the city centre and offering the huge advantage of a secure allocated parking space.
"A wonderful opportunity to live within Yorks city walls, close to a variety of local amenities, local transport links and historic monuments. This two bedroom duplex apartment would make an ideal first home or investment. This property has been a much loved home for some years and now is in need ..."
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS!! This spacious one bedroom first floor flat is situated in the highly conveniently area of Walmgate, providing a central location and ideal access to a wealth of amenities. The accommodation comprises of entrance hall with two spacious ..."
"***FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION : STARTING BID PRICE £170,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE **NO CHAIN **FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO MODERNISE THROUGHOUT ***TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ***VIEWING HIGHLY RECCOMENDED ***END TERRACE ***DRIVWAY ***GARAGE ***GOOD SIZE PLOT ***EPC GRADE F ***COUNCIL TAX BAND..."
"This spacious two bedroom apartment is set within this ever sought after Over 60's development ideally placed for access to York city centre, the District Hospital and local amenities. Hansom Place is a small collection of retirement properties and is sure to appeal to those looking for a low mai..."
"A two bedroom first floor apartment situated upon this popular development benefitting from great transport links to York city centre and further afield via the ring road, whilst also being a short walk to Clifton Moor shopping centre. Entering the property through the communal and secu..."
A wonderful first floor apartment placed in a modern development just off Heworth Green with easy access into the city centre and many amenities nearby.
"A beautifully presented first floor apartment benefiting from allocated parking and balcony, being located within this tree lined development and enjoying quick and easy access to York city centre, the A64 and A19."
A well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor apartment located in a development placed just off Huntington Road.
"A one bedroom ground floor flat located within York's city walls on Tanner Row. Offering great access to all the city centre offers and York Railway Station it comprises of a living room with open plan modern kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom.  A great property that will suit a range o..."
"A wonderful one bedroom ground floor apartment in this popular residential development located within Clifton Moor. Converted over recent years, this apartment offers spacious accommodation and a generous courtyard. Offered with no onward chain, this property is sure to be popular amongst a varie..."
"With no forward chain, this top-floor flat is tucked away just off Millfield Lane. An excellent opportunity to purchase a good-sized flat in move-in condition. With Parking this would make the ideal first property or equally an excellent investment opportunity."
"A well presented one bedroom ground floor flat forming part of this small development considered to provide good access to the University of York but also York city centre.  One double bedroom, bathroom, living room with open plan kitchen.  Early viewing recommended."
"A large 1 bedroom ground floor apartment set in this sought after location within walking distance of the railway station and the city centre. The property is currently let under a shorthold tenancy agreement and provides an excellent investment. The accommodation comprises private entrance hall,..."
"A well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor apartment located just a short distance from the city centre and offering the huge benefit of an allocated parking space. For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £160,000 plus Reservation Fee."
A modern and contemporary one bedroom ground floor flat within walking distance to York railway station and the city centre. Ideal investment opportunity or first time buyer property.
"A rare opportunity to purchase a semi detached bungalow under the Shared Ownership Scheme. This two bedroom home is perfectly situated for easy access to York city centre via local transport links and Acomb's amenities. The property comprises a wide entrance hallway, generous reception ..."
"A three bedroom terrace house with no onward chain in a popular residential location with a wealth of local amenities close by, consisting: entrance hallway, spacious open plan double aspect lounge/diner, kitchen, utility room, white suite bathroom with shower over bath, three first floor bedroo..."
Great value studio flat situated just a short distance from York's town centre.
"Positioned to the west of York, close to the local amenities Acomb's Front Street has to offer is this well maintained ground floor apartment with communal outdoor space and private storage. An ideal first home or investment opportunity. Internally the property comprises of an entrance ..."
"What a fantastic apartment this is. Modern open plan living, bringing such a light and airy feel to the place. A great size master bedroom and allocated parking. All the amenities of Clifton Moor are close by too."
"Located in the heart of York’s bustling city centre this studio apartment is sure to appeal to a variety of purchasers. The development is accessed via a communal entrance with intercom entry system, a lift and stairs lead to the second floor where this apartment is located. Upon entering..."
"An ideal investment opportunity or an ideal ground floor flat for the first time buyer. Located just off Tadcaster Road, close to the Knavesmire, this property briefly comprises; entrance hallway with two storage cupboards, lounge and fitted kitchen with door to the rear and communal g..."
"The perfect first time buy or investment. Located to the north of York, this spacious apartment is just a short walk from the City centre and varied local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises; a good sized lounge, separate kitchen with fitted units, inner hallway with storage ..."
"A one bedroom ground floor apartment, ideal for a first time buyer or investor. Dale Street has been sectioned off into two peaceful cul-de-sac's offering pedestrian only access through its centre, the apartment is accessed by car from the Scarcroft Primary School End (Ofsted Rated Outs..."
"This well-proportioned one bedroom first floor apartment benefits from a generous lounge, a separate fitted kitchen and a three piece bathroom."
This property is a spacious two bedroom semi-detached house offered on a shared ownership basis boasting an ideal layout for modern living. The open plan reception room has ample space for dining and seating areas in addition the fitted kitchen. There is a cloakroom to the ground floor and house ...
"A modern ground floor studio flat in a small development well situated for access to York St John Uni and the hospital.  The property can be used for holiday lets and is sure to attract interest from owner occupiers and investors alike.  Studio room with fitted kitchen, shower room a..."
An impeccably maintained and modern first floor retirement apartment - ready to move straight into. 
"QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION OFF BECKFIELD LANE! We as Agents are delighted to offer to the market this delightful one bed ground floor apartment tucked away in a quiet spot to the West of York, being close to good local amenities, easy access into town as well as straight on to the ring road. The p..."
One Bedroom Apartment - Ideal Investment Opportunity - First Floor - Finished To A High Standard - Desirable Location - Easy Access To City Centre - Close To Local Amenities - EPC Grade C.
"Two bedroom retirement property tucked away in a quiet cul de sac off Fulford Road, offering quick and easy to York City Centre and regular bus routes in and out of York. Sold with Vacant Possession and No Onward Chain."
"Located to the north/east of the city just off Huntington Road, this one bedroom first floor apartment features a generous lounge/diner, a fitted kitchen and a three piece bathroom."
"A modern, two bedroom apartment, in a popular development close to the heart of York city centre offered on a Discount for Sale scheme. The development is accessed by a communal entrance with intercom system. Lift and stairs lead to the first floor where this apartment is located. Up..."
Fantastic Location - Close To City Centre - EPC Grade D - Easy Access To Ring Road And A64 -Fantastic Amenities Nearby - Ideal Investment Opportunity -Currently tenanted - For sale with no onward chain
NO FORWARD CHAIN! IDEAL FOR INVESTMENT BUYERS AND FIRST TIME BUYERS ALIKE. Churchills are delighted to have the opportunity to present to the market this delightful mezzanine apartment forming part of this imposing period conversion. Set within walking distance of the city centre as well as a sto...
Productive arable land extending to 10.69 acres (4.33 hectares).
***NO FORWARD CHAIN ***ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT ***LARGER KITCHEN WITH WALK IN PANTRY ***OVER 55'S DEVELOPMENT ***WARDEN ASSISTED ***SECOND FLOOR ***FANTASTIC VIEWS ***CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES ACOMB VILLAGE ***COMMUNAL GARDENS ***COMMUNAL FACILITIES ***VIEWING A MUST***
"No. 49 - This one bedroom, second floor, over 55's retirement apartment has been well maintained and is only a short flat walk to the local shops & amenities in Acomb, with excellent bus links into York City Centre. The apartment is located on the second floor and can be accessed by s..."
A one bedroomed ground floor apartment situated in this increasingly popular modern development within half a mile of the town centre. Sold with no onward chain the property is offered with warden assisted to those over 60 years of age. The accommodation has the benefit of communal faci...
This spacious ground floor retirement property is available for sale on a shared ownership basis with the purchase of 75% offered. Mistral Court is an Over 60's retirement development set to the east of York and is well placed for access to varied local amenities. boasting a private entrance and...
A spacious and upgraded apartment within this highly sought-after over 55's development occupying a choice top floor position which is crucially offered for sale with vacant possession and no forward chain.
"NO FORWARD CHAIN - This bright, light and airy one bedroom second floor south facing retirement apartment, overlooks the beautiful and peaceful communal gardens. Homeyork House is a superb development with lifts to all floors and generous parking areas for visiting family and friends. It is perf..."
"A one bedroom 2nd floor retirement apartment, located in this enviable position within the building overlooking the beautiful communal gardens. The area of Fulford is well served by local shops and amenities whilst there are frequent Bus links to York City Centre. Homeyork House is a superb indep..."
"Superb STUDENT Investment Opportunity - Rathmell Hall on Tanner Row, York is a popular city centre accommodation choice for York students. Facilities include a FREE gym, cinema room, lounge and study room. Minster views from this popular room!"
"Located in Semley (Dorset) R M English are proud to present the NaviHo Apex, a beautifully designed house set upon a mobile base, known as a “Tiny House on Wheels.” The Tiny House movement originated in North America where it spread from coast to coast and spilled ov..."
"A one bedroom, first floor over 55’s apartment located approximately half a mile from York’s historic city walls. The property is accessed via a communal entrance hall with intercom system. There are both stairs and a lift leading to the first floor where this property is located. Upon en..."
WELCOME TO VICTORIA WAY........ in need of updating this shared ownbership property part owned by JRHT is sure to appeal to a varity of buyers.
"This one-bedroom first-floor flat benefits from communal parking and gardens. The property features a private lobby and stairwell, lounge, kitchen, 1 bedroom and bathroom. "
